Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 3 O.S. 2021, Section 256, as last
amended by Section 5, Chapter 365, O.S.L. 2023 (3 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 256), is amended to read as follows:
Section 256. A. Registration fees and taxes on aircraft shall
be paid to and collected by Service Oklahoma and its agents in the
same manner as registration fees and taxes are paid and collected on
automobiles. All fees and taxes collected pursuant to this section
shall be apportioned by Service Oklahoma.
The registration and reregistration of aircraft shall be subject
to the following schedule and rates:
1. Single-engine piston aircraft shall be taxed according to
the following Schedule “A”:
SCHEDULE “A”
WEIGHT IN POUNDS FEE
Less than 1,750 $30.00
1,751 through 2,500 $52.50
2,501 through 3,500 $82.50
3,501 through 4,500 $112.50
4,501 through 5,500 $142.50
5,501 through 6,500 $172.50
6,501 through 8,500 $202.50
8,501 through 10,000 $277.50
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 5

10,001 through 13,000 $345.00
13,001 through 17,000 $397.50
17,001 through 20,000 $450.00
20,001 through 25,000 $562.50
25,001 through 30,000 $750.00
30,001 through 40,000 $937.50
40,001 through 50,000 $1,125.00
50,001 through 75,000 $1,500.00
75,001 through 100,000 $1,875.00
100,001 and over $2,250.00
2. Rotary-wing aircraft shall be taxed at two times the
Schedule “A” fee, based on the same weight classifications.
3. Multiengine piston aircraft shall be taxed at three times
the Schedule “A” fee, based on the same weight classifications.
4. Turbo-prop aircraft shall be taxed at six times the Schedule
“A” fee, based on the same weight classifications.
5. Turbo-jet aircraft shall be taxed at ten times the Schedule
“A” fee, based on the same weight classifications.
6. Antique aircraft as defined by the Federal Aviation
Administration, sailplanes, balloons, and home-built aircraft shall
be subject to a flat-rate fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00).
7. The fees of this subsection, except those in paragraph 6 of
this subsection, shall be reduced at a rate of ten percent (10%)
each year following the date of manufacture until the fee is equal
to fifty percent (50%) of the original fee, which shall then be the
fee for each year thereafter.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 6

8. Every aircraft owner shall have the right to appeal the
assessment of the fee as provided for in this subsection, and
Service Oklahoma shall appraise the aircraft and its avionics as
personal property at the fair market value thereof, and shall apply
a twelve-percent assessment rate which shall be levied at the
appropriate county millage rate.
B. Aircraft purchased after January 1 of each year and subject
to registration as provided for in this section shall be registered
and taxed on a prorated basis. Registration fees and taxes shall be
in lieu of all aircraft ad valorem taxes. All monies collected by
Service Oklahoma shall be paid to Service Oklahoma and disbursed as
follows:
1. Three percent (3%) of all such funds shall be paid to the
State Treasurer for deposit to the credit of the General Revenue
Fund of the State Treasury; and
2. Ninety-seven percent (97%) of such registration fees and
taxes shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and
Aeronautics Revolving Fund.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 2-117.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-117.1. A. It shall be the duty of the Oklahoma Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma to investigate and report to the
Corporation Commission and the Department of Public Safety
violations of their rules and regulations and the laws governing the
transportation of persons and property by motor transportation
companies and all other motor carriers for hire.
B. It shall be the duty of the Corporation Commission to
investigate and report to the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service
Oklahoma and the Department of Public Safety violations of their
rules and regulations and the laws governing the transportation of
persons and property by motor transportation companies and all other
motor carriers for hire.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 7

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101, as
last amended by Section 34, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101. A. No person, except those hereinafter
expressly exempted in Sections 6-102 and 6-102.1 of this title,
shall operate any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless
the person has a valid Oklahoma driver license for the class of
vehicle being operated under the provisions of this title. No
person shall be permitted to possess more than one valid license at
any time, except as provided in paragraph 4 of subsection F of this
section.
B. 1. No person shall operate a Class A commercial motor
vehicle unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and
holds a valid Class A commercial license, except as provided in
paragraph 5 of this subsection and subsection F of this section.
Any person holding a valid Class A commercial license shall be
permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes A, B, C and D, except
as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.
2. No person shall operate a Class B commercial motor vehicle
unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a
valid Class B commercial license, except as provided in paragraph 5
of subsection F of this section. Any person holding a valid Class B
commercial license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in
Classes B, C and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this
subsection.
3. No person shall operate a Class C commercial motor vehicle
unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a
valid Class C commercial license, except as provided in subsection F
of this section. Any person holding a valid Class C commercial
license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes C
and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.
4. No person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be
licensed to operate any motor vehicle which is required to be
placarded for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172,
subpart F, except as provided in subsection F of this section;
provided, a person eighteen (18) years of age or older may be
licensed to operate a farm vehicle which is required to be placarded
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 8

for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172, subpart F,
except as provided in subsection F of this section.
5. A person at least seventeen (17) years of age who
successfully completes all examinations required by law may be
issued by Service Oklahoma:
a. a restricted Class A commercial license which shall
grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class
A or Class B commercial motor vehicle for harvest
purposes or a Class D motor vehicle, or
b. a restricted Class B commercial license which shall
grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class
B commercial motor vehicle for harvest purposes or a
Class D motor vehicle.
6. No person shall operate a Class D motor vehicle unless the
person is sixteen (16) years of age or older and holds a valid Class
D license, except as provided for in Section 6-102 or 6-105 of this
title. Any person holding a valid Class D license shall be
permitted to operate motor vehicles in Class D only.
C. Any person issued a driver license pursuant to this section
may exercise the privilege thereby granted upon all streets and
highways in this state.
D. No person shall operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
without having a valid Class A, B, C or D license with a motorcycle
endorsement. Except as otherwise provided by law, any new applicant
for an original driver license shall be required to successfully
complete a written examination, vision examination and driving
examination for a motorcycle as prescribed by the Department of
Public Safety, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, and a certified
state-approved motorcycle basic rider course approved by the
Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, if the applicant
is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to be eligible for a
motorcycle endorsement thereon. The written examination and driving
examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service Oklahoma
upon verification that the person has successfully completed a
certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course approved by the
Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 9

E. Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who lawfully
possesses a valid Oklahoma driver license which is eligible for
renewal shall be required to successfully complete a written
examination, vision examination and driving examination for a
motorcycle as prescribed by the Department, in conjunction with
Service Oklahoma, and a certified state-approved motorcycle basic
rider course approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service
Oklahoma, if the person is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to
be eligible for a motorcycle endorsement. The written examination
and driving examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service
Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully
completed a certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course
approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.
F. 1. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older may apply
for a restricted Class A, B or C commercial learner permit. Service
Oklahoma, after the applicant has passed all parts of the
examination for a Class D license and has successfully passed all
parts of the examination for a Class A, B or C commercial license
other than the driving examination, may issue to the applicant a
commercial learner permit which shall entitle the person having
immediate lawful possession of the commercial learner permit and a
valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional driver license pursuant
to Section 6-212 of this title to operate a Class A, B or C
commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways solely for the
purpose of behind-the-wheel training in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Department.
2. This commercial learner permit shall be issued for a period
as provided in Section 6-115 of this title of one year; provided,
such commercial learner permit may be suspended, revoked, canceled,
denied or disqualified at the discretion of the Department, with
notice to Service Oklahoma, for violation of the restrictions, for
failing to give the required or correct information on the
application or for violation of any traffic laws of this state
pertaining to the operation of a motor vehicle. Except as otherwise
provided, the lawful possessor of a commercial learner permit who
has been issued a commercial learner permit for a minimum of
fourteen (14) days may have the restriction requiring an
accompanying driver removed by satisfactorily completing a driver’s
examination; provided, the removal of a restriction shall not
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 10

authorize the operation of a Class A, B or C commercial motor
vehicle if such operation is otherwise prohibited by law.
3. No person shall apply for and Service Oklahoma shall not
issue an original Class A, B or C driver license until the person
has been issued a commercial learner permit and held the permit for
at least fourteen (14) days. Any person who currently holds a Class
B or C license and who wishes to apply for another class of
commercial driver license shall be required to apply for a
commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at least
fourteen (14) days before applying for the Class A or B license, as
applicable. Any person who currently holds a Class A, B or C
license and who wishes to add an endorsement or remove a restriction
for which a skills examination is required shall be required to
apply for a commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at
least fourteen (14) days before applying for the endorsement.
4. A commercial learner permit shall be issued by Service
Oklahoma as a separate and unique document which shall be valid only
in conjunction with a valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional
driver license pursuant to Section 6-212 of this title, both of
which shall be in the possession of the person to whom they have
been issued whenever that person is operating a commercial motor
vehicle as provided in this subsection.
5. After one renewal of a commercial learner permit, as
provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, a commercial permit
shall not be renewed again. Any person who has held a commercial
learner permit for the initial issuance period and one renewal
period shall not be eligible for and Service Oklahoma shall not
issue another renewal of the permit; provided, the person may
reapply for a new commercial learner permit, as provided for in this
subsection.
G. 1. For purposes of this title:
a. “REAL ID Compliant Driver License” or “Identification
Card” means a driver license or identification card
issued by this state that has been certified by the
United States Department of Homeland Security (USDHS)
as compliant with the requirements of the REAL ID Act
of 2005, Public Law No. 109-13. A REAL ID Compliant
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 11

Driver License or Identification Card and the process
through which it is issued incorporate a variety of
security measures designed to protect the integrity
and trustworthiness of the license or card. A REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card will
be clearly marked on the face indicating that it is a
compliant document, and
b. “REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License” or
“Identification Card” means a driver license or
identification card issued by this state that has not
been certified by the United States Department of
Homeland Security (USDHS) as being compliant with the
requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005. A REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
will be clearly marked on the face indicating that it
is not compliant with the federal REAL ID Act of 2005
and is not acceptable for official federal purposes.
The driver license or identification card will have a
unique design or color indicator that clearly
distinguishes it from a compliant license or card.
2. Original Driver License and Identification Card Issuance:
a. Application for an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL
ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
shall be made to Service Oklahoma or a licensed
operator provided such licensed operator is authorized
to process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses and Identification Cards. Application for a
REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification
Card shall be made to Service Oklahoma.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed
operators shall perform all document recognition and
other requirements needed for approval of an original
REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Identification
Card application. Service Oklahoma employees shall
perform all document recognition and other
requirements needed for approval of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 12

c. Upon approval of an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL
ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may take the approved
application document to a licensed operator to receive
a temporary driver license or identification card.
d. The licensed operator shall process the approved REAL
ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
Identification Card application and upon payment shall
provide the applicant a temporary driver license or
identification card. A temporary driver license or
identification card shall afford the holder the
privileges otherwise granted by the specific class of
driver license or identification card for the period
of time listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card,
whichever time period is shorter.
3. REAL ID Compliant Driver License and Identification Card
Renewal and Replacement:
a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card may be
made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator;
provided, such licensed operator is authorized to
process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses and Identification Cards. A licensed
operator may process the voluntary downgrade of a REAL
ID Compliant Commercial Driver License to any lower
class license upon request of the licensee; provided,
no additional endorsements or restrictions are placed
on the license.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed
operators shall perform all document recognition and
other requirements needed for approval of a renewal or
replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card application.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 13

c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may receive a temporary
driver license or identification card from Service
Oklahoma or an authorized licensed operator.
d. A temporary driver license or identification card
acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall
afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by
the specific class of driver license or identification
card being renewed or replaced for the period of time
listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant Driver License
or Identification Card, whichever time period is
shorter.
e. For purposes of this title, an application for a REAL
ID Compliant Driver License or Identification Card by
an individual with a valid Oklahoma-issued driver
license or identification card shall be considered a
renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card.
4. REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License and Identification Card
Renewal and Replacement:
a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card may
be made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator.
A licensed operator may process the voluntary
downgrade of a REAL ID Noncompliant Commercial Driver
License to any lower class license upon request of the
licensee; provided, no additional endorsements or
restrictions are added to the license.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or licensed operators shall
perform all document recognition and other
requirements needed for approval of a renewal or
replacement REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
Identification Card application.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 14

c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may receive a temporary
driver license or identification card from Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator.
d. A temporary driver license or identification card
acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall
afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by
the specific class of driver license or identification
card being renewed or replaced for the period of time
listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or Identification Card, whichever time period
is shorter.
H. 1. The fee charged for an approved application for an
original Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or an approved application for the addition of an
endorsement to a current valid Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License shall be assessed in accordance with the
following schedule:
Class A Commercial Learner
Permit $25.00
Class A Commercial License $25.00
Class B Commercial Learner
Permit $15.00
Class B Commercial License $15.00
Class C Commercial Learner
Permit $15.00
Class C Commercial License $15.00
Class D License $4.00
Motorcycle Endorsement $4.00
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 15

2. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this
title, all monies collected from the fees charged for Class A, B and
C commercial licenses pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the General Revenue Fund
of this state.
I. The fee charged for any failed examination shall be Four
Dollars ($4.00) for any license classification. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1104 of this title, all monies collected from
such examination fees pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.
J. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of
subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or
renewal of a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License shall be in
accordance with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant
who has a CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement
fee for the issuance of the license:
License Class 4-year 8-year
Class A Commercial Learner
Permit $56.50 $113.00
Class A Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
Class B Commercial Learner
Permit $56.50 $113.00
Class B Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
Class C Commercial Learner
Permit $46.50 $93.00
Class C Commercial License $46.50 $93.00
Class D License $38.50 $77.00
K. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of
subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or
renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License shall be in accordance
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 16

with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant who has a
CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement fee for the
issuance of the license:
License Class 4-year 8-year
REAL ID Compliant Class A
Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class A
Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class B
Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class B
Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class C
Commercial Learner Permit $46.50 $93.00
REAL ID Compliant Class C
Commercial License $46.50 $93.00
REAL ID Compliant Class D
License $38.50 $77.00
L. A commercial learner permit may be renewed one time for a
period of one hundred eighty (180) days. The cost for the renewed
permit shall be the same as for the original permit.
M. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this
title, of each fee charged pursuant to the provisions of subsections
J, K, and L of this section shall be apportioned by Service Oklahoma
as follows:
1. Five Dollars and fifty cents ($5.50) of a 4-year license or
Eleven Dollars ($11.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to
the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-
2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 17

2. Six Dollars and seventy-five cents ($6.75) of a 4-year
license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents ($13.50) of an 8-year
license shall be deposited to the Department of Public Safety
Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely for the
purpose of administration and maintenance of the computerized
imaging system of the Department through October 31, 2022.
Beginning November 1, 2022, Six Dollars and seventy-five cents
($6.75) of a 4-year license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents
($13.50) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service
Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely
for the purpose of administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars
($20.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Department
of Public Safety Revolving Fund for all original or renewal
issuances of licenses through October 31, 2022. Beginning November
1, 2022, Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars
($20.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund for all original or renewal issuances of
licenses; and
4. Five Dollars ($5.00) of a 4-year license or Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title.
N. All original and renewal driver licenses shall expire as
provided in Section 6-115 of this title.
O. 1. Through May 31, 2025, any person sixty-two (62) to
sixty-four (64) years of age during the calendar year of issuance or
renewal of a Class D license or motorcycle endorsement shall be
charged the following prorated fee:
4-year 8-year
Age 62 $21.25 $42.50
Age 63 $17.50 $35.00
Age 64 $13.75 $27.50
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 18

2. Any person sixty-five (65) years of age or older during the
calendar year of issuance or renewal of a Class D license or
motorcycle endorsement shall not be charged a fee.
P. No person who has been honorably discharged from active
service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or
Oklahoma National Guard and who has been certified by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs, its successor or the Armed
Forces of the United States to be a disabled veteran in receipt of
compensation at the one-hundred-percent rate for a permanent
disability sustained through military action or accident resulting
from disease contracted while in such active service and registered
with the veterans registry created by the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs shall be charged a fee for the issuance,
replacement or renewal of an Oklahoma driver license; provided, that
if a veteran has been previously exempt from a fee pursuant to this
subsection, no registration with the veterans registry shall be
required.
Q. In accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this
section, Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules for the
issuance and renewal of driver licenses authorized pursuant to the
provisions of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title; provided,
that no such rules applicable to the issuance or renewal of REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver Licenses shall create more stringent standards
than such rules applicable as of January 1, 2017, unless directly
related to a specific change in statutory law concerning standards
for REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses. Applications, upon forms
approved by Service Oklahoma, for such licenses shall be handled, in
accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this section, by
the licensed operator; provided, Service Oklahoma is authorized to
assume these duties in any county of this state. Each licensed
operator accepting applications for driver licenses shall receive
Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License
or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or Ten Dollars ($10.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Compliant
Driver License or Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for an 8-year REAL ID
Compliant Driver License to be deducted from the total collected for
each license or renewal application accepted through June 30, 2023.
Beginning July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2023, each motor
license agent or licensed operator accepting applications for driver
licenses for individuals over the age of sixty-five (65) years or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 19

for applications for drivers pursuant to subsection P of this
section shall receive Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year driver
license or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year driver license to
be deducted daily by the motor license agent or licensed operator
receipts. Beginning July 1, 2023, these fees shall be retained by
the licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of
this title. The fees received by the licensed operator, authorized
by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses. The
amount retained pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by
any state agency. The fees received by the licensed operator,
authorized by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses.
For purposes of this subsection, “licensed operator” shall mean an
individual who obtains a license from the Service Oklahoma Operator
Board to operate a designated Service Oklahoma location and offers
third-party fulfillment of designated services to be rendered by
Service Oklahoma.
R. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this title
and subsection Q of this section and except as provided in
subsections H and M of this section, the first Sixty Thousand
Dollars ($60,000.00) of all monies collected pursuant to this
section shall be paid by the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service
Oklahoma to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury.
The next Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) of monies
collected pursuant to this section shall be paid by the Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma to the State Treasurer to be deposited
each fiscal year under the provisions of this section to the credit
of the Department of Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund for the
purpose of the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunications System.
All other monies collected in excess of Five Hundred Sixty Thousand
Dollars ($560,000.00) each fiscal year shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title, except as otherwise provided
in this section.
S. Service Oklahoma shall retain the images displayed on
licenses and identification cards issued pursuant to the provisions
of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title which may be used
only:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 20

1. By a law enforcement agency for purposes of criminal
investigations, missing person investigations or any law enforcement
purpose which is deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Public
Safety;
2. By the driver licensing agency of another state for its
official purpose; and
3. As provided in Section 2-110 of this title.
All agencies approved by the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Telecommunications System (OLETS) or the National Law Enforcement
Telecommunications System (NLETS) to receive photographs or
computerized images may obtain them through OLETS or through NLETS.
Photographs or computerized images may be obtained by law
enforcement one inquiry at a time.
The computer system and related equipment acquired for this
purpose must conform to industry standards for interoperability and
open architecture. The Department of Public Safety may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.
T. No person may hold more than one state-issued or territory-
issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card from Oklahoma or any other state or territory.
Service Oklahoma shall not issue a REAL ID Compliant Driver License
to a person who has been previously issued a REAL ID Compliant
Driver License or REAL ID Compliant Identification Card until such
license or identification card has been surrendered to Service
Oklahoma by the applicant. Service Oklahoma may promulgate rules
related to the issuance of replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses in the event of loss or theft.
U. Beginning May 24, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2023, in
addition to the amounts provided in subsection Q of this section, a
licensed operator shall receive Five Dollars ($5.00) for each
processed application for a REAL ID Compliant 4-year Driver License
and Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each processed application for a REAL
ID Compliant 8-year Driver License. Any additional amounts provided
pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by Service
Oklahoma.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 21

SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-114, as
last amended by Section 7, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-114), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-114. A. 1. In the event that a driver license is
lost, destroyed, or requires the updating of any information,
restriction or endorsement displayed thereon, the person to whom
such license was issued may obtain a replacement thereof pursuant to
the provisions of subsection G of Section 6-101 of this title, and
upon payment of the required fee. If the person is an alien, the
person shall appear before Service Oklahoma or a licensed operator
and, after furnishing proof of identity as required in this section,
shall be issued a replacement driver license for a period which does
not exceed the lesser of:
a. the expiration date of the license being replaced, or
b. the expiration date on the valid documentation
authorizing the presence of the person in the United
States, as required by paragraph 9 of subsection A of
Section 6-103 of this title.
2. The cost of a replacement license shall be Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00), of which shall be apportioned and credited by
Service Oklahoma as follows:
a. Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be apportioned as provided
in Section 1104 of this title,
b. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer to be credited to the General Revenue Fund
of the State Treasury,
c. Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be credited to the
Department of Public Safety Computer Imaging System
Revolving Fund to be used solely for the purpose of
administering and maintaining the computer imaging
system of the Department through October 31, 2022.
Beginning November 1, 2022, Five Dollars ($5.00) shall
be credited to the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging
System Revolving Fund to be used solely for the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 22

purpose of administering and maintaining the computer
imaging system of Service Oklahoma,
d. Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be credited to the
Revolving Fund of the Department of Public Safety
through October 31, 2022. Beginning November 1, 2022,
the Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be credited to the
Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund,
e. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be deposited credited to
the State Public Safety Fund created in Section 2-147
of this title, and
f. (1) Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this
paragraph related to the replacement of a driver
license by a licensed operator that does not
process approved applications or renewals for
REAL ID Compliant Driver Licenses or
Identification Cards shall be deposited credited,
in addition to the amount authorized by
subparagraph e of this paragraph, to the State
Public Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of
this title, or
(2) Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this
paragraph related to the replacement of a driver
license by a licensed operator that does process
approved applications or renewals for REAL ID
Compliant Driver Licenses or Identification Cards
shall be retained by the licensed operator
through June 30, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2023,
these monies shall be retained by the licensed
operator pursuant to subsection E of Section
1141.1 of this title.
3. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules prescribing forms of
primary and secondary identification acceptable for replacement of
an Oklahoma driver license; provided, however, a valid and unexpired
U.S. passport shall be acceptable as both primary and secondary
identification.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 23

B. Any person desiring to add or remove an endorsement or
endorsements or a restriction or restrictions to any existing driver
license, when authorized by Service Oklahoma, shall obtain a
replacement license with the endorsement or endorsements or the
restriction or restrictions change thereon and shall be charged the
fee for a replacement license as provided in subsection A of this
section.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-117, as
last amended by Section 8, Chapter 47, 1st Extraordinary Session,
O.S.L. 2023 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 6-117), is amended to read
as follows:
Section 6-117. A. Service Oklahoma shall file every
application for a driver license or identification card received by
Service Oklahoma and shall maintain suitable indexes containing:
1. All applications denied and on each thereof note the reasons
for the denial;
2. All applications granted;
3. The name of every person whose driving privilege has been
suspended, revoked, canceled, or disqualified by Service Oklahoma
and after each such name note the reasons for the action. Any
notation of suspension of the driving privilege of a person for
reason of nonpayment of a fine shall be removed from the driving
record after the person has paid the fine and the driving privilege
of the person is reinstated as provided for by law;
4. The county of residence, the name, date of birth, and
mailing address of each person residing in that county who is
eighteen (18) years of age or older, and who is the holder of a
current driver license or a current identification card issued by
Service Oklahoma for the purpose of ascertaining names of all
persons qualified for jury service as required by Section 18 of
Title 38 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
5. The name, driver license number, and mailing address of
every person for the purpose of giving notice, if necessary, as
required by Section 2-116 of this title.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 24

B. Service Oklahoma shall file all collision reports and
abstracts of court records of convictions received by it pursuant to
the laws of this state and maintain convenient records of the
records and reports or make suitable notations in order that an
individual record of a person showing the convictions of the person
and the traffic collisions in which the person has been involved
shall be readily ascertainable and available for the consideration
of Service Oklahoma upon any application for a driver license or
renewal of a driver license and at other suitable times. Any
abstract, index or other entry relating to a driving record
according to the licensing authority in another state or a province
of Canada may be posted upon the driving record of any resident of
this state when notice thereof is received by documentation or by
electronic transmission. The individual record of a person shall
not include any collision reports and abstracts of court records
involving a collision in which the person was not issued a citation
or if a citation is issued and the person was not convicted.
C. 1. Service Oklahoma may designate and is hereby authorized
to prepare under the seal of Service Oklahoma and deliver upon
request a copy of any collision report on file with the Department
of Public Safety, charging a fee of:
a. beginning on July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013,
Fifteen Dollars ($15.00), of which Eight Dollars
($8.00) shall be deposited by the Commissioner of
Public Safety to the credit of the Department of
Public Safety Revolving Fund and, in addition to other
purposes authorized by law, the expenditures from that
fund of monies derived from the Eight Dollars ($8.00)
pursuant to this subparagraph shall be used to fund
any Oklahoma Highway Patrol Trooper Academy academy
provided by the Department of Public Safety. Any
remaining funds shall be deposited in an account to be
utilized exclusively for future expenses directly
related to the operation of an Oklahoma Highway Patrol
Academy academy, and
b. beginning on July 1, 2013, and any year thereafter,
Seven Dollars ($7.00).
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 25

However, Service Oklahoma shall not be required to furnish
personal information from the collision report which is contrary to
the provisions of the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act, 18 United
States Code U.S.C., Sections 2721 through 2725.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph 1 of this
subsection, Service Oklahoma is authorized to enter into contracts
to supply information regarding vehicles reported to be involved in
collisions. For each vehicle, the information shall be limited to
that which only describes the vehicle and the collision. Service
Oklahoma shall not be required to provide any information regarding
the owner or operator of the vehicle or any information which would
conflict with Section 2-110 or Section 1109 of this title.
D. Service Oklahoma or any licensed operator upon request shall
prepare and furnish to any authorized person a Motor Vehicle Report
of any person subject to the provisions of the motor vehicle laws of
this state. However, Service Oklahoma shall not be required to
furnish personal information from a driving record contrary to the
provisions of the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 United
States Code U.S.C., Sections 2721 through 2725. The Motor Vehicle
Report shall be a summary of the driving record of the person and
shall include the enumeration of any motor vehicle collisions,
reference to convictions for violations of motor vehicle laws, and
any action taken against the privilege of the person to operate a
motor vehicle, as shown by the files of Service Oklahoma for the
three (3) years preceding the date of the request. The Motor
Vehicle Report, to include any record or information associated with
the Motor Vehicle Report, shall not be deemed a “public civil
record” public civil record as defined provided in Section 18 of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and shall not be subject to
expungement. Service Oklahoma shall not be required to release to
any person, in whole or in part and in any format, a driving index,
as described in subsection A of this section, except as otherwise
provided for by law. For each Motor Vehicle Report furnished by
Service Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall collect the sum of Twenty-
five Dollars ($25.00), Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of which shall be
deposited in the General Revenue Fund and Five Dollars ($5.00) shall
be deposited in the Department of Public Safety Revolving Fund
through October 31, 2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, the Five
Dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Revolving
Fund. For each Motor Vehicle Report furnished by a licensed
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 26

operator, the licensed operator shall collect the sum of Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00), Eighteen Dollars ($18.00) of which shall be paid
to the Oklahoma Tax Commission for deposit in the General Revenue
Fund in of the State Treasury, Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be
deposited in the Department of Public Safety Revolving Fund and Two
Dollars ($2.00) of which shall be retained by the licensed operator
through October 31, 2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, for each
Motor Vehicle Report furnished by a licensed operator, the licensed
operator shall collect the sum of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00),
Eighteen Dollars ($18.00) of which shall be paid to the Oklahoma Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma for deposit in the General Revenue Fund
in of the State Treasury, Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited in
the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund, and Two Dollars ($2.00) shall
be retained by the licensed operator through June 30, 2025.
Beginning July 1, 2025, Eighteen Dollars ($18.00) of the fee shall
be paid to the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma for deposit
in the General Revenue Fund in of the State Treasury, Five Dollars
($5.00) shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund,
and Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be retained by the licensed operator
pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this title. Persons
sixty-five (65) years of age or older shall not be required to pay a
fee for their own Motor Vehicle Report furnished by Service Oklahoma
or a licensed operator. For purposes of this subsection, a Motor
Vehicle Report shall include a report which indicates that no
driving record is on file with Service Oklahoma for the information
received by Service Oklahoma in the request for the Motor Vehicle
Report.
E. Service Oklahoma may develop procedures whereby an acting
agent of an employer or an employer of a person:
1. Who has a Class A, B, C or D driver license; and
2. Who operates a commercial, company-owned or personal motor
vehicle during the course of business in the course of his or her
employment with the employer, may automatically be notified,
pursuant to a fee schedule established by Service Oklahoma, should
the driving record of a person reflect a traffic conviction in any
court or an administrative action by Service Oklahoma which alters
the status of the commercial driving privileges of the person, or
any other change to the driving status. The notification system
shall include electronic delivery of a Motor Vehicle Report at least
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 27

annually for any employee who is a commercial driver licensee or who
operates a commercial motor vehicle, as required by 49 C.F.R.,
Section 391.25, or who operates a company-owned or personal motor
vehicle during the course of business. All monies received by the
Commissioner of Public Safety and the officers and employees of the
Department pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the
Department of Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund through
October 31, 2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, all monies received
by the Director of Service Oklahoma and the officers and employees
of Service Oklahoma pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited
in the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund. For each Motor Vehicle
Report furnished by Service Oklahoma, through the electronic
notification system, Service Oklahoma shall collect the sum of
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), Eighteen Dollars ($18.00) of which
shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund in of the State
Treasury. Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited in the Department
of Public Safety Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning
November 1, 2022, for each Motor Vehicle Report furnished by Service
Oklahoma, through the electronic notification system, Service
Oklahoma shall collect the sum of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00),
Eighteen Dollars ($18.00) of which shall be deposited in the General
Revenue Fund in of the State Treasury, and Five Dollars ($5.00)
shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund. Two
Dollars ($2.00) shall be retained by Service Oklahoma or its
authorized agent for the purpose of development and maintenance of
the electronic notification system.
F. Service Oklahoma is authorized to establish a procedure for
reviewing the driving records of state residents who are existing
policyholders of any insurance company licensed to operate in this
state during specified periods of time and producing a report which
identifies the policyholders which have had violation and/or status
changes to their driving records during such time period. Service
Oklahoma may sell such report to the insurance company or its agent
at a fee to be set by Service Oklahoma. Any such report sold by
Service Oklahoma shall only consist of information otherwise
lawfully obtainable by the insurance company or its agent. The fee
shall be sufficient to recover all costs incurred by Service
Oklahoma and ensure that there will be no net revenue loss to the
state. Such fee shall be deposited in the Department of Public
Safety Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning November
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 28

1, 2022, such fee shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma
Revolving Fund.
G. All monies received by the Commissioner of Public Safety or
Service Oklahoma and the officers and employees of the Department
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited to the
General Revenue Fund in of the State Treasury except as otherwise
provided for by law.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-116, as
amended by Section 9, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 14-116), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-116. A. The Executive Director of the Department of
Transportation shall charge a minimum permit fee of Forty Dollars
($40.00) for any permit issued pursuant to the provisions of Section
14-101 et seq. of this title. In addition to the permit fee, the
Executive Director of the Department of Transportation shall charge
a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each thousand pounds in excess of
the legal load limit. The Executive Director of the Department of
Transportation shall establish any necessary rules for collecting
the fees.
B. The Department of Transportation is authorized to establish
an escrow account system for the payment of permit fees. Authorized
motor carriers meeting established credit requirements may
participate in the escrow account system for permits purchased from
all size and weight permit offices in this state. Carriers not
choosing to participate in the escrow account system shall be
required to make payment of the required fee or fees upon purchase
of each permit as required by law. All monies collected through the
escrow account system shall be deposited to a special account of the
Department of Transportation and placed in the custody of the State
Treasurer. Proceeds from permits purchased using the escrow account
system shall be distributed as provided for in subsection H of this
section. However, fees collected through such accounts for the
electronic transmission, transfer or delivery of permits, as
provided for in Section 14-118 of this title, shall be credited to
the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund established pursuant to
Section 1167 of this title.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 29

C. 1. Application for permits shall be made a reasonable time
in advance of the expected time of movement of such vehicles. For
emergencies affecting the health or safety of persons or a
community, permits may be issued for immediate movement.
2. Size and weight permit offices in all districts where
applicable shall issue permits to authorize carriers by telephone
during weekdays.
D. No overweight permit shall be valid until all license taxes
due the State of Oklahoma have been paid.
E. No permit violation shall be deemed to have occurred when an
oversize or overweight movement is made pursuant to a permit whose
stated weight or size exceeds the actual load.
F. Any permit issued for a truck or truck-tractor operating in
combination with a trailer or a semitrailer shall contain only the
license plate number for the truck or truck-tractor if the permittee
provides to the Department of Transportation a list containing the
license plate number, and such other information as the Department
of Transportation may prescribe by rule, for each trailer or
semitrailer which may be used for movement with the permit. When
the permittee provides the list described in this subsection, the
license plate number for any trailer or semitrailer to be moved with
the permit shall not be included on the permit; provided, a trailer
or semitrailer which is not on the list shall not be authorized to
be used for movement with the permit. It shall be the
responsibility of the permittee to ensure the list provided to the
Department of Transportation is maintained and updated with any
fleet changes. The Department of Transportation shall adopt any
rules deemed necessary to administer the provisions of this
subsection.
G. The first deliverer of motor vehicles designated truck
carriers or well service carriers manufactured in Oklahoma shall not
be required to purchase an overweight permit when being delivered to
the first purchaser.
H. Except as provided in Section 14-122 of this title, the
first One Million Two Hundred Sixteen Thousand Dollars
($1,216,000.00) of proceeds from both the permit fees and the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 30

overweight permit fees imposed pursuant to subsection A of this
section collected monthly shall be apportioned by Service Oklahoma
as provided in Section 1104 of this title. For the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2022, and all subsequent years, the next Two
Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) of proceeds
from both the permit fees and the overweight permit fees imposed
pursuant to subsection A of this section collected monthly shall be
remitted to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of
staffing the port of entry weigh stations with Department of Public
Safety port of entry officers whose powers and duties shall be
specified by the Department of Public Safety through the
promulgation of rules. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017,
and all subsequent years, all proceeds collected from both the
permit fees and the overweight permit fees imposed pursuant to
subsection A of this section in excess of Three Million Seven
Hundred Sixteen Thousand Dollars ($3,716,000.00) shall be deposited
in the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund as provided in
Section 1167 of this title for the purpose set forth in that section
and may be used for motor carrier permitting systems and motor
carrier safety and enforcement.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104, as
last amended by Section 62, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1104), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1104. A. Unless otherwise provided by law, all fees,
taxes and penalties collected or received pursuant to the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act or Section 1-101 et seq. of
this title shall be apportioned and distributed monthly by the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma in accordance with this
section. Service Oklahoma shall provide to the Oklahoma Tax
Commission monthly reports of motor vehicle collection information,
including, but not limited to, motor vehicle monthly apportionment
information, refunds, canceled vouchers, waste tire collections,
organ donor program amounts, driver license records, prorate
amounts, and sales tax amounts. The reports shall be delivered
electronically pursuant to the current calendar year apportionment
disbursement schedule provided to Service Oklahoma by the Oklahoma
Tax Commission on or before December 1st annually.
One percent (1%) of fees collected shall be apportioned to the
Licensed Operator Performance Fund created in Section 3-106 of this
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 31

title, in accordance with the applicable metrics determined by
Service Oklahoma.
B. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various
school districts in accordance with paragraph 2 of this subsection:
a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, thirty-five
and forty-six one-hundredths percent (35.46%),
b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June
30, 2002, thirty-five and ninety-one one-hundredths
percent (35.91%),
c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year
ending on June 30, 2015, thirty-six and twenty one-
hundredths percent (36.20%),
d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year
ending on June 30, 2019, thirty-six and twenty one-
hundredths percent (36.20%), but in no event shall the
amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund, and
e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all
subsequent years, thirty-six and twenty one-hundredths
percent (36.20%), but in no event shall the amount
apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e
of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned to the
various school districts so that each district shall receive an
amount based upon the proportion that each district’s average daily
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 32

attendance bears to the total average daily attendance of those
districts entitled to receive funds pursuant to this section as
certified by the State Department of Education.
Each district’s allocation of funds shall be remitted to the
county treasurer of the county wherein the administrative
headquarters of the district are located.
No district shall be eligible for the funds herein provided
unless the district makes an ad valorem tax levy of fifteen (15)
mills and maintains nine (9) years of instruction and pursuant to
the rules of the State Board of Education, is authorized to maintain
ten (10) years of instruction.
C. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer to be credited to the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury:
1. From October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, forty-five and
ninety-seven one-hundredths percent (45.97%);
2. For the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30,
2002, forty-five and twenty-nine one-hundredths percent (45.29%);
3. For the year beginning July 1, 2002, and for the subsequent
fiscal years ending June 30, 2007, forty-four and eighty-four one-
hundredths percent (44.84%);
4. For the year beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June 30,
2008, thirty-nine and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (39.84%);
5. For the year beginning July 1, 2008, and ending June 30,
2009, thirty-four and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (34.84%);
6. For the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending December
31, 2012, twenty-nine and eighty-four one-hundredths percent
(29.84%);
7. For the period beginning January 1, 2013, and ending June
30, 2013, twenty-nine and thirty-four one-hundredths percent
(29.34%);
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 33

8. For the year beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30,
2014, twenty-six and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (26.84%);
and
9. For the year beginning July 1, 2014, through the year ending
June 30, 2019, twenty-four and eighty-four one-hundredths percent
(24.84%).
D. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer to be credited to the State Transportation Fund:
1. From October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, thirty one-
hundredths percent (0.30%);
2. For the year beginning July 1, 2001, through the year ending
on June 30, 2015, thirty-one one-hundredths percent (0.31%);
3. For the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year ending
on June 30, 2019, thirty-one one-hundredths percent (0.31%), but in
no event shall the amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to
this paragraph exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal
year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess of such
limitation shall be placed to the credit of the General Revenue
Fund; and
4. For the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all subsequent
years, thirty-one one-hundredths percent (0.31%), but in no event
shall the amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
paragraph exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal year
ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess of such limitation
shall be placed to the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and
Driver Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
E. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various
counties as set forth in paragraph 2 of this subsection:
a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, seven and
nine one-hundredths percent (7.09%),
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 34

b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June
30, 2002, seven and eighteen one-hundredths percent
(7.18%),
c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year
ending on June 30, 2015, seven and twenty-four one-
hundredths percent (7.24%),
d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year
ending on June 30, 2019, seven and twenty-four one-
hundredths percent (7.24%), but in no event shall the
amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund, and
e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all
subsequent years, seven and twenty-four one-hundredths
percent (7.24%), but in no event shall the amount
apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e
of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned as follows:
forty percent (40%) of such sum shall be distributed to the various
counties in that proportion which the county road mileage of each
county bears to the entire state road mileage as certified by the
Transportation Commission and the remaining sixty percent (60%) of
such sum shall be distributed to the various counties on the basis
which the population and area of each county bears to the total
population and area of the state. The population shall be as shown
by the last Federal Decennial Census or the most recent annual
estimate provided by the United States Bureau of the Census. The
funds shall be used for the purpose of constructing and maintaining
county highways; provided, however, the county treasurer may deposit
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 35

so much of the funds in the sinking fund as may be necessary for the
retirement of interest and annual accrual of indebtedness created by
the issuance of county or township bonds for road purposes. Such
deposits to the sinking fund shall not exceed forty percent (40%) of
the funds allocated to a county pursuant to this paragraph.
F. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the county
treasurers of the respective counties and by them deposited in a
separate special revenue fund to be used by the county commissioners
in accordance with paragraph 2 of this subsection:
a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, two and
fifty-three one-hundredths percent (2.53%),
b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June
30, 2002, two and fifty-six one-hundredths percent
(2.56%),
c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year
ending on June 30, 2015, two and fifty-nine one-
hundredths percent (2.59%),
d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year
ending on June 30, 2019, two and fifty-nine one-
hundredths percent (2.59%), but in no event shall the
amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund, and
e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all
subsequent years, two and fifty-nine one-hundredths
percent (2.59%), but in no event shall the amount
apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 36

2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e
of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be used for the primary
purpose of matching federal funds for the construction of federal
aid projects on county roads, or constructing and maintaining county
or township highways and permanent bridges of such counties. The
distribution of monies apportioned by this paragraph shall be made
upon the basis of the current formula based upon road mileage, area
and population as related to county road improvement and maintenance
costs. Provided, however, the Department of Transportation may
update the formula factors from time to time as necessary to account
for changing conditions.
G. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be transmitted by the Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma to the various counties as set forth in
paragraph 2 of this subsection:
a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, three and
fifty-five one-hundredths percent (3.55%),
b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June
30, 2002, three and fifty-nine one-hundredths percent
(3.59%),
c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year
ending on June 30, 2015, three and sixty-two one-
hundredths percent (3.62%),
d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year
ending on June 30, 2019, three and sixty-two one-
hundredths percent (3.62%), but in no event shall the
amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund, and
e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all
subsequent years, three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent (3.62%), but in no event shall the amount
apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 37

subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e
of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be transmitted to the
various counties on the basis of a formula to be developed by the
Department of Transportation. Such formula shall be similar to that
currently used for the distribution of County Bridge Program Funds,
but also taking into consideration the effect of terrain and traffic
volume as related to county road improvement and maintenance costs.
Provided, however, the Department of Transportation may update the
formula factors from time to time as necessary to account for
changing conditions. The funds shall be transmitted to the various
county treasurers to be deposited in the county highway fund of
their respective counties.
H. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various
counties as set forth in paragraph 2 of this subsection:
a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, eighty-one
one-hundredths percent (0.81%),
b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June
30, 2002, eighty-two one-hundredths percent (0.82%),
c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year
ending on June 30, 2015, eighty-three one-hundredths
percent (0.83%),
d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year
ending on June 30, 2019, eighty-three one-hundredths
percent (0.83%), but in no event shall the amount
apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 38

e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all
subsequent years, eighty-three one-hundredths percent
(0.83%), but in no event shall the amount apportioned
in any fiscal year pursuant to this subparagraph
exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal
year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess
of such limitation shall be placed to the credit of
the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund
created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e
of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned to the
various counties based upon the proportion that each county’s
population bears to the total state population.
Each county’s allocation of funds shall be remitted to the
various county treasurers to be deposited in the general fund of the
county and used for the support of county government.
I. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various
cities and incorporated towns as set forth in paragraph 2 of this
subsection:
a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, three and
four one-hundredths percent (3.04%),
b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June
30, 2002, three and eight one-hundredths percent
(3.08%),
c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year
ending on June 30, 2015, three and ten one-hundredths
percent (3.10%),
d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year
ending on June 30, 2019, three and ten one-hundredths
percent (3.10%), but in no event shall the amount
apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 39

the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts
in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund, and
e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all
subsequent years, three and ten one-hundredths percent
(3.10%), but in no event shall the amount apportioned
in any fiscal year pursuant to this subparagraph
exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal
year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess
of such limitation shall be placed to the credit of
the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund
created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e
of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned to the
various cities and incorporated towns based upon the proportion that
each city or incorporated town’s population bears to the total
population of all cities and incorporated towns in the state. Such
funds shall be remitted to the various county treasurers for
allocation to the various cities and incorporated towns. All such
funds shall be used for the construction, maintenance, repair,
improvement and lighting of streets and alleys. Provided, however,
the governing board of any city or town may, with the approval of
the county excise board, transfer any surplus funds to the general
revenue fund of such city or town whenever an emergency requires
such a transfer.
J. The following percentages of the monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer to be credited to the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement
Fund:
1. From October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, one and twenty-
two one-hundredths percent (1.22%);
2. For the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30,
2002, one and twenty-three one-hundredths percent (1.23%); and
3. For the year beginning July 1, 2002, and all subsequent
years, one and twenty-four one-hundredths percent (1.24%).
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 40

K. Three one-hundredths of one percent (3/100 of 1%) of the
monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer to be credited to the Wildlife Conservation
Fund. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the funds shall be used for
fish habitat restoration and twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds
shall be used in the fish hatchery system for fish production.
L. 1. For the year beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June 30,
2008, five percent (5%) of monies referred to in subsection A of
this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited
to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as created in
Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. For the year beginning July 1, 2008, and ending June 30,
2009, ten percent (10%) of monies referred to in subsection A of
this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited
to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as created in
Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
3. For the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending December
31, 2012, fifteen percent (15%) of monies referred to in subsection
A of this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be
credited to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as
created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
4. For the period beginning January 1, 2013, and ending June
30, 2013, fifteen and fifty one-hundredths percent (15.50%) of
monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer to be credited to the County Improvements for
Roads and Bridges Fund as created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
5. For the year beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30,
2014, eighteen percent (18%) of monies referred to in subsection A
of this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be
credited to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as
created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
6. For the year beginning July 1, 2014, twenty percent (20%) of
monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer to be credited to the County Improvements for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 41

Roads and Bridges Fund as created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
7. For the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year ending
on June 30, 2019, twenty percent (20%) of monies referred to in
subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer to be credited to the County Improvements for Roads and
Bridges Fund as created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, but in no event shall the total amount apportioned in any
fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph exceed One Hundred Twenty
Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00). Any amounts in excess of One
Hundred Twenty Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00) shall be placed to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund.
8. a. Except as provided in subparagraph b of this
paragraph, for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and
all subsequent years, twenty percent (20%) of monies
referred to in subsection A of this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited to the
County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as
created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, but in no event shall the total amount
apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this
paragraph exceed the fiscal year limitations provided
in subparagraph c of this paragraph. Any amounts in
excess of the fiscal year limitations provided in
subparagraph c of this paragraph shall be placed to
the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and
Driver Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69
of the Oklahoma Statutes,.
b. (1) for For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2021,
through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
Oklahoma Tax Commission shall remit twenty-five
percent (25%) of the monthly allocation,
otherwise scheduled to be credited to the County
Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund, to the
various counties of the state. The Commission
shall distribute such funds monthly to each
county treasurer as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 42

(a) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be
distributed to the various counties in the
proportion which the area of each county
bears to the total area of the state,
(b) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be
distributed to the various counties in the
proportion which the certified county road
miles of each county bear to the total sum
of county road miles in the state, and
(c) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be
distributed to the various counties in the
proportion which the total replacement cost
for obsolete or deficient bridges according
to the most recent ODOT yearly Bridge
Summary Report for County Bridges for each
county bears to the total amount of such
cost for all such county bridges in the
state, and
(2) for For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026,
and all subsequent fiscal years thereafter, the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma shall
remit twenty-five percent (25%) of the monthly
allocation, otherwise scheduled to be credited to
the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges
Fund, to the various counties of the state. The
Commission Service Oklahoma shall distribute such
funds monthly to each county treasurer as
follows:
(a) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be
distributed to the various counties in the
proportion which the area of each county
bears to the total area of the state,
(b) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be
distributed to the various counties in the
proportion which the certified county road
miles of each county bear to the total sum
of county road miles in the state, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 43

(c) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be
distributed to the various counties in the
proportion which the number of county
bridges in each county according to the ODOT
2020 Bridge Summary Report for County
Bridges bears to the total sum of county
bridges in the state according to such
report.
Each county treasurer shall deposit such funds to the
county’s county highway fund and such funds shall be used
for maintenance and operations. In no event shall the
total amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to the
provisions of subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph
exceed the fiscal year limitations provided in subparagraph
c of this paragraph, and.
c. the The total amount apportioned each fiscal year
pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited as
follows:
(1) for fiscal years 2020
through 2022 $120,000,000.00,
(2) for fiscal year 2023 $125,000,000.00,
(3) for fiscal year 2024 $130,000,000.00,
(4) for fiscal year 2025 $135,000,000.00,
(5) for fiscal year 2026 $140,000,000.00,
(6) for fiscal year 2027 $145,000,000.00,
(7) for fiscal year 2028 and all
subsequent fiscal years
thereafter $150,000,000.00.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 44

M. Twenty-four and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (24.84%)
of the monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited to the Rebuilding
Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of
Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
N. Monies allocated to counties by this section may be
estimated by the county excise board in the budget for the county as
anticipated revenue to the extent of ninety percent (90%) of the
previous year’s income from such source; provided, not more than
fifteen percent (15%) can be encumbered during any month.
O. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, the first One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) of the monies collected or received
by the Tax Commission pursuant to the registration of motorcycles
and mopeds in this state shall be placed to the credit of the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Revolving Fund. Beginning January 1, 2023,
the first One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) of the monies
collected or received by Service Oklahoma pursuant to the
registration of motorcycles and mopeds in this state shall be placed
to the credit of the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.1, as
amended by Section 108, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1104.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.1. A. Twenty-three Dollars ($23.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for university or college
supporter license plates which are received each year by Service
Oklahoma or its licensed operators and transferred to the Oklahoma
Tax Commission shall be apportioned as follows:
1. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee for each license plate
designating a particular state university or college shall be
apportioned to the particular state university or college so
designated on the license plate. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
for each license plate designating a particular private university
or college shall be apportioned to the particular private university
or college so designated on the license plate and may be used by the
private university or college as compensation for use of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 45

symbols, words, or letters authorized by the private university or
college for use on the license plate; and
2. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be deposited to the Adaptive
Grant Program for Oklahomans with Intellectual Disabilities
Revolving Fund created by this section to be used for educational
purposes.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Department of Human Services to be designated the
“Adaptive Grant Program for Oklahomans with Intellectual
Disabilities Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund,
not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all
funds deposited therein pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 2 of
subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to the credit of
the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by
the Department of Human Services for the administration of the
Adaptive Grant Program for Oklahomans with Intellectual
Disabilities.
C. The Director of the Department of Human Services is hereby
directed to promulgate rules to create the Adaptive Grant Program
for Oklahomans with Intellectual Disabilities Program to provide
financial assistance in adaptation of furnishings, fixtures,
vehicles, equipment or structures in order to meet any special needs
of Oklahomans with intellectual disabilities; provided, recipients
of grants awarded pursuant to the program shall be limited to those
programs, projects or persons not otherwise qualifying for state or
federal funding. The Department of Human Services is authorized to
contract with a statewide private, nonprofit foundation certified to
be a 501(c)(3) organization by the Internal Revenue Service for
administration of the program.
D. The Director of Human Services shall prepare an annual
report on the Program. Such report shall be submitted to the
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.2, as
amended by Section 109, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1104.2), is amended to read as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 46

Section 1104.2. A. Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for environmental
awareness license plates which are received each year by Service
Oklahoma or its licensed operators and transferred to the Oklahoma
Tax Commission shall be deposited to the Environmental Education
Revolving Fund created by this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Department of Environmental Quality to be designated
the “Environmental Education Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all funds deposited therein pursuant to the provisions of
subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to the credit of
said such fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Department of Environmental Quality for
environmental education programs.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.3. A. Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Agricultural
Awareness license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to
the Ag in the Classroom Education Revolving Fund created in
subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Agriculture to be designated the
“Ag in the Classroom Education Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the Department pursuant to the
provisions of subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to
the credit of such fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the Department for the purpose of Ag in the
Classroom Education Program. Expenditures from the fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.4, is
amended to read as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 47

Section 1104.4. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Four-H license plates
shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the OSU Extension Service
License Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this
section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for Oklahoma State University Extension Service to be
designated the “OSU Extension Service License Plate Revolving Fund”.
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Oklahoma State University Extension Service pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1135.5 of this title. All monies accruing to
the credit of said such fund are hereby appropriated and may be
budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma State University Extension
Service for the purpose of expenses related to agricultural programs
for youth. Expenditures from said such fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.5, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.5. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Urban Forestry and
Beautification license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma
to the Urban Forestry and Beautification Revolving Fund created in
subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Forestry Division of the State Department of
Agriculture to be designated “Urban Forestry and Beautification
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Department pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 1 of
subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to the credit of
the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by
the Division for the purpose of contracting with or providing grants
to nonprofit organizations that develop and operate programs to
encourage urban forestry and beautification. Such organizations may
apply to the Department for grants to be paid from the fund, or the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 48

Department may solicit bids for contracts for particular services
related to urban forestry and beautification to be paid from the
fund. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued
by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law
with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.6. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 14 of this act 1135.5 of this title for Choose
Life license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the
Choose Life Assistance Program created in subsection B of this
section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Department of Human Services to be designated the
Choose Life Assistance Program. The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all the monies received by the Department of Human Services pursuant
to the provisions of Section 14 of this act 1135.5 of this title.
All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are appropriated and
shall be distributed at the beginning of each fiscal year in a pro
rata share to all nonprofit organizations that provide services to
the community that include counseling and meeting the physical needs
of pregnant women who are committed to placing their children for
adoption. Any unused funds in excess of ten percent (10%) of the
funds allocated to a nonprofit organization shall be returned to the
Choose Life Assistance Program Revolving Fund at the end of the
fiscal year to be aggregated and distributed with the next fiscal
year distribution.
C. To apply for and receive the funds available through the
Choose Life Assistance Program, an organization must deliver to the
Department of Human Services an affidavit signed by a duly appointed
representative of the organization that states the following:
1. The organization is a nonprofit organization;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 49

2. The organization does not discriminate for any reason,
including, but not limited to, race, marital status, gender,
religion, national origin, handicap or age;
3. The organization counsels pregnant women who are committed
to placing their children for adoption;
4. The organization is not involved or associated with any
abortion activities, including counseling for or referrals to
abortion clinics, providing medical abortion-related procedures, or
pro-abortion advertising;
5. The organization does not charge women for any services
received;
6. The organization understands that sixty percent (60%) of the
funds received by an organization can only be used to provide for
the material needs of pregnant women who are committed to placing
their children for adoption, including clothing, housing, medical
care, food, utilities, and transportation. Such funds may also be
expended on infants awaiting placement with adoptive parents. Forty
percent (40%) of the funds may be used for adoption, counseling,
training, or advertising, but may not be used for administrative
expenses, legal expenses, or capital expenditures.;
7. The organization understands that no funds may be used for
administrative expenses, legal expenses, or capital expenditures;
8. The organization understands that any unused funds at the
end of the fiscal year that exceed ten percent (10%) of the funds
received by the organization during the fiscal year must be returned
to the Choose Life Assistance Program Revolving Fund to be
aggregated and distributed with the next fiscal year distribution;
and
9. The organization understands that each organization that
receives such funds must submit to an annual audit of such funds
verifying that the funds received were used in the manner prescribed
by statute.
D. Funds may not be distributed to any organization that is
involved or associated with abortion activities, including
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 50

counseling for or referral to abortion clinics, providing medical
abortion–related procedures, or pro-abortion advertising, and funds
may not be distributed to any organization that charges women for
services received.
E. Sixty percent (60%) of the funds received by an organization
can only be used to provide for the material needs of pregnant women
who are committed to placing their children for adoption, including
clothing, housing, medical care, food, utilities, and
transportation. Such funds may also be expended on infants awaiting
placement with adoptive parents. Forty percent (40%) of the funds
may be used for adoption, counseling, training, or advertising, but
may not be used for administrative expenses, legal expenses, or
capital expenditures.
F. Each organization that receives funds must submit to an
annual audit of such funds verifying that the funds received were
used in the manner prescribed in this section.
SECTION 14. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.7. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Future Farmers of
America license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the
Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education Agriculture
Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education
to be designated the “Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education Agriculture Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the Department pursuant to the
provisions of subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the Department for the purpose of funding programs
and services to encourage students to consider agriculture as a
career choice. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 51

SECTION 15. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.8. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Color Oklahoma
license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the Color
Oklahoma Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Native Plant Society to be designated the
“Color Oklahoma Revolving Fund” and administered by the Oklahoma
Department of Tourism and Recreation. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Department of Tourism
and Recreation pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this
section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Department of Tourism and Recreation pursuant to a contract with the
Oklahoma Native Plant Society for the purpose of preserving and
planting wildflowers and native plants in Oklahoma and promoting
wildflower heritage through education. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 16. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.9. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Fight Cancer license
plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the Oklahoma
Central Cancer Registry Revolving Fund created in subsection B of
this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Health to be designated the
“Oklahoma Central Cancer Registry Revolving Fund”. The fund shall
be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Health pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this section.
All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 52

appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Health for the implementation of the Oklahoma Central
Cancer Registry. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 17. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.10, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.10. A. The fee authorized by Section 1135.5 of
this title shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the Animal
Friendly Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
to be designated the “Animal Friendly Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Department pursuant
to the provisions of subsection A of this section. All monies
accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture,
Food, and Forestry for the purpose of contracting with or providing
grants to organizations of veterinary clinics that develop and
operate programs that provide dog or cat spaying and neutering
services and nonprofit organizations that provide shelter to
unwanted stray dogs and cats. Such organizations may apply to the
Department for grants to be paid from the fund. Expenditures from
the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 18. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.11, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.11. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for the Patriot License
Plate shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Patriot License
Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 53

B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Military Department of Oklahoma to be designated the
“Patriot License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the Military Department of
Oklahoma pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this section.
All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Military
Department of Oklahoma for any deployment-related purpose for
members of the Oklahoma National Guard or the production of
historical documents, displays, videos, and books that capture the
National Guard’s involvement in overseas deployments and domestic
operations within the United States for members of the Oklahoma
National Guard, Oklahoma public school libraries, and civic leaders,
as determined by the Adjutant General. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 19. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.12, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.12. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for the Oklahoma Quarter
Horse License Plate shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the
Oklahoma Quarter Horse Revolving Fund created in subsection B of
this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission to be designated the
“Oklahoma Quarter Horse Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Horse Racing
Commission pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this
section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma Horse
Racing Commission for the support of any statewide organization
dedicated to promoting the American Quarter Horse in Oklahoma
through sharing information, events, and activities for the amateur,
youth, and professional horsemen. Expenditures from the fund shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 54

filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 20. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.13, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.13. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Oklahoma City Zoo
license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the
Oklahoma Zoological Society Revolving Fund created in subsection B
of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Department of Wildlife Conservation to be designated
the “Oklahoma Zoological Society Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be
a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received by the Department of Wildlife
Conservation pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this
section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Department of
Wildlife Conservation for grants to the Oklahoma Zoological Society
for the purpose of contributing to an understanding and preservation
of the earth’s natural resources through positive recreational and
educational experiences and conducting and participating in
scientifically-based conservation programs that benefit animal and
plant communities. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 21. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.14, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.14. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for the Oklahoma March of
Dimes license plate shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the
Oklahoma Prevent Birth Defects, Premature Birth and Infant Mortality
Fund established in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund to be designated the “Oklahoma Prevent Birth Defects, Premature
Birth and Infant Mortality Fund” and administered by the State
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 55

Department of Health. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all the
monies received by the State Department of Health pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1135.5 of this title. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the State Department of Health at the beginning of each
fiscal year for the purpose of providing grants to the Oklahoma
Chapter of March of Dimes for purposes of preventing birth defects,
premature birth and infant mortality. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 22. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.15, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.15. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for the Oklahoma
Association for the Deaf License Plate shall be deposited by Service
Oklahoma in the Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License Plate
Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Department of Rehabilitation Services to be designated
the “Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License Plate Revolving
Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Department of Rehabilitation Services pursuant to the provisions of
subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to the credit of
the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by
the Department of Rehabilitation Services to promote the interests
of the deaf and to advance the social, educational, cultural, and
economic well being of the deaf. Expenditures from the fund shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 23. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.16, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.16. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Buffalo Soldier
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 56

license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the Buffalo
Soldier License Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this
section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs to be
designated the “Buffalo Soldier License Plate Revolving Fund”. The
fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to subsection A of
this section. All monies accruing to the credit of said such fund
are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs for the purpose of providing
grants to nonprofit organizations exempt from taxation pursuant to
the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section
501(c)(3), whose primary purpose is to establish and maintain a
plaza in this state as a lasting tribute and memorial to the
African-American members of the 9th and 10th Horse Cavalry and to
interface with regional museums and sites to gather and share
historical and artistic data to honor those soldiers. Expenditures
from said such fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 24. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.17, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.17. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Prevent Blindness
Oklahoma license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to
the Prevent Blindness Oklahoma License Plate Revolving Fund created
in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Health to be designated the
“Prevent Blindness Oklahoma License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Health pursuant to subsection A of this section. All monies
accruing to the credit of said such fund are hereby appropriated and
may be budgeted and expended by the State Department of Health for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 57

the purpose of providing grants to nonprofit organizations exempt
from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), whose primary purpose is
providing vision screenings to school age children in all seventy-
seven counties in this state. Expenditures from said such fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 25. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.18, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.18. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for the Oklahoma State
Capitol Restoration License Plate shall be deposited by Service
Oklahoma in the Oklahoma Friends of the Capitol License Plate
Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be
designated the “Oklahoma Friends of the Capitol License Plate
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Office of Management and Enterprise Services pursuant to the
provisions of subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and shall be budgeted
and expended by the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
restoration of the Oklahoma State Capitol. Before the Office makes
any expenditure from the fund, the expenditure shall be approved by
the State Capitol Preservation Commission created pursuant to
Section 4102 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Expenditures
from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 26. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.19, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.19. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by paragraph 47 of subsection B of Section 1135.5 of this
title for pancreatic cancer research license plates shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 58

deposited by Service Oklahoma to the Pancreatic Cancer Research
License Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this
section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Health to be designated the
“Pancreatic Cancer Research License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Health pursuant to subsection A of this section. All monies
accruing to the credit of said such fund are hereby appropriated and
may be budgeted and expended by the State Department of Health to
provide grants to the University of Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic
Cancer Research Fund for the purpose of funding research into early
detection and treating and curing of pancreatic cancer in this
state. Expenditures from said such fund shall be made upon warrants
issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
C. The Oklahoma Legislature hereby finds that the University of
Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer Research Fund provides an
important service to the inhabitants of this state as a community
and further finds that the services performed by the University of
Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer Research Fund are adequate
consideration for the funds received pursuant to this section.
SECTION 27. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.20, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.20. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Alzheimer’s Research
license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the
Alzheimer’s Research License Plate Revolving Fund created in
subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Health to be designated the
“Alzheimer’s Research License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund shall
be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Health pursuant to subsection A of this section. All monies
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 59

accruing to the credit of said such fund are hereby appropriated and
may be budgeted and expended by the State Department of Health for
the purpose of providing grants to the Oklahoma Chapter of the
Alzheimer’s Association for purposes of eliminating Alzheimer’s
disease through the advancement of research, to provide and enhance
care and support those with Alzheimer’s and to reduce the risk of
dementia through the promotion of brain health. Expenditures from
said such fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
C. The Oklahoma Legislature hereby finds that the Alzheimer’s
Association provides an important service to the inhabitants of this
state as a community and further finds that the services performed
by the Alzheimer’s Association are adequate consideration for the
funds received pursuant to this section.
SECTION 28. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.21, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.21. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Hospice and
Palliative Care license plates shall be deposited by Service
Oklahoma to the Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate Revolving
Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Health to be designated the
“Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate Revolving Fund”. The
fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the State
Department of Health pursuant to subsection A of this section. All
monies accruing to the credit of said such fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Health for the purpose of providing grants to the
Oklahoma Hospice and Palliative Care Association for the purposes of
leading the efforts to unify Oklahoma hospices with the resources
and information that will promote each hospice to provide quality
hospice care to their community. Expenditures from said such fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 60

claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
C. The Oklahoma Legislature hereby finds that the Oklahoma
Hospice and Palliative Care Association provides an important
service to the inhabitants of this state as a community and further
finds that the services performed by the Oklahoma Hospice and
Palliative Care Association are adequate consideration for the funds
received pursuant to this section.
SECTION 29. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.22, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.22. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Juvenile Diabetes
Research license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to
the Juvenile Diabetes Research License Plate Revolving Fund created
in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Health to be designated the
“Juvenile Diabetes Research License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Health pursuant to subsection A of this section. All monies
accruing to the credit of said such fund are hereby appropriated and
may be budgeted and expended by the State Department of Health for
the purpose of providing grants to the Oklahoma Chapters of the
Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation for purposes of finding a cure
for type 1 diabetes and its complications through the support of
research and working to develop new and better treatments to improve
the lives of people who have type 1 diabetes and keep them as
healthy as possible. Expenditures from said such fund shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
C. The Oklahoma Legislature hereby finds that the Juvenile
Diabetes Research Foundation provides an important service to the
inhabitants of this state as a community and further finds that the
services performed by the Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation are
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 61

adequate consideration for the funds received pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 30. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.23, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.23. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for Deer Creek Schools Foundation license plates shall be deposited
by Service Oklahoma to the Deer Creek Schools Foundation License
Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Education to be designated the
“Deer Creek Schools Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund”. The
fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the State
Department of Education pursuant to subsection A of this section.
All monies accruing to the credit of said such fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Education for the purpose of providing grants to the
Deer Creek Schools Foundation for purposes of promoting and funding
the academic and artistic achievement of all students and teachers
of Deer Creek Public Schools. Expenditures from said such fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
C. The Oklahoma Legislature hereby finds that the Deer Creek
Schools Foundation provides an important service to the inhabitants
of this state as a community and further finds that the services
performed by the Deer Creek Schools Foundation are adequate
consideration for the funds received pursuant to this section.
SECTION 31. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.24, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.24. A. Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of this title for Lupus Awareness and
Education license plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to
the Oklahoma Lupus License Plate Revolving Fund created in
subsection B of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 62

B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund to be designated the “Oklahoma Lupus License Plate Revolving
Fund” and administered by the State Department of Health. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the State Department of
Health pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this section.
All monies accruing to the credit of such fund are hereby
appropriated and shall be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Health for the purpose of providing grants to the
Lupus Foundation of Oklahoma for the purpose of lupus awareness,
education, outreach, referral, research or treatment in this state.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
C. The Oklahoma Legislature hereby finds that the Lupus
Foundation of Oklahoma provides an important service to the
inhabitants of this state as a community and further finds that the
services performed by the Lupus Foundation of Oklahoma are adequate
consideration for the funds received pursuant to this section.
SECTION 32. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.25, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.25. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by paragraph 51 of subsection B of Section 1135.5 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes for Chiefs of Police license
plates shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the Oklahoma
Association of Chiefs of Police License Plate Revolving Fund created
in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Public Safety to be designated the
“Oklahoma Association of Chiefs of Police License Plate Revolving
Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
State Department of Public Safety pursuant to subsection A of this
section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Public Safety to assist with funding for training and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 63

education for law enforcement agencies throughout the state.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 33. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.26, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.26. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for Oklahoma Nurses license plates shall be deposited by Service
Oklahoma to the Oklahoma Nurses License Plate Revolving Fund created
in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Board of Nursing to be designated the
“Oklahoma Nurses License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund shall
consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing
pursuant to subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to
the credit of said such fund are hereby appropriated and may be
budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing for the
purpose of providing grants to the Oklahoma Nurses Foundation to
fulfill its mission. Expenditures from said such fund shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 34. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.27, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.27. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for Remembering Fallen Heroes license plates shall be deposited by
Service Oklahoma to the Oklahoma Concerns of Police Survivors
License Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this
section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Public Safety to be designated
the “Oklahoma Concerns of Police Survivors License Plate Revolving
Fund”. The fund shall consist of all monies received pursuant to
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 64

subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to the credit of
said such fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Oklahoma Department of Public Safety for the purpose
of providing programs and services to surviving families of
Oklahoma’s fallen law enforcement officers. Expenditures from said
such fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 35. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.28, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.28. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for Piedmont Education Foundation license plates shall be deposited
by Service Oklahoma to the Piedmont Public Schools Education
Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of
this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Education to be designated the
“Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation License Plate
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall consist of all monies received
pursuant to subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the State Department of Education for grants to the
Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation to fund scholarships
and teacher grants to Piedmont School District’s students and
teachers. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants
issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 36. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.29, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.29. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for the Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate shall be
deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Prisoner of War and Missing in
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 65

Action License Plate Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this
section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs to be
designated the “Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Department pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this
section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for
any purpose related to Oklahoma residents who are American veterans.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 37. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.30, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.30. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for the Down Syndrome Association of Central Oklahoma license plates
shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to the Down Syndrome
Association of Central Oklahoma License Plate Revolving Fund created
in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Human Services to be designated the
“Down Syndrome Association of Central Oklahoma License Plate
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall consist of all monies received
pursuant to subsection A of this section. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the State Department of Human Services for grants to
the Down Syndrome Association of Central Oklahoma to raise awareness
and provide resources, as well as promote acceptance and inclusion
for people with Down Syndrome. Expenditures from the fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 66

SECTION 38. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.31, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.31. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for the Elk City Education Foundation plates shall be deposited by
Service Oklahoma to the Elk City Education Foundation License Plate
Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Education to be designated the “Elk
City Education Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall consist of all monies received pursuant to subsection A of
this section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Education for grants to the Elk City Education
Foundation to fund scholarships and teacher grants to Elk City
School District’s students and teachers. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 39. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104.32, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1104.32. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for the Extraordinary Educators License Plate shall be deposited by
Service Oklahoma in the Extraordinary Educators License Plate
Revolving Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Education to be designated the
“Extraordinary Educators License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Department pursuant
to the provisions of subsection A of this section. All monies
accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Department for the purpose of
providing grants to school superintendents for distribution to
educators who propose extraordinary activities, projects or lessons
for students from kindergarten through eighth grade. Expenditures
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 67

from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 40. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 397, O.S.L.
2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1104.33), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1104.33. A. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee
authorized by Section 1135.5 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes
for the Diabetes Awareness license plates shall be deposited by
Service Oklahoma to the Diabetes Awareness License Plate Revolving
Fund created in subsection B of this section.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Department of Health to be designated the
“Diabetes Awareness License Plate Revolving Fund”. The fund shall
consist of all monies received pursuant to subsection A of this
section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Health for grants to Diabetes Solutions of Oklahoma to
raise awareness and provide resources, as well as promote acceptance
and inclusion for people with diabetes. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 41. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1105A, as
last amended by Section 66, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1105A), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1105A. A. On or before July 1, 2023, Service Oklahoma
shall implement a program which will permit the electronic filing,
storage, and delivery of motor vehicle certificates of title and
allow a lienholder to perfect, assign and release a lien on a motor
vehicle in lieu of submission and maintenance of paper documents as
otherwise provided in the provisions of Section 1101 et seq. of this
title. Service Oklahoma may:
1. Enter into a competitive contract with a qualified third-
party service provider (System Developer), subject to the provisions
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 68

of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act, Section 85.1 et seq. of
Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Act as the service provider; or
3. Authorize proprietary provider systems by Oklahoma financial
institutions,
to provide necessary hardware, software and services facilitating
the interconnection between licensed operators and electronic title
service providers described in subsection B of this section for a
certificate of title and for filing or releasing a lien pursuant to
the procedures prescribed by Service Oklahoma. The provisions of
this section shall apply to certificates of title issued and liens
filed after June 30, 2022. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules
to implement the provisions of this section.
B. The program authorized under subsection A of this section
shall include, but not be limited to, procedures:
1. For the delivery of a certificate of title, on a paper
document or in an electronic format, to the secured party having the
primary perfected security interest in a vehicle in lieu of delivery
to the record owner, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1101
et seq. of this title. When there is no security interest, lien, or
other encumbrance on the vehicle, delivery of a certificate of
title, on a paper document or in an electronic format, shall be made
to the record owner. Provided, when electronic transmission of
liens and lien satisfactions is used, a certificate of title need
not be issued or printed until the last lien is satisfied and a
clear certificate of title is issued to the owner of the vehicle at
their request;
2. Establishing qualifications for third-party electronic title
service providers offering electronic lien services. The vendor
selected in subsection A of this section shall not be considered an
electronic title service provider and shall not operate or own an
electronic title service provider;
3. Establishing reasonable fees, if necessary, to be charged by
service providers or contractors for the establishment, maintenance
and operation of the electronic lien title program;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 69

4. Providing access to the electronic certificate of title
records including liens on record, for licensed motor vehicle
dealers and lienholders who participate in the program
notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1109 of this title;
5. Allowing licensed operators to participate in the electronic
lien title program. Participating licensed operators shall receive
all fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration
Act unless otherwise provided in Section 1132A of this title; and
6. For the acceptance and use of electronic or digital
signatures.
C. As used in this section and Section 1101 et seq. of this
title:
1. “Deliver” or “delivery” means, with respect to a certificate
of title or lien, either the physical delivery of a paper document
or the electronic delivery of a document in an electronic format;
2. “Electronic format” means an electronic or digital format or
medium of any document, record or other information; and
3. “Possess” or “possession” means, with respect to a
certificate of title or lien, to hold or otherwise exercise control
over a document which is in either a physical or electronic format.
D. Any documents created, stored or delivered under the
electronic lien title program as provided in this section shall be
presumed valid including any signatures which are generated
electronically or contained on a scanned copy. A certified copy of
Service Oklahoma’s electronic record of a motor vehicle certificate
of title or lien is admissible in any civil, criminal, or
administrative proceeding in this state as evidence of the existence
and contents of the certificate of title or lien.
E. The Tax Commission is authorized to expend funds necessary
for the implementation of the program provided in subsection A of
this section from available monies in the Oklahoma Tax Commission
and Office of Management and Enterprise Services Joint Computer
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 70

Enhancement Fund created pursuant to Section 265 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
F. In the development of the program provided in subsection A
of this section, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall consult
interested parties including, but not limited to, representatives of
the Oklahoma Automobile Dealers Association, the Oklahoma Bankers
Association, the Credit Union Association of Oklahoma and the Tag
Agent Coalition.
G. All documents submitted electronically pursuant to the
provisions of subsection A shall not require notarization.
H. F. All documents submitted pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall be retained pursuant to the provision of
subsection A of this section.
I. G. Submission and maintenance of paper documents as
otherwise provided in this provisions of Section 1101 et seq. of
this title shall be accepted through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 42. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1111, as
amended by Section 123, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1111), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1111. A. As used in this section:
1. “Loss” means the cost, in dollars, to repair or replace a
vehicle which has been damaged by collision or other occurrence.
The amount paid by an insurer to a holder of the certificate of
title for repair of a damaged vehicle shall be prima facie evidence
of the amount of the loss. The amount paid by an insurer to a
holder of the certificate of title for replacement of a damaged
vehicle less the resale value of the damaged vehicle shall be prima
facie evidence of the amount of the loss;
2. “Fair market value” means the value of a vehicle as listed
in the current National Auto Dealers Association guidebook or other
similar guidebook or the actual cash value, whichever is greater;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 71

3. “Resale value” means the amount, in dollars, paid to the
holder of a certificate of title by a willing buyer for a vehicle
damaged by collision or other occurrence or recovered from theft;
4. “Total loss” means a loss which is equal to the fair market
value of the vehicle immediately prior to the damage to or theft of
the vehicle; and
5. “Vehicle” means a vehicle, as defined in paragraph 40 of
Section 1102 of this title, manufactured within the last ten (10)
model years.
B. Any insurance company that pays a total loss on a claim for
any vehicle including, but not limited to, a flood-damaged vehicle
or recovered-theft vehicle, any junk dealer who receives a motor
vehicle which is to be used for junk or for parts, or any other
person permanently dismantling or junking a vehicle shall receive
the certificate of title from the current holder of the certificate
of title, shall detach the license plate from the vehicle, and shall
return the license plate and the certificate of title to Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator within thirty (30) days from receipt
of the certificate, or insurance companies may provide alternate
documentation within thirty (30) days pursuant to subsection P of
Section 1105 of this title. Service Oklahoma shall cancel the
certificate of title to the vehicle used for junk or parts and shall
preserve the vehicle identification numbers on the certificate of
title in the computer files for at least five (5) years. No
certificate of title may be reissued on a junked vehicle as defined
in Section 1105 of this title, unless reissued pursuant to paragraph
3 of subsection C of this section. Service Oklahoma shall transfer
ownership of a stolen vehicle, not recovered from theft at the time
of transfer, by salvage or unrecovered-theft title to the insurer.
Service Oklahoma shall transfer ownership of a vehicle damaged by
flooding or other occurrence to the insurer by an original title,
salvage title, or junked title, as may be appropriate, based upon an
estimate of the amount of loss submitted by the insurer. All
license plates surrendered to Service Oklahoma shall be destroyed.
C. 1. If an insurance company pays a claim for a loss which is
less than a total loss but the cost of repairing the vehicle for
safe operation on the highway exceeds sixty percent (60%) of the
fair market value of the vehicle, or if any vehicle not insured is
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 72

damaged to the extent that the cost of repair for safe operation on
the highway exceeds sixty percent (60%) of the fair market value of
the vehicle, any holder of the certificate of title for the vehicle
shall return the certificate of title to Service Oklahoma or a
licensed operator within thirty (30) days from receipt of payment
for the loss.
2. Upon receipt of the certificate, Service Oklahoma or the
licensed operator shall issue a salvage title for the vehicle. The
title for any vehicle damaged by flooding shall be stamped with the
words “Flood Damaged”, and for any such vehicle which was recovered
from a theft, the salvage title or rebuilt title shall be stamped
with the words “Recovered Theft”. A licensed dealer subject to the
provisions of the Automotive Dismantlers and Parts Recycler Act,
Section 591.1 et seq. of this title, shall not be required to pay
registration fees, excise taxes, back taxes, or penalties on a
vehicle as a prerequisite to obtaining a salvage title.
3. If the actual documented cost of repairing the vehicle for
safe operation on the highway does not exceed sixty percent (60%) of
the fair market value of the vehicle as defined in this section, the
certificate of title shall be reissued to the holder and the vehicle
shall not be subject to inspection as required under this section.
The actual documented cost of repairing the vehicle pursuant to this
paragraph shall be certified by the insurance company paying the
loss.
D. If a motor vehicle with a salvage title is placed in
operative condition, application shall be made to Service Oklahoma
or a licensed operator for a rebuilt title. A visual inspection of
the vehicle and examination of the vehicle identification numbers
shall be conducted prior to the issuance of a rebuilt title. At the
time of issuance, the salvage title shall be returned to Service
Oklahoma by the owner, or by the licensed operator if the licensed
operator issues the rebuilt title. A visual inspection shall also
be made of any out-of-state vehicle to be registered and titled in
this state if the vehicle is within the class of vehicles for which
a rebuilt title is required and a similar inspection has not been
conducted by another state. The certificate of title for the
rebuilt vehicle shall be stamped with the words, “This Rebuilt
Vehicle Has Been Inspected by the Appropriate State Official.”
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 73

E. 1. The visual inspections and examination of vehicle
identification numbers shall include, but not be limited to:
a. comparison of the vehicle identification numbers with
the number recorded on the ownership records,
b. inspection of the vehicle identification numbers and
the VIN plate to detect possible alteration or other
fraud,
c. interpretation of the vehicle identification number
recorded on the ownership documents to assure that it
accurately describes the motor vehicle in question,
and
d. inspection of the odometer of the vehicle to detect
rollback or alteration.
2. All vehicle damage shall be repaired before the examination
is conducted. The following paperwork shall be presented to the
licensed operator: the salvage title and original receipts for all
parts placed on the vehicle. Components such as doors, motor, and
transmission shall indicate the serial number or the vehicle
identification number (VIN) of the auto the part was purchased from
or removed from.
F. The visual inspection and vehicle identification numbers
examination shall be performed by a licensed operator at the
location designated by the licensed operator. If the location of
the inspection is not the place of business of the rebuilder, the
licensed operator shall issue a permit authorizing the applicant to
operate the vehicle upon the public streets, roads, and highways in
route to and from the designated location for the inspection. The
inspection and examination shall be performed within ten (10)
working days after the owner of the vehicle requests the inspection
and examination. Requests shall be made by completing the request
form prescribed and provided by Service Oklahoma.
G. Inspection and examination of a rebuilt vehicle shall be
performed by a person employed by a licensed operator.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 74

H. The fee for the examination by the licensed operator shall
be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), which shall be paid at the time of
issuance of the certificate of title for the rebuilt vehicle. The
licensed operator shall retain Five Dollars ($5.00) and shall remit
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) to the Tax Commission which shall retain Ten
Dollars ($10.00) and transmit Ten Dollars ($10.00) to the State
Treasurer for deposit in the Department of Public Safety Revolving
Fund through December 31, 2022. Beginning January 1, 2023, through
June 30, 2026, the licensed operator shall retain Five Dollars
($5.00) and shall remit Twenty Dollars ($20.00) to the Tax
Commission which shall retain Ten Dollars ($10.00) and transmit Ten
Dollars ($10.00) to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund. Beginning July 1, 2026, the licensed
operator shall retain Five Dollars ($5.00) and shall remit Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) to Service Oklahoma which shall retain Ten Dollars
($10.00) and transmit Ten Dollars ($10.00) to the State Treasurer
for deposit in the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund. The licensed
operator and its employees and agents may not be sued for and shall
not be liable for any damages allegedly arising out of the
inspection of a vehicle or any acts or omissions in the performance
of the inspection. The licensed operator may be held liable for any
damages to the vehicle caused by the negligent acts or omissions in
the performance of the inspection. Any person may be liable for any
damages to a vehicle caused by the intentional acts or omissions in
the performance of the inspection.
I. The rebuilt title and any subsequent transfers of such title
shall also reflect that the vehicle was a salvage vehicle, flood-
damaged vehicle or recovered-theft vehicle, if applicable, and also
shall include the salvage date.
J. Any title for a motor vehicle issued pursuant to the laws of
any other state which reflects that such vehicle is a salvage
vehicle, a rebuilt vehicle or a junked vehicle or has any other
brand or classification notation by that state shall be retained on
the new title issued by Service Oklahoma unless the actual
documented cost of repairing the vehicle for safe operation on the
highway does not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the fair market value
of the vehicle as provided by this section.
K. When the insurance company pays a loss on a vehicle which is
registered at the time of mishap, accident, burning, or flooding,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 75

the appropriate certificate of title shall be issued without the
payment of additional registration fees or excise taxes, upon the
submission of a police report or insurance adjuster’s report and a
declaration by the insurer that the vehicle is held for sale to a
dealer. If the owner of the vehicle or other insured retains
ownership of the damaged vehicle, Service Oklahoma shall notify the
owner or insured of the requirements of this section.
L. Any insurance company that pays a claim for a loss where the
cost of repairing the vehicle for safe operation on the highway
exceeds sixty percent (60%) of the market value of the vehicle or
pays a claim for a flood-damaged vehicle as defined in Section 1105
of this title shall notify, in writing, the holder of the
certificate of title of the requirements of this section and shall
notify Service Oklahoma of the payment of such claim. The notice
shall include the estimated total damage percentage determination of
the actual cash value made by the insurance company to repair the
vehicle for safe operation on the highway. The insurance company
shall also send a copy of the notification to the holder of the
title. Service Oklahoma shall provide notice to the owner of the
vehicle in writing requiring the owner to surrender the title along
with the fee to Service Oklahoma or one of its licensed operators
within thirty (30) days from the receipt of notice for the issuance
of the appropriate title based on the amount of loss. Service
Oklahoma shall reissue the appropriate title with the words “Flood
Damaged” on the face of the title in the case of a flood-damaged
vehicle; provided, no insurance company shall pay a claim for less
than the amount to which the holder of the certificate of title is
rightfully entitled in order to avoid compliance with this section.
M. Except as provided for in subsection N of this section, any
person, firm, corporation, or other legal entity convicted of
violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Three
Hundred Dollars ($300.00) or by incarceration in the county jail for
not more than six (6) months, or by both the fine and incarceration.
N. Any owner of a titled vehicle who has knowledge that the
title is not the proper type for the vehicle and, with intent to
misrepresent the vehicle, fails to make the appropriate title
changes, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who has
knowledge that the title is not the proper type for the vehicle, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 76

with intent to misrepresent the vehicle, buys or receives any
vehicle for which the appropriate title changes have not been made
as required by this act the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person found
guilty in accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall be
punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)
for the first offense or Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for the
second or subsequent offense, or by imprisonment in the county jail
for a term not exceeding six (6) months, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
O. Any owner of a salvage or junked vehicle shall submit the
certificate of title to Service Oklahoma or the licensed operator
for issuance of an appropriate title. Any holder of a certificate
of title issued by this state, to a vehicle which no longer exists,
shall surrender the certificate of title to Service Oklahoma for
cancellation. The vehicle identification number on the canceled
certificate of title shall be preserved in the computer of Service
Oklahoma for at least five (5) years.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
transfer of ownership of a vehicle by assignment of the title to a
used car dealer, wholesale used car dealer, or a licensed automotive
dismantler or parts recycler.
SECTION 43. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1115, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 246, O.S.L. 2023 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1115), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1115. A. Unless provided otherwise by statute, the
following vehicles shall be annually registered annually with
Service Oklahoma: manufactured homes, vehicles registered with a
permanent nonexpiring license plate pursuant to Section 1113 of this
title, and commercial vehicles registered pursuant to the
installment plan provided in subsection H of Section 1133 of this
title. The following schedule shall apply for such vehicle
purchased in this state or brought into this state by residents of
this state:
1. Between January 1 and March 31, the payment of the full
annual fee shall be required;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 77

2. Between April 1 and June 30, the payment of three-fourths
(3/4) the annual fee shall be required;
3. Between July 1 and September 30, the payment of one-half
(1/2) the annual fee shall be required; and
4. Between October 1 and November 30, one-fourth (1/4) the
annual fee shall be required.
License plates or decals for each year shall be made available
on December 1 of each preceding year for such vehicles. Any person
who purchases such vehicle or manufactured home between December 1
and December 31 of any year shall register it within thirty (30)
days from date of purchase and obtain a license plate or
Manufactured Home License Registration Decal, as appropriate, for
the following calendar year upon payment of the full annual fee.
Unless provided otherwise by statute, all annual license,
registration and other fees for such vehicles shall be due and
payable on January 1 of each year and if not paid by February 1
shall be deemed delinquent.
B. 1. All vehicles, other than those required to be registered
pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this section, shall be
registered on a staggered system of registration and licensing on a
monthly series basis to distribute the work of registering such
vehicles as uniformly and expeditiously as practicable throughout
the calendar year unless otherwise provided in this section. After
the end of the month following the expiration date, the license and
registration fees for the new registration period shall become
delinquent. At the time of registration or renewal, the owner of
the vehicle may choose either an annual or a biennial registration
of the vehicle.
2. All fleet vehicles registered pursuant to new applications
approved pursuant to the provisions of Section 1120 of this title
shall be registered on a staggered system monthly basis.
3. Applicants seeking to establish Oklahoma as the base
jurisdiction for registering apportioned fleet vehicles shall have a
one-time option of registering for a period of not less than six (6)
months nor greater than eighteen (18) months. Subsequent renewals
for these registrants will be for twelve (12) months, expiring on
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 78

the last day of the month chosen by the registrant under the one-
time option as provided herein. In addition, registrants with
multiple fleets may designate a different registration month of
expiration for each fleet.
As used in this section, “fleet” shall have the same meaning as
set forth in the International Registration Plan.
4. Effective January 1, 2004, all motorcycles and mopeds shall
be registered on a staggered system of registration. Service
Oklahoma shall notify in writing, prior to December 1, 2003, all
owners of motorcycles or mopeds registered as of such date, who
shall have a one-time option of registering for a period of not less
than three (3) months nor greater than fifteen (15) months.
Subsequent renewals for these registrants will be for twelve (12)
months, expiring on the last day of the month chosen by the
registrant under the one-time option as provided herein. All
motorcycles and mopeds registered pursuant to new applications
received on or after December 1, 2003, shall also be registered
pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph.
5. Any three or more commercial vehicles owned by the same
person and previously registered in this state may be registered at
the same time regardless of the month or months in which they were
previously registered. The month in which the commercial vehicles
are newly registered shall be the month in which their registration
is renewed annually. If a commercial vehicle is registered pursuant
to this paragraph in the same calendar year in which it was
previously registered, license and registration fees shall be
prorated to account for the difference between the previous renewal
month and the new renewal month and those fees shall be due at the
time of registration pursuant to this paragraph.
C. The following penalties shall apply for delinquent
registration fees:
1. For fleet vehicles required to be registered pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1120 of this title for which a properly
completed application for registration has not been received by the
Corporation Commission by the last day of the month following the
registration expiration date, a penalty of thirty percent (30%) of
the Oklahoma portion of the annual registration fee, or Two Hundred
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 79

Dollars ($200.00), whichever is greater, shall be assessed. The
license and registration cards issued by the Corporation Commission
for each fleet vehicle shall be valid until two (2) months after the
registration expiration date;
2. For commercial vehicles registered under the provisions of
subsection B of this section, except those vehicles registered
pursuant to Section 1133.1 of this title, a penalty shall be
assessed after the last day of the month following the registration
expiration date. A penalty of twenty-five cents ($0.25) per day
shall be added to the license fee of such vehicle and shall accrue
for one (1) month. Thereafter, the penalty shall be thirty percent
(30%) of the annual registration fee, or Two Hundred Dollars
($200.00), whichever is greater;
3. For new or used manufactured homes, not registered within
thirty (30) days from date of purchase or date such manufactured
home was brought into this state, a penalty equal to the
registration fee shall be assessed; or
4. For all vehicles a penalty shall be assessed after the last
day of the month following the expiration date and no penalty shall
be waived by Service Oklahoma or any licensed operator except as
provided for in subsection H of Section 1133, subsection C of
Section 1127 of this title, or when the vehicle was stolen as
certified by a police report or other documentation as required by
Service Oklahoma. A penalty of One Dollar ($1.00) per day shall be
added to the license fee of such vehicle, provided that the penalty
shall not exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). Of each dollar
penalty collected pursuant to this subsection:
a. twenty-one cents ($0.21) shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title,
b. twenty-one cents ($0.21) shall be retained by the
licensed operator, and
c. fifty-eight cents ($0.58) shall be deposited in the
General Revenue Fund.
D. In addition to all other penalties provided in the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act, the following penalties shall
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 80

be imposed and collected by any Enforcement Officer of the
Corporation Commission upon finding any commercial vehicle being
operated in violation of the provisions of the Oklahoma Vehicle
License and Registration Act.
The penalties shall apply to any commercial vehicle found to be
operating in violation of the following provisions:
1. A penalty of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be
imposed upon any person found to be operating a commercial vehicle
sixty (60) days after the end of the month in which the license
plate or registration credentials expire without the current year
license plate or registration credential displayed. Such penalty
shall not exceed the amount established by the Corporation
Commission pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of Section
1167 of this title. Revenue from such penalties shall be
apportioned as provided in Section 1167 of this title;
2. A penalty of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be
imposed for any person operating a commercial vehicle subject to the
provisions of Section 1120 or Section 1133 of this title without the
proper display of, or, carrying in such commercial vehicle, the
identification credentials issued by the Corporation Commission as
evidence of payment of the fee or tax as provided in Section 1120 or
Section 1133 of this title. Such penalty shall not exceed the
amount established by the Corporation Commission pursuant to the
provisions of subsection A of Section 1167 of this title. Revenue
from such penalties shall be apportioned as provided in Section 1167
of this title; and
3. A penalty of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00)
shall be imposed for any person that fails to register any
commercial vehicle subject to the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act. Such penalty shall not exceed the amount
established by the Corporation Commission pursuant to the provisions
of subsection A of Section 1167 of this title. Revenue from such
penalties shall be apportioned as provided in Section 1167 of this
title.
E. Service Oklahoma, or the Corporation Commission with respect
to vehicles registered under Section 1120 or Section 1133 of this
title, shall assess the registration fees and penalties for the year
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 81

or years a vehicle was not registered. For vehicles not registered
for two (2) or more years, the registration fees and penalties shall
be due only for the current year and one (1) previous year.
F. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, there
shall be a penalty of not less than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) upon a
finding by an enforcement officer that:
1. The registration of a vehicle registered pursuant to Section
1132 of this title is expired and it is sixty (60) or more days
after the end of the month of expiration; or
2. The registration fees for a vehicle that is subject to the
registration fees pursuant to Section 1132 of this title have not
been paid.
Such penalty shall not exceed the amount established by the
Corporation Commission pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of
Section 1167 of this title. Revenue from such penalties shall be
apportioned as provided in Section 1167 of this title.
G. If a vehicle is donated to a nonprofit charitable
organization, the nonprofit charitable organization shall be exempt
from paying any current or past due registration fees, excise tax,
transfer fees, and penalties and interest. However, after the
donation, if the person donating the vehicle, or someone on behalf
of such person, purchases the same vehicle back from the nonprofit
charitable organization to which the vehicle was donated, such
person shall be liable for all current and past-due registration
fees, excise tax, title or transfer fees, and penalties and interest
on such vehicle.
H. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules and any necessary
procedures to establish an option for a biennial registration for
vehicles registered pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection B of this
section.
1. Regardless of whether the vehicle owner elects annual or
biennial registration, the vehicle is still subject to all fees,
fines, and penalties provided in the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 82

2. For vehicle owners who elect biennial registration, the
annual registration fee shall be twice the annual registration fee
provided in the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
3. When processing biennial registrations, licensed operators
shall be entitled to retain twice the amounts provided in paragraphs
1 and 2 of subsection A of Section 1141.1 of this title and twice
the amount provided in paragraph 14 of subsection A of Section
1141.1 of this title for processing insurance verification
information.
SECTION 44. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1120.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1120.1. A. The Corporation Commission, when in the
interest of the State of Oklahoma this state and its residents, may
enter into the International Registration Plan or other compacts or
agreements with other states to permit motor vehicle registration
and license taxes on any motor vehicle to be used as a rental motor
vehicle as defined in the International Registration Plan.
B. The Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or the Corporation
Commission, as applicable, shall require that each rental motor
vehicle be assessed the following registration fees in lieu of the
fee schedule set forth in Section 1132 of this title:
1. A fee of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) shall be assessed for the
first year of registration in this or any other state; and
2. A fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be assessed in the first
year and each subsequent year of registration in this or any other
state.
C. Upon registration and payment of the fees required by this
section, the owner shall receive a license plate which shall be
valid until the vehicle is permanently withdrawn from the rental
fleet of the owner.
SECTION 45. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1120.2, is
amended to read as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 83

Section 1120.2. On a monthly basis, the Corporation Commission
shall transfer to the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma the
amount of net revenue collected under the International Registration
Plan to be apportioned by the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma in
accordance with the provisions of Section 1104 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 46. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1133, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 167, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1133), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1133. A. The following license fees shall be paid
annually to the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or the
Corporation Commission, as applicable, upon the registration of the
following vehicles:
Except as provided in this subsection, for each commercial
vehicle over eight thousand (8,000) pounds as defined in Section
1102 of this title, the license fee shall be based on the combined
laden weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles. The license
fees shall be computed and assessed at the following rates:
1. From 8,001 pounds to 15,000 pounds $ 95.00
2. From 15,001 pounds to 18,000 pounds 120.00
3. From 18,001 pounds to 21,000 pounds 155.00
4. From 21,001 pounds to 24,000 pounds 190.00
5. From 24,001 pounds to 27,000 pounds 225.00
6. From 27,001 pounds to 30,000 pounds 260.00
7. From 30,001 pounds to 33,000 pounds 295.00
8. From 33,001 pounds to 36,000 pounds 325.00
9. From 36,001 pounds to 39,000 pounds 350.00
10. From 39,001 pounds to 42,000 pounds 375.00
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 84

11. From 42,001 pounds to 45,000 pounds 400.00
12. From 45,001 pounds to 48,000 pounds 425.00
13. From 48,001 pounds to 51,000 pounds 450.00
14. From 51,001 pounds to 54,000 pounds 475.00
15. From 54,001 pounds to 57,000 pounds 648.00
16. From 57,001 pounds to 60,000 pounds 681.00
17. From 60,001 pounds to 63,000 pounds 713.00
18. From 63,001 pounds to 66,000 pounds 746.00
19. From 66,001 pounds to 69,000 pounds 778.00
20. From 69,001 pounds to 72,000 pounds 817.00
21. From 72,001 pounds to 73,280 pounds 857.00
22. From 73,281 pounds to 74,000 pounds 870.00
23. From 74,001 pounds to 75,000 pounds 883.00
24. From 75,001 pounds to 76,000 pounds 896.00
25. From 76,001 pounds to 77,000 pounds 909.00
26. From 77,001 pounds to 78,000 pounds 922.00
27. From 78,001 pounds to 79,000 pounds 935.00
28. From 79,001 pounds to 80,000 pounds 948.00
29. From 80,001 pounds to 81,000 pounds 961.00
30. From 81,001 pounds to 82,000 pounds 974.00
31. From 82,001 pounds to 83,000 pounds 987.00
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 85

32. From 83,001 pounds to 84,000 pounds 1000.00
33. From 84,001 pounds to 85,000 pounds 1013.00
34. From 85,001 pounds to 86,000 pounds 1026.00
35. From 86,001 pounds to 87,000 pounds 1039.00
36. From 87,001 pounds to 88,000 pounds 1052.00
37. From 88,001 pounds to 89,000 pounds 1065.00
38. From 89,001 pounds to 90,000 pounds 1078.00
For the purposes of this section, the license fee of a wrecker
or tow vehicle shall be based on the gross weight of the wrecker or
tow vehicle alone without any inclusion of weight for a vehicle
towed by the wrecker or tow vehicle.
B. After the fifth year’s registration in this or any other
state, the license fee upon any truck registered on a basis of the
combined laden weight not in excess of fifteen thousand (15,000)
pounds shall be assessed at fifty percent (50%) of the fee computed
and assessed for each of the first five (5) years. On the seventh
and all subsequent years of registration in this or any other state,
on such truck, such license fees shall be assessed and computed at
fifty percent (50%) of the amount due on the sixth year’s
registration. In no event shall such annual license fee on any
truck be less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) nor shall the annual license
fee of any truck-tractor be less than Ninety-five Dollars ($95.00).
C. In addition to the fees required by subsection A of this
section, there shall be paid a registration fee of Forty Dollars
($40.00) upon the first registration in this state after July 1,
1985, and upon the transfer of ownership of any frac tank, as
defined by Section 54 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
construction machinery, as defined by Section 1102 of this title,
rental trailer, commercial trailer, or semitrailer designed to be
pulled and usually pulled by a truck or truck-tractor.
Thereafter, a fee of Four Dollars ($4.00) shall be paid annually
for each frac tank, construction machinery, rental trailer,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 86

commercial trailer, or semitrailer. The fee of Four Dollars ($4.00)
shall be due and payable on January 1 of each year on any frac tank,
construction machinery, rental trailer, commercial trailer, or
semitrailer registered under this section.
Upon the payment of the registration fee of Forty Dollars
($40.00), a nonexpiring registration certificate and identification
plate shall be issued for each frac tank, construction machinery,
rental trailer, commercial trailer, or semitrailer. The nonexpiring
identification plate shall remain displayed on the frac tank,
construction machinery, rental trailer, commercial trailer, or
semitrailer for which the identification plate is issued until such
frac tank, construction machinery, trailer, or semitrailer is sold
or removed from service.
A receipt shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee.
The receipt shall show the total fee paid for one or more frac
tanks, construction machinery units, rental trailers, commercial
trailers, or semitrailers. The receipt shall be retained by the
owner of any frac tank, construction machinery, rental trailer,
commercial trailer, or semitrailer for a period of three (3) years
and shall be subject to audit by the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma
or the Corporation Commission.
Any frac tank, construction machinery, commercial trailer, or
semitrailer licensed pursuant to this section shall not be permitted
to be operated on the highways of this state when such frac tank,
construction machinery, commercial trailer, or semitrailer is being
operated by a resident of this state, or is being operated by a
person operating a vehicle or vehicles domiciled in this state and
required by law to be licensed in Oklahoma, unless the pulling truck
or truck-tractor has been licensed pursuant to this section or is
twenty-four thousand (24,000) pounds or less and operating under a
valid temporary license plate provided by Section 1137.1 or 1137.3
of this title. In no event shall any truck, truck-tractor, frac
tank, construction machinery, trailer, or semitrailer used in the
furtherance of any commercial enterprise be permitted to operate on
the highways of this state or register at a smaller license fee than
that prescribed in this section except as provided in this section.
D. For each fiscal year, notwithstanding the provisions of
Section 1104 of this title, the first Four Hundred Thousand Dollars
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 87

($400,000.00) of all monies collected pursuant to subsections A, B,
and C of this section shall be paid by the Tax Commission Service
Oklahoma to the State Treasurer of the State of Oklahoma who shall
deposit same each fiscal year, or such lesser amount as may accrue
each fiscal year, under the provisions of this section to the credit
of the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury. All monies
collected in excess of Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00)
each fiscal year shall be apportioned as provided in Section 1104 of
this title.
E. If any vehicle is used for a purpose other than that for
which it has been registered, the owner of the vehicle shall be
required to immediately reregister the vehicle at the appropriate
rate. If any vehicle is placed or operated upon any street, road,
or highway of this state with a laden weight in excess of that for
which it is licensed, the license fee for such increased laden
weight shall become due, and the owner of the vehicle shall be
required to immediately reregister the vehicle at the increased
rate. Provided, that in either event there shall be credited upon
the increased license fee for such reregistration for any portion of
the year or period remaining after the change in use or increase in
laden weight shall have occurred a proportionate part of the license
fees previously paid. If this reregistration is made voluntarily by
the owner, the ratable proportion of the credit allowed shall be
determined as of the date the reregistration is voluntarily made.
If the reregistration is not voluntarily made but occurs as a result
of the discovery by any enforcement officer of an improper operation
of the vehicle, that shall be considered prima facie evidence that
it has been improperly registered for the entire portion of the year
covered by the improper registration. Provided further, that the
ratable credit shall be allowed only on the first reregistration of
any vehicle during any calendar year. If, during the calendar year,
subsequent changes of license plate are desired, the ratable credit
shall not be allowed but the owner of the vehicle shall be required
to pay the license fee due for that portion of the calendar year
remaining without benefit of any additional credits. No owner of a
motor vehicle shall possess at any time more than one license plate
for any vehicle owned by such person. No reregistration shall be
made until the current license plate previously issued has been
surrendered.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 88

Any person who has paid a fee under the terms and provisions of
this subsection may at any time within one (1) year after the
payment of such fee file with the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or
the Corporation Commission a claim under oath for refund stating the
grounds therefor. However, the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or
the Corporation Commission shall allow refunds only where the amount
of tax paid has been erroneously computed or determined through
clerical errors or miscalculations. No refund shall be allowed by
the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or the Corporation Commission of
a tax paid by the person where such payment is made through a
mistake as to the legal misinterpretation or construction of the
provisions of this section. Any refunds made by the Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma or the Corporation Commission pursuant to this
subsection shall be made out of any monies collected pursuant to
this subsection and which have not been apportioned.
F. The annual license fee required by this section is intended
to cover only the motor vehicle for which it is issued. The Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma or the Corporation Commission upon
application, when a licensed truck-tractor has been destroyed by
fire or accident, shall credit the unused portion of the annual
license fee of the vehicle toward the license fee of a replacement
vehicle of equal registered weight. The amount of credit shall not
exceed the license fee due on the replacement vehicle. The Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma or the Corporation Commission shall not
be required to make a refund. If the replacement vehicle is to be
registered at a greater weight, the applicant shall pay an
additional sum equivalent to the difference between the unused
portion of the annual license fee for the original motor vehicle and
the license fee due for the replacement motor vehicle.
G. The license fees provided for in this section shall be paid
each year whether or not the vehicle is operated on the public
highway.
H. Notwithstanding the provision of any other statute in
respect to the time for payment of license fees on motor vehicles,
if the total amount of the annual license fees due from any resident
owner, either individual, partnership, or Oklahoma corporation, upon
the registration, on or before January 15 of any year, of commercial
trucks, truck-tractors, frac tanks, construction machinery, trailers
or semitrailers exceeds the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 89

the license fees may be paid in equal semiannual installments. The
first installment shall be paid at the time of the application for
registration of the vehicles and not later than January 15 of each
year, and the second installment shall be paid on or before the
first day of July of such year.
This subsection shall not operate to reduce the amount of the
license fees due. If any installment is not paid on or before the
date due, all unpaid installments of license fees for such year on
each vehicle shall be deemed delinquent and immediately due and
payable, and there shall be added a penalty of twenty-five cents
($0.25) per day to the balance of the license fee due on each
vehicle for each day the balance remains unpaid up to thirty (30)
days, after which the penalty due on each vehicle shall be Twenty-
five Dollars ($25.00). The penalty for vehicles registered by
weight in excess of eight thousand (8,000) pounds shall be an amount
equal to the license fee. On and after the thirtieth day each such
vehicle involved shall be considered as improperly licensed and as
not currently registered, and all of the provisions of the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act relating to enforcement,
including the provisions for the seizure and sale of vehicles not
registered and not displaying current license plates, shall apply to
the vehicles.
All fees and taxes levied by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act shall become and remain a first lien upon the
vehicle upon which the fees or taxes are due until paid. The lien
shall have priority to all other liens. No title to any vehicle may
be transferred until the unpaid balance on the vehicle has been paid
in full. Provided, that any unpaid balance of the license fees
shall remain and become a lien against any and all property of the
owner, both real and personal, for so long as any license tag fee
balance shall remain unpaid. Any unpaid balance under these
provisions shall be immediately due and payable by the owner if any
vehicle is sold, wrecked, or otherwise retired from service.
Any person electing to pay license fees on a semiannual
installment basis, as herein authorized, shall be required to
purchase a new license tag for the last half and shall pay the sum
of Four Dollars ($4.00) for each tag to cover the costs of the
license tags. The license tags for each half shall be plainly
marked in designating the half for which they were issued. A
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 90

validation sticker may be used in lieu of a metal tag where
appropriate. Such license tag fee shall be, in addition to the
license fees or any other fees, collected on each application as
provided by statute and shall be apportioned according to the
provisions of Section 1104 of this title.
I. Any person pulling or towing any vehicle intended to be
resold, into or through this state, shall pay a fee of Three Dollars
($3.00) for the vehicle towing and Three Dollars ($3.00) for the one
being towed. It shall be unlawful to operate any series of such
units on the public highways of this state at a distance closer than
five hundred (500) feet from each other. All fees and taxes levied
by the terms and provisions of this section shall become and remain
a first lien upon the vehicle upon which the fees or taxes are due
until paid. The lien shall be prior, superior, and paramount to all
other liens of whatsoever kind or character.
J. In addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, the
following penalty shall be imposed by enforcement officers upon any
owner or operator of a commercial vehicle registered under the
provisions of this section when the laden weight or combined laden
weight of such vehicle is found to be in excess of that for which
registered. The penalty shall be imposed each and every time a
vehicle is found to be in violation of the registered laden weight
or combined laden weight.
The penalty shall be not less than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) when
such vehicle exceeds the laden weight or combined laden weight by
two thousand one (2,001) pounds; thereafter, an additional penalty
of not less than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) shall be imposed for each
additional one thousand (1,000) pounds or fraction thereof of weight
in excess of the registered laden weight or combined laden weight.
Such penalty shall not exceed the amount established by the
Corporation Commission pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of
Section 1167 of this title. Revenue from such penalties shall be
apportioned as provided in Section 1167 of this title.
K. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules for the mass renewal
of commercial vehicle registration for businesses that possess at
least ten vehicles registered as commercial vehicles under the
provisions of this section, provided that such mass renewal shall
not be mandatory for such businesses. For such mass renewal, the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 91

annual license fees described in subsections A and B of this section
shall be due and payable on January 1 of each year on such
commercial vehicles.
SECTION 47. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1134.4, as
amended by Section 159, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1134.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1134.4. A. For each motor vehicle registered in this
state and used for the purpose of transporting cotton modules from
the point of production to the first point of delivery or cotton
gin, the annual license fee shall be Sixty Dollars ($60.00). Fees
collected by Service Oklahoma pursuant to this section shall be
apportioned pursuant to Section 1104 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
B. Service Oklahoma shall design appropriate license plates for
all vehicles registered pursuant to this section. The license
plates shall be permanent in nature and shall be designed in a
manner as to remain with the vehicle for the duration of the
vehicle’s life span or until the title is transferred or the vehicle
is no longer used for the purposes specified in subsection A of this
section.
C. Any person, firm or corporation who transports cotton
modules without the license required in this section shall be deemed
guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be
punished as follows:
1. For the first such violation, by a fine of Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00);
2. For the second such violation, by a fine of One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00); and
3. For the third and subsequent violations, by a fine of not
less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five
Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).
D. A motor vehicle subject to the license requirement in this
section shall be exempt from the license required pursuant to
Section 1133 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 92

SECTION 48. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.1, as
last amended by Section 77, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.1. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons as provided by this section.
Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year.
Except as provided in subsection B of this section, special
license plates shall be renewed each year by Service Oklahoma or a
licensed operator. Service Oklahoma shall annually notify by mail
all persons issued special license plates. The notice shall contain
all necessary information and shall contain instructions for the
renewal procedure upon presentation to a licensed operator or
Service Oklahoma. The license plates shall be issued on a staggered
system. The licensed operator fees shall be paid out of the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund. Beginning January 1,
2023, the licensed operator fees shall be paid out of the Service
Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, except for Legislative License
Plates issued pursuant to paragraph 30 of subsection B of Section
1135.2 of this title, any registration fee required for such plate
pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to Section
1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and subject to
a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall determine, by
rule, a method for making required fee and registration period
adjustments if a special license plate is obtained during a twelve-
month period for which a registration fee has already been remitted
pursuant to Section 1132 of this title. The combination of fees in
a single remittance shall not alter the apportionment otherwise
provided for in this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 93

On and after January 1, 2022, if a physically disabled license
plate is issued pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection B of this
section, any registration fee required for such plate pursuant to
this section and the fee required pursuant to Section 1132 of this
title shall be remitted at the same time and subject to a single
registration period. Service Oklahoma shall determine, by rule, a
method for making required fee and registration period adjustments
when a physically disabled license plate is obtained during a
twelve-month period for which a registration fee has already been
remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title. The combination of
fees in a single remittance shall not alter the apportionment
otherwise provided for in this section.
B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. Political Subdivision Plates - such plates shall be designed
for any vehicle owned by any political subdivision of this state
having obtained a proper Oklahoma certificate of title. Such
political subdivisions shall file an annual report with the Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma stating the agency where such vehicle is
located. Such license plates shall be permanent in nature and
designed in such a manner as to remain with the vehicle for the
duration of the life span of the vehicle or until the title is
transferred to an owner who is not a political subdivision.
The registration fee shall be Eight Dollars ($8.00) and shall be
in addition to all other registration fees provided by law, except
the registration fees levied by Section 1132 of this title;
2. Tax-Exempt or Nonprofit License Plates - such plates shall
be designed for:
a. any motor bus, manufactured home, or mobile chapel and
power unit owned and operated by a religious
corporation or society of this state holding a valid
exemption from taxation issued pursuant to Section
501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 501(a), and listed as an exempt organization
in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as
amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and that is
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 94

used by the corporation or society solely for the
furtherance of its religious functions,
b. any vehicle owned and operated only by nonprofit
organizations devoted exclusively to youth programs
including, but not limited to, the Girl Scouts and Boy
Scouts of America,
c. any vehicle, except passenger automobiles, owned or
operated by nonprofit organizations actually involved
in programs for the employment of the handicapped and
used exclusively in the transportation of goods or
materials for such organization,
d. any vehicle owned and operated by a nonprofit
organization that provides older persons
transportation to and from medical, dental and
religious services and relief from business and social
isolation,
e. any vehicle owned and operated by a private nonprofit
organization that:
(1) warehouses and distributes surplus foods to other
nonprofit agencies and organizations, and
(2) holds a valid exemption from taxation issued
pursuant to Section 501(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section
501(c), and listed as an exempt organization in
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code,
as amended, and
(3) uses such vehicle exclusively for the
transportation of such surplus foods,
f. any vehicle which:
(1) is owned and operated by a private, nonprofit
organization which is exempt from taxation
pursuant to the provisions of Section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 95

501(c)(3), and which is primarily funded by a
fraternal or civic service organization with at
least one hundred local chapters or clubs, and
(2) is designed and used to provide mobile health
screening services to the general public at no
cost to the recipient, and for which no
reimbursement of any kind is received from any
health insurance provider, health maintenance
organization or governmental program, or
g. any vehicle owned and operated by the Civil Air
Patrol, a congressionally chartered corporation that
also serves an auxiliary of the United States Air
Force and which is exempt from taxation pursuant to
the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and is
used exclusively for its corporate missions of
aerospace education, cadet programs and emergency
services. Such license plates shall be permanent in
nature and designed in such a manner as to remain with
the vehicle for the duration of the life span of the
vehicle or until the title to such vehicle is
transferred to an owner who is not subject to this
exemption. Such vehicles shall be exempt from the
registration fees levied under Section 1132 of this
title, except that an initial registration fee of
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) shall apply to each
vehicle.
Any person claiming to be eligible for a tax-exempt or nonprofit
license plate under the provisions of this paragraph must have the
name of the tax-exempt or nonprofit organization prominently
displayed upon the outside of the vehicle, except those vehicles
registered pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph b of this
paragraph, unless such display is prohibited by federal or state law
or by state agency rules. No vehicle shall be licensed as a tax-
exempt or nonprofit vehicle unless the vehicle has affixed on each
side thereof, in letters not less than two (2) inches high and two
(2) inches wide, the name of the tax-exempt or nonprofit
organization or the insignia or other symbol of such organization
which shall be of sufficient size, shape and color as to be readily
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 96

legible during daylight hours from a distance of fifty (50) feet
while the vehicle is not in motion.
Except as provided in subparagraph g of this paragraph, the
registration fee shall be Eight Dollars ($8.00) and shall be in
addition to all other registration fees provided by law, except the
registration fees levied by Section 1132 of this title;
3. Physically Disabled License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for persons who are eligible for a physically disabled
placard under the provisions of Section 15-112 of this title. It
shall prominently display the international accessibility symbol,
which is a stylized human figure in a wheelchair. Service Oklahoma
shall also design physically disabled license plates for motorcycles
owned by persons who are eligible for a physically disabled placard
pursuant to the provisions of Section 15-112 of this title. Upon
the death of the physically disabled person, the disabled license
plate shall be returned to Service Oklahoma. There shall be no fee
for such plate in addition to the rate provided by the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act for the registration of the
vehicle. For an additional fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00), a person
eligible for a physically disabled license plate shall have the
option of purchasing a duplicate physically disabled special license
plate which shall be securely attached to the front of the vehicle.
The original physically disabled special license plate shall be
securely attached to the rear of the vehicle at all times.
Any person who is eligible for a physically disabled license
plate and whose vehicle has had modifications because of the
physical disability of the owner or of a family member within the
second degree of consanguinity of the owner, may register the
vehicle for a flat fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). This fee
shall be in lieu of all other registration fees provided by the
Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act;
4. Indian Tribal License Plates - such plates shall be designed
for any vehicle of a native Native American Indian Tribal
Association exempted in Sections 201 through 204 of Public Law 97-
473 and used by the tribal association exclusively for the
furtherance of its tribal functions.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 97

The registration fee shall be Eight Dollars ($8.00) and shall be
in addition to all other registration fees provided by law, except
the registration fees levied by Section 1132 of this title;
5. Hearing Impaired License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for persons who are hearing impaired. Such persons may
apply for a hearing-impaired license plate for each vehicle with a
rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon the presentment
of an application on a form furnished by Service Oklahoma and
certified by a physician holding a valid license to practice
pursuant to the licensing provisions of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, attesting that the person is hearing impaired. The
license plate shall be designed so that such persons may be readily
identified as being hearing impaired. There shall be no additional
fee for the plate, but all other registration fees provided by the
Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act shall apply;
6. Antique or Classic Vehicles License Plates – such plates
shall be designed and issued for any vehicle twenty-five (25) years
of age or older, based upon the date of manufacture thereof and
which travels on the highways of this state primarily incidental to
historical or exhibition purposes only.
The registration fee shall be Eight Dollars ($8.00) and shall be
in addition to all other registration fees provided by law, except
the registration fees levied by Section 1132 of this title. Any
person registering an antique or classic vehicle may elect to have
the vehicle registered for a ten-year period. The registration fee
for the elected ten-year registration shall be Seventy-five Dollars
($75.00). The licensed operator registering the antique or classic
vehicle for a ten-year period shall receive one hundred percent
(100%) of the fees the licensed operator would have otherwise
received pursuant to subsection A of Section 1141.1 of this title if
the antique or classic vehicle had been registered on an annual
basis; and
7. Honorary Consul License Plates – such plates shall be
designed to include the words “Honorary Consul” and issued to
persons who are honorary consuls authorized by the United States to
perform consular duties. Persons applying for such license plates
must show proof of standing as an honorary consul. The fee for such
plate shall be Eight Dollars ($8.00) and shall be in addition to all
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 98

other registration fees required by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act. The owner of the vehicle that possesses such
license plates shall return the special license plates to Service
Oklahoma if the owner disposes of the vehicle during the
registration year or ceases to be authorized to perform consular
duties.
C. Special license plates provided by this section shall be
designed in such a manner as to identify the use or ownership of the
vehicle. Use of any vehicle possessing a special license plate
provided by this section for any purpose not specified herein shall
be grounds for revocation of the special license plate and
registration certificate.
D. The Until December 31, 2022, the fees provided by this
section shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission
Reimbursement Fund. Beginning January 1, 2023, the fees provided by
this section shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Service
Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
SECTION 49. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.2, as
last amended by Section 80, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.2. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons in recognition of their service or awards as provided by
this section.
Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator. Service Oklahoma shall annually
notify all persons issued special license plates. Service Oklahoma
shall send the notifications to the electronic mail address provided
by the person. If a person does not provide an electronic mail
address, Service Oklahoma shall notify the person by mail. The
notice shall contain all necessary information and shall contain
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 99

instructions for the renewal procedure upon presentation to a
licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The license plates shall be
issued on a staggered system except for legislative plates and
amateur radio operator license plates.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant’s
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
registration of a motor vehicle. The Until December 31, 2022, the
licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications and renewals
shall be paid out of the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund.
Beginning January 1, 2023, the licensed operator fees for acceptance
of applications and renewals shall be paid out of the Service
Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. Prisoner of War License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for honorably discharged or present members of the United
States Armed Forces and civilians who were former prisoners of war
held by a foreign country and who can provide proper certification
of that status. Such persons may apply for a prisoner of war
license plate for no more than two vehicles with each vehicle having
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 100

a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The surviving
spouse of any deceased former prisoner of war, if the spouse has not
since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is terminated by
death, divorce, or annulment, may apply for a prisoner of war
license plate for one vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less. The fee provided by this section for the special
license plate authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to
all other registration fees provided by law, except the registration
fees levied by Section 1132 of this title;
2. National Guard License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for active or retired members of the Oklahoma National
Guard. Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide
proof of eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be
required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
3. Air National Guard License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for active or retired members of the Oklahoma Air National
Guard. Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide
proof of eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be
required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
4. United States Armed Forces License Plates - such plates
shall be designed for active, retired, former or reserve members of
the United States Armed Forces, and shall identify which branch of
service, and carry the emblem and name of either the Army, Navy, Air
Force, Marines or Coast Guard, according to the branch of service to
which the member belongs or did belong. Former members who have
been dishonorably discharged shall not be eligible for such plates.
Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of present
or past military service by presenting a valid Uniformed Services
Identity Card or the United States Department of Defense form DD
214. Retired or former members who are eligible for such plates
shall provide proof of eligibility upon initial application, but
shall not be required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
5. Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient License Plates - such
plates shall be designed for any resident of this state who has been
awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor. Such persons may apply
for a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient license plate for each
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
There shall be no registration fee for the issuance of this plate;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 101

6. Missing In Action License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor members of the United States Armed Forces who are
missing in action. The spouse of such missing person, if the spouse
has not since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is
terminated by death, divorce, or annulment, and each parent of the
missing person may apply for a missing in action license plate upon
presenting proper certification that the person is missing in action
and that the person making the application is the qualifying spouse
or the parent of the missing person. The qualifying spouse and each
parent of the missing person may each apply for the missing in
action license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity
of one (1) ton or less;
7. Purple Heart Recipient License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state presenting proper
certification from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
or the Armed Forces of the United States certifying that such
resident has been awarded the Purple Heart military decoration.
Such persons may apply for a Purple Heart recipient license plate
for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less. The surviving spouse of any deceased veteran who has been
awarded the Purple Heart military decoration, if such spouse has not
since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage has been terminated
by death, divorce or annulment, may apply for such plate for one
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
license plate created by this paragraph shall be exempt from the fee
provided by this section for special license plates;
8. Pearl Harbor Survivor License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state who can be verified by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of
the United States as being:
a. a member of the United States Armed Forces on December
7, 1941,
b. stationed on December 7, 1941, during the hours of
7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor,
the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to
exceed three (3) miles, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 102

c. a recipient of an honorable discharge from the United
States Armed Forces.
Such person may apply for a Pearl Harbor Survivor license plate
for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less;
9. Iwo Jima License Plates - such plates shall be designed for
any resident of this state who can be verified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United
States as being:
a. a member of the United States Armed Forces in February
of 1945,
b. stationed in February of 1945 on or in the immediate
vicinity of the island of Iwo Jima, and
c. a recipient of an honorable discharge from the United
States Armed Forces.
Such person may apply for an Iwo Jima license plate for each
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
Such license plate shall have the legend “Oklahoma OK” and shall
contain three letters and three numbers. Between the letters and
numbers shall be a logo of the flag-raising at Iwo Jima. Below the
letters, logo and numbers, the plate shall contain the words “FEB.”
at the left, “Iwo Jima” in the center and “1945” at the right. Such
plates shall not be subject to the design requirements of any other
license plates prescribed by law other than the space for the
placement of the yearly decals for each succeeding year of
registration after the initial issue;
10. D-Day Survivor License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state who can be verified by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of
the United States as being:
a. a member of the United States Armed Forces on June 6,
1944,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 103

b. a participant in the Allied invasion of the coast of
Normandy on June 6, 1944; provided, if such
participation cannot be verified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of
the United States, the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma
may, in its discretion, accept evidence of such
participation from the person applying for the license
plate, and
c. a recipient of an honorable discharge from the United
States Armed Forces.
Such person may apply for a D-Day Survivor license plate for
each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
11. Killed in Action License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor members of the United States Armed Forces who were
killed in action. The spouse of the deceased person, if the spouse
has not remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is terminated by
death, divorce, or annulment, may apply for a killed in action
license plate upon presenting proper certification that the person
was killed in action and that the person making the application is
the qualifying spouse of the deceased person. The qualifying spouse
may apply for a killed in action license plate for no more than two
vehicles with each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1)
ton or less. The fee provided by this section for the special
license plate authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to
all other registration fees provided by law, except the registration
fees levied by Section 1132 of this title. Beginning November 1,
2021, the killed in action license plate shall be designed to honor
members of the United States Armed Forces who were killed in action
while engaged in combat with a hostile force. The parents,
siblings, half-siblings, grandparents or spouse of the deceased
person, if the spouse has not remarried, or if remarried, the
remarriage is terminated by death, divorce or annulment, may apply
for a killed in action license plate upon presenting proper
certification that the person was killed in action and that the
person making the application is the qualifying spouse or family
member of the deceased person. The qualifying spouse or family
member may apply for a killed in action license plate for no more
than two vehicles with each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity
of one (1) ton or less. The license plate shall have a white
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 104

background and the legend “Killed in Action” and shall contain any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven in
black, as for personalized license plates. To the left of the
numbers and letters shall be the Battlefield Cross in gold. The
killed in action license plate shall be exempt from any minimum
issuance criteria related to license plate applications;
12. Gold Star Families License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor members of the United States Armed Forces who were
killed while on active duty. The parents, siblings, half-siblings
or grandparents of the deceased person may apply for a gold star
license plate upon presenting proper certification that the person
was killed while on active duty and that the person making the
application is the parent, sibling, half-sibling or grandparent of
the deceased person. The family member may apply for a gold star
families license plate for no more than two vehicles with each
vehicle having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
The fee provided by this section for the special license plate
authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by law, except the registration fees
levied by Section 1132 of this title;
13. Military Decoration License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state who has been awarded the
Distinguished Service Medal, the Distinguished Service Cross, the
Distinguished Flying Cross, the Bronze Star military decoration or
the Silver Star military decoration. Such persons may apply for a
military decoration license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
14. Vietnam Veteran License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for honorably discharged or present members of the United
States Armed Forces who served in the Vietnam Conflict. Such
persons may apply for a Vietnam veteran license plate for each
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
15. Police Officer License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any currently employed, reserve or retired municipal
police officer or full-time, reserve or retired university police
officer certified by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and
Training or common education police officer certified by the Council
on Law Enforcement Education and Training. Police officers may
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 105

apply for police officer license plates for vehicles with a rated
capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a motorcycle upon proof of
employment by or retirement from a municipal, university or common
education police department by either an identification card or
letter from the chief of the police department or the Oklahoma
Police Pension and Retirement Board. Retirees who are eligible for
such plates shall provide proof of eligibility upon initial
application but shall not be required to provide proof of
eligibility annually. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with municipal police departments of this state;
provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design
to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in
order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
16. World War II Veteran License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor honorably discharged former members of the United
States Armed Forces who are residents of this state and who can be
verified by the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma, the
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United
States as having served on federal active duty anytime during the
period from September 16, 1940, to December 7, 1945. The former
members may apply for a World War II Veteran license plate for
vehicles with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
The license plate shall have the legend “Oklahoma” and shall
contain, in the center of the plate, either the Thunderbird Insignia
of the 45th Infantry Division in the prescribed red and gold
coloring or the emblem of the Army, Navy, U.S. Army Air Corps,
Marines or Coast Guard according to the branch of service to which
the member belonged. For the purpose of license plate
identification, the plate shall contain four digits, two digits at
the left and two digits at the right of the insignia or emblem.
Centered on the bottom of the license plate shall be the words
“WORLD WAR II”;
17. Korean War Veteran License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor honorably discharged former members of the United
States Armed Forces who are residents of this state and who can be
verified by the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma, the
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United
States as having served on federal active duty anytime during the
period from June 27, 1950, to January 31, 1955, both dates
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 106

inclusive. The former members may apply for a Korean War Veteran
license plate for vehicles with a rated carrying capacity of one (1)
ton or less.
The license plate shall have the legend “OKLAHOMA” and shall
contain, in the center of the plate, either the Thunderbird Insignia
of the 45th Infantry Division in the prescribed red and gold
coloring or the emblem of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines or
Coast Guard according to the branch of service to which the member
belonged. For the purpose of license plate identification, the
plate shall contain four digits, two digits at the left and two
digits at the right of the insignia or emblem. Centered on the
bottom of the license plate shall be the word “KOREA”;
18. Municipal Official License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for persons elected to a municipal office in this state and
shall designate the name of the municipality and the district or
ward in which the municipal official serves. The plates shall only
be produced upon application;
19. Red Cross Volunteer License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor American Red Cross volunteers and staff who are
residents of this state. Such persons must present an
identification card issued by the American Red Cross and bearing a
photograph of the person. The license plate shall be designed with
the assistance of the American Red Cross and shall have the legend
“Oklahoma OK!” in the color Pantone 186C Red. Below the legend the
symbol of the American Red Cross and no more than three letters and
three numbers shall be in the color Pantone 186C Red. Below the
symbol and letters and numbers shall be the words “American Red
Cross” in black. The plates shall not be subject to the design
requirements of any other license plates prescribed by law other
than the space for the placement of the yearly decals for each
succeeding year of registration after the initial issue;
20. Desert Storm License Plates - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any honorably discharged or present member of the
United States Armed Forces who served in the Persian Gulf Crisis and
the Desert Storm operation. Such persons may apply for a Desert
Storm license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity
of one (1) ton or less;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 107

21. Military Reserve Unit License Plates - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member of
a reserve unit of the United States Armed Forces. Such persons may
apply for a Military Reserve Unit license plate for each vehicle
with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
22. Oklahoma City Bombing Victims and Survivors License Plates
- such plates shall be designed and issued to any victim or survivor
of the bombing attack on the Alfred P. Murrah Federal Building in
downtown Oklahoma City on April 19, 1995;
23. Civil Air Patrol License Plates - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of the Civil Air
Patrol. Such persons may apply for a Civil Air Patrol license plate
for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less upon proof of membership in the Civil Air Patrol. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the Civil Air Patrol;
24. Ninety-Nines License Plates - such plates shall be designed
and issued to members of the Ninety-Nines. Persons applying for
such license plate must show proof of membership in the Ninety-
Nines. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Ninety-Nines;
25. Combat Infantryman Badge License Plates – such plates shall
be designed to honor recipients of the Combat Infantryman Badge.
The plate shall have the legend “Oklahoma OK”. Below the legend
shall be the Combat Infantryman Badge and three numbers. Below the
badge and the numbers shall be the words “Combat Infantryman Badge”.
Such persons may apply for a Combat Infantryman Badge license plate
for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less;
26. Somalia Combat Veterans License Plates – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member
of the United States Armed Forces who saw combat in the United
Nations relief effort. Such persons may apply for a Somalia Combat
Veteran license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less;
27. Police Chaplain License Plates – such plates shall be
designed and issued to members of the International Conference of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 108

Police Chaplains (ICPC) who have completed the ICPC requirements for
basic certification as a police chaplain. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the ICPC;
28. Joint Service Commendation Medal License Plates – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state
who has been awarded the Joint Service Commendation Medal by the
United States Secretary of Defense;
29. Merchant Marine License Plates - such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs, and issued to any
person who during combat was a member of the Merchant Marines as
certified by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs. Such
license plate may be issued for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less;
30. Legislative License Plates - such plates shall be designed
for persons elected to the Oklahoma Legislature and shall designate
the house of the Legislature in which the legislator serves and the
district number;
31. Disabled Veterans License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for persons presenting proper certification from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the
United States certifying such veteran has a service-connected
disability rating of fifty percent (50%) or more, regardless which
agency pays the disability benefits, or that such veteran has been
awarded a vehicle by the United States government or receives a
grant from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for the
purchase of an automobile due to a service-connected disability
rating or due to the loss of use of a limb or an eye. Such persons
may apply to Service Oklahoma for a disabled veterans license plate
or to a licensed operator for a regular license plate for no more
than two vehicles with each vehicle having a rated carrying capacity
of one (1) ton or less. The surviving spouse of any deceased
disabled veteran, if the spouse has not since remarried, or if
remarried, the remarriage is terminated by death, divorce, or
annulment, or a surviving spouse in receipt of Dependency and
Indemnity Compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, may apply for a disabled veterans license plate for one
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 109

fee provided by this section for the special license plate
authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by law, except the registration fees
levied by Section 1132 of this title. The total expense of this
license plate shall not exceed Five Dollars ($5.00).
If the person qualifies for a disabled veterans license plate
and is also eligible for a physically disabled placard under the
provisions of Section 15-112 of this title, the person shall be
eligible to receive a disabled veterans license plate that also
displays the international accessibility symbol, which is a stylized
human figure in a wheelchair. Upon the death of the disabled
veteran with a disabled veterans license plate with the
international accessibility symbol, the plate shall be returned to
Service Oklahoma;
32. United States Air Force Association License Plates - such
plates shall be designed for members of the United States Air Force
Association. Persons applying for such license plate must show
proof of membership in the Association. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Association;
33. Oklahoma Military Academy Alumni License Plates - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state
who is an alumnus of the Oklahoma Military Academy. Such persons
may apply for an Oklahoma Military Academy Alumnus license plate for
each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Oklahoma Military Academy and shall contain the shield of the
Academy;
34. Amateur Radio Operator License Plates – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person, holding a valid operator’s
license, technician class or better, issued by the Federal
Communications Commission, and who is also the owner of a motor
vehicle currently registered in Oklahoma, in which has been
installed amateur mobile transmitting and receiving equipment.
Eligible persons shall be entitled to two special vehicle
identification plates as herein provided. Application for such
identification plates shall be on a form prescribed by Service
Oklahoma and the plates issued to such applicant shall have stamped
thereon the word “Oklahoma” and bear the official call letters of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 110

the radio station assigned by the Federal Communications Commission
to the individual amateur operator thereof. All applications for
such plates must be made to Service Oklahoma on or before the first
day of October of any year for such plates for the following
calendar year and must be accompanied by the fee required in this
section together with a certificate, or such other evidence as
Service Oklahoma may require, of proof that applicant has a valid
technician class or better amateur operator’s license and proof of
applicant’s ownership of a vehicle in which radio receiving and
transmitting equipment is installed. Applicants shall only be
entitled to one set of special identification plates in any one (1)
year, and such calendar year shall be stamped thereon. The right to
such special identification plates herein provided for shall
continue until the amateur radio operator’s license of the person to
whom such plates are issued expires or is revoked;
35. American Legion License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for members of the American Legion. Persons applying for
such license plate must show proof of membership. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the American Legion of
Oklahoma;
36. Deputy Sheriff License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any currently employed or retired county sheriff or
deputy sheriff. County sheriffs or deputy sheriffs may apply for
such plates for vehicles with a rated capacity of one (1) ton or
less upon proof of employment by or retirement from a county
sheriff’s office by either an identification card or letter from the
county sheriff or a government-sponsored retirement board from which
the county sheriff or deputy sheriff may be receiving a pension.
Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of
eligibility upon initial application but shall not be required to
provide proof of eligibility annually. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the county sheriff offices of this
state;
37. Gold Star Surviving Spouse License Plates – such plates
shall be designed to honor the surviving spouses and children of
qualified veterans. As used in this paragraph, “qualified veteran”
shall mean:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 111

a. any person honorably discharged from any branch of the
United States Armed Forces or as a member of the
Oklahoma National Guard, who died as a direct result
of the performance of duties for any branch of the
United States Armed Forces or Oklahoma National Guard
while on active military duty, or
b. any person honorably discharged from any branch of the
United States Armed Forces or as a member of the
Oklahoma National Guard, who died as a result of
injury, illness or disease caused by the performance
of such duties while on active duty, whether the death
occurred while on active duty or after the honorable
discharge of such person.
The fee provided by this section for the special license plate
authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by law, except the registration fees
levied by Section 1132 of this title;
38. Korea Defense Service Medal License Plates – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state who has
been awarded the Korea Defense Service Medal by the United States
Secretary of Defense. Such persons may apply for a Korea Defense
Service Medal license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less;
39. 180th Infantry License Plates – such plates shall be
designed for members and prior members of the 180th Infantry.
Persons applying for such license plate must obtain and provide
proof of their membership from the 180th Infantry Association. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the 180th
Infantry;
40. Operation Iraqi Freedom Veteran License Plates – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or
present member of the United States Armed Forces who served in
Operation Iraqi Freedom. Such person may apply for an Operation
Iraqi Freedom Veteran license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle;
provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 112

to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in
order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
41. United States Air Force Academy Alumni License Plates -
such plates shall be designed and issued to any resident of this
state who is an alumnus of the United States Air Force Academy.
Such persons may apply for a United States Air Force Academy Alumnus
license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less;
42. Operation Enduring Freedom Veteran License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or
present member of the United States Armed Forces who served in
Operation Enduring Freedom on or after September 11, 2001. The
license plate shall be designed in consultation with the Military
Department of the State of Oklahoma. Such person may apply for an
Operation Enduring Freedom Veteran license plate for each vehicle
with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a
motorcycle; provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of
similar design to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a
new design in order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle
license plate;
43. Military Multi-Decoration License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member
of the United States Armed Forces who qualifies for more than one
military decoration license plate pursuant to the provisions of this
section. Service Oklahoma shall develop and implement a system
whereby the designs of the eligible license plates can be included
together on a single license plate. Such person may apply for a
Military Multi-Decoration license plate for each vehicle with a
rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
44. Global War on Terror Expeditionary License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or
present member of the United States Armed Forces who has earned a
Global War on Terror Expeditionary decoration. The license plate
shall be designed in consultation with the United States Institute
of Heraldry and the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma.
Such person may apply for a Global War on Terror Expeditionary
license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 113

45. Legion of Merit Medal Recipient License Plates - such
plates shall be designed for any resident of this state presenting
proper certification from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United States certifying that
such resident has been awarded the Legion of Merit military
decoration. Such persons may apply for a Legion of Merit recipient
license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma;
46. 1-179th License Plates - such plates shall be designed for
members, prior members and members of the household of a member or
former member of the 1-179th Infantry. Persons applying for such
license plate must obtain and provide proof of their membership
association with the 1-179th Infantry Association. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the 1-179th Infantry;
47. 2-179th License Plates - such plates shall be designed for
members, prior members and members of the household of a member or
former member of the 2-179th Infantry. Persons applying for such
license plate must obtain and provide proof of their membership
association with the 2-179th Infantry Association. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the 2-179th Infantry;
48. Combat Action Ribbon Recipient License Plates - such plates
shall be designed to honor recipients of the Combat Action Ribbon
who present proper certification from the United States Department
of the Navy. The license plate shall include the Combat Action
Ribbon earned by the recipient. Such persons may apply for a Combat
Action Ribbon Recipient license plate for vehicles having a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
49. Oklahoma Submarine Veterans License Plate – such plates
shall be designed for any resident of this state who is a United
States submarine veteran and presents either a Department of Defense
form 214 or other documentation certifying such service. Such
persons may apply for an Oklahoma Submarine Veterans license plate
for vehicles having a rated capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
license plate design shall include both gold and silver dolphins to
represent both officer and enlisted service members;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 114

50. United States Navy Seabees and Civil Engineer Corps License
Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably
discharged or present member of the United States Navy Seabees or
Civil Engineer Corps. Such persons may apply for a United States
Navy Seabees and Civil Engineer Corps license plate for vehicles
having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
license plate shall be designed in consultation with the Military
Department of the State of Oklahoma;
51. Combat Action Badge Recipient License Plate - such plates
shall be designed to honor recipients of the Combat Action Badge who
present proper certification from the United States Army. The
license plate shall include the Combat Action Badge earned by the
recipient. Such persons may apply for a Combat Action Badge
Recipient license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the
license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design to the
license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to
meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
52. Iraq Combat Veteran License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member of
the United States Armed Forces who saw combat in Operation Iraqi
Freedom. Such persons may apply for an Iraq Combat Veteran license
plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate for
motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate for motor
vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space requirements
for a motorcycle license plate;
53. Afghanistan Combat Veteran License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present
member of the United States Armed Forces who saw combat in Operation
Enduring Freedom. Such persons may apply for an Afghanistan Combat
Veteran license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the
license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design to the
license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to
meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
54. Special Forces Association License Plates – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 115

member of the Army Special Forces qualified and authorized to wear
upon the person’s United States military uniform the Army Special
Forces Tab. Persons applying for the Special Forces Association
license plate must provide a copy of the orders awarding the Special
Forces Tab or authorizing its wear upon a United States military
uniform. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with
the Special Forces Association, Chapter 32-50. Service Oklahoma
shall produce up to two distinct designs for the Special Forces
Association license plate. Qualified persons may select one design
at the time of application. The plates shall be issued to any
qualified person in any combination of numbers and letters from one
to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates;
55. Veterans of the United States Armed Forces License Plates –
such plates shall be designed for veterans of the United States
Armed Forces, and shall identify the branch of service, carry the
emblem and name of either the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines or
Coast Guard, according to the branch of service to which the member
belonged, and shall reflect veteran status. Former members who have
been dishonorably discharged shall not be eligible for such plates.
Persons applying for such license plates must show proof of past
military service by presenting a valid United States Department of
Defense Form (DD)214 upon initial application but shall not be
required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
56. Navy Chief License Plates - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any resident of this state who has achieved the rank
of E7 through E9 in the United States Navy and presents proper
certification that the resident has achieved such rank and was
either honorably discharged or is an active or retired member of the
United States Navy. Such persons may apply for a Navy Chief license
plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate for
motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate for motor
vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space requirements
for a motorcycle license plate;
57. Air Medal License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any resident of this state who has earned the Air Medal
and presents proper certification that the resident has been awarded
such medal. The license plate shall include an image of the Air
Medal earned by the recipient. Such persons may apply for an Air
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 116

Medal license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of
one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license
plate for motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate
for motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space
requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
58. a. U.S. Army Ranger License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who
is an active, retired, or honorably discharged member
of a U.S. Army Ranger unit, or who is a graduate of
the U.S. Army Ranger School. Persons applying for the
U.S. Army Ranger License Plate shall provide military
orders or official documentation proving the
applicant’s eligibility, including:
(1) military orders detailing a past or current
assignment to a U.S. Army Ranger unit,
(2) military orders awarding the Ranger Tab
authorized by the U.S. Army,
(3) certificate of release or discharge from active
duty, DD Form 214, or report of separation and
record of service, NGB form 22, indicating the
awarding of the Ranger Tab, or
(4) diploma issued to the applicant from the U.S.
Army Ranger School.
b. In addition to the documentation listed above, an
active military member shall present a valid military
identification card or a document that shows
sufficient proof that the applicant is an active
member of the military. A retired or honorably
discharged member of the military shall present:
(1) a certified copy of the member’s release or
discharge from active duty, DD Form 214,
honorable discharge certificate, United States
Department of Defense Form 256, or report of
separation and record of service, NGB form 22,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 117

which has an honorable discharge
characterization, or
(2) a valid form DD2 (retired) military
identification card. Such persons may apply for
a U.S. Army Ranger License Plate for vehicles
having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the
license plate for motorcycles may be of similar
design to the license plate for motor vehicles or
may be a new design in order to meet space
requirements for a motorcycle license plate. The
license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Military Department of the State of
Oklahoma;
59. 45th Infantry Brigade Combat Team License Plate - such
plates shall be designed for members, former members, and members of
the household of a member or former member of the 45th Infantry
Brigade Combat Team. Persons applying for such license plate shall
obtain and provide suitable proof of their membership association
with the 45th Infantry Brigade Combat Team. Such persons may apply
for a 45th Infantry Brigade Combat Team License Plate for vehicles
having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a
motorcycle; provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of
similar design to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a
new design in order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle
license plate. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma; and
60. Meritorious Service Medal License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any resident of this state who has earned
the Meritorious Service Medal and presents proper certification that
the resident has been awarded such medal. The license plate shall
include an image of the Meritorious Service Medal earned by the
recipient. Such persons may apply for a Meritorious Service Medal
license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate
for motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate for
motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space
requirements for a motorcycle license plate.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 118

C. Unless otherwise provided by this section, the fee for such
plates shall be Eight Dollars ($8.00) and shall be in addition to
all other registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License
and Registration Act. Such Until December 31, 2022, such fees shall
be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be
used for the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act. Beginning January 1, 2023, such fees shall be
deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle
License and Registration Act.
SECTION 50. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.3, as
last amended by Section 85, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.3. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons wishing to demonstrate support, interest or membership to or
for an organization, occupation, cause or other subject as provided
by this section.
Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by Service
Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1) year.
Service Oklahoma shall notify by mail all persons issued special
license plates. The notice shall contain all necessary information
and shall contain instructions for the renewal procedure upon
presentation to a licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The
license plates shall be issued on a staggered system.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 119

registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant’s
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
registration of a motor vehicle. The Until December 31, 2022, the
licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications and renewals
shall be paid out of the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund.
Beginning January 1, 2023, the licensed operator fees for acceptance
of applications and renewals shall be paid out of the Service
Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
If fewer than one hundred of any type of special license plates
authorized prior to January 1, 2004, are issued prior to January 1,
2006, Service Oklahoma shall discontinue issuance and renewal of
that type of special license plate. Any such authorized special
license plate registrant shall be allowed to display the license
plate upon the designated vehicle until the registration expiration
date. After such time the expired special license plate shall be
removed from the vehicle.
Except as otherwise provided in law, for special license plates
authorized on or after July 1, 2004, no special license plates shall
be developed or issued by Service Oklahoma until Service Oklahoma
receives one hundred (100) prepaid applications therefor. The
prepaid applications must be received by Service Oklahoma within one
hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of the authorization
or the authority to issue shall be null and void. In the event one
hundred (100) prepaid applications are not received by Service
Oklahoma within such prescribed time period any payment so received
shall be refunded accordingly.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 120

B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. Round and Square Dance License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
round and square dancing;
2. National Association for the Advancement of Colored People
License Plate - such plates shall be designed, subject to the
criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by the NAACP, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the NAACP;
3. National Rifle Association License Plate - such plates shall
be designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the National Rifle Association, and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the National Rifle Association;
4. Masonic Fraternity License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
a Masonic Fraternity of Oklahoma. Such persons may apply for a
Masonic Fraternity license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Masonic
Fraternity membership or upon the presentment of an application for
a Masonic Fraternity license plate authorized and approved by the
Grand Lodge of Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Masonic Fraternities of Oklahoma and shall
contain the Masonic emblem;
5. Shriners Hospitals for Children License Plate - such plates
shall be designed to demonstrate support for Shriners Hospitals for
Children and shall be issued to any resident of this state who is a
member of a Shriners Temple in Oklahoma. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Shriners Temples in Oklahoma and
shall contain the Shriners emblem;
6. Balloonists License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for hot air
ballooning in this state;
7. Order of the Eastern Star License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member
of an Order of the Eastern Star. Such persons may apply for an
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 121

Order of the Eastern Star license plate for each vehicle with a
rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of an
Order of the Eastern Star membership or upon the presentment of an
application for an Order of the Eastern Star license plate
authorized and approved by the organization. The license plate
shall be designed in consultation with the Order of the Eastern Star
and shall contain the Order of the Eastern Star emblem;
8. Knights of Columbus License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
the Knights of Columbus. Such persons may apply for a Knights of
Columbus license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Knights of Columbus
membership or upon the presentment of an application for a Knights
of Columbus license plate authorized and approved by the
organization. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Knights of Columbus and shall contain the Knights of
Columbus emblem;
9. Jaycees License Plate - such plates shall be designed and
issued to members of the Jaycees. Persons applying for such license
plate must show proof of membership in the Jaycees. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Jaycees;
10. Kiwanis International License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to members of Kiwanis International. Persons
applying for such license plate must show proof of membership in
Kiwanis International. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Kiwanis International;
11. Certified Public Accountants License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a
Certified Public Accountant. Such persons may apply for a Certified
Public Accountant license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of status as a
Certified Public Accountant. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of Certified Public
Accountants;
12. Civil Emergency Management License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate
support for the state civil emergency management system. Persons
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 122

applying for such license plate must show proof of official
affiliation by presenting a nonexpired proof of employment,
affiliation or retirement in the form of an identification card or
letter on official letterhead from a municipal, county or state
emergency management department head;
13. Civilian Conservation Corps License Plate – such plates
shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma, by the Civilian Conservation Corps Association, and issued
to any person wishing to demonstrate support of the Civilian
Conservation Corps;
14. Rotarian License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any resident of this state who is a member of a Rotary
Club of Oklahoma. Such persons may apply for a Rotarian license
plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less upon proof of a Rotary Club membership or upon the
presentment of an application for a Rotarian license plate
authorized and approved by a Rotary Club of Oklahoma. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the five Rotarian
District Governors and shall contain the Rotarian emblem;
15. Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks License Plate –
such plates shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented
to Service Oklahoma, by the Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks,
and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of the
Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks;
16. Humane Society License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Humane Society of the United States. The plates shall be issued
to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to
a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate
shall contain the official Humane Society logo;
17. Oklahoma Mustang Club License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma,
by the Oklahoma Mustang Club, and issued to any resident of this
state who is a member of the Oklahoma Mustang Club. Such persons
may apply for an Oklahoma Mustang Club license plate upon
presentment of proof of membership in the Oklahoma Mustang Club.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 123

numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates;
18. American Business Clubs (AMBUCS) License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to members of American Business
Clubs. Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of
membership in AMBUCS. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with American Business Clubs;
19. West Point 200th Anniversary License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to commemorate
the Two Hundredth Anniversary of the founding of the United States
Military Academy at West Point, New York. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the West Point Society of Central
Oklahoma;
20. Oklahoma Aquarium License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma Aquarium. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Aquarium. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Oklahoma Aquarium License Plate
is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2021;
21. The Pride of Broken Arrow License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for The Pride of Broken Arrow marching band. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Broken Arrow Public School System;
22. Fellowship of Christian Athletes License Plate - such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Fellowship of
Christian Athletes and issued to members and supporters of the
Fellowship of Christian Athletes;
23. Parrothead Club License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to members and supporters of the Parrothead
Club. The license plate shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven as
for personalized license plates;
24. Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person who is a member of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 124

Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition;
25. Electric Lineman License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Oklahoma’s electric linemen. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Electric Superintendent’s
Association;
26. Alpha Kappa Alpha License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Alpha Kappa
Alpha Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Alpha Kappa Alpha
Sorority;
27. The National Pan-Hellenic Council Incorporated License
Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support to any of the nine sororities and
fraternities recognized by the National Pan-Hellenic Council
Incorporated. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of the National Pan-Hellenic Council
Incorporated;
28. Organ, Eye and Tissue License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support and
increase awareness for organ, eye and tissue donation. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the State Department
of Health;
29. Central Oklahoma Habitat for Humanity License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to
demonstrate support and increase awareness for Habitat for Humanity.
The license plate shall be designed in consultation with Central
Oklahoma Habitat for Humanity;
30. Family Career and Community Leaders of America Incorporated
License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to persons
wishing to demonstrate support for Family Career and Community
Leaders of America Incorporated. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with Family Career and Community Leaders of
America Incorporated;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 125

31. Delta Sigma Theta License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Delta Sigma
Theta Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Delta Sigma Theta Sorority
Incorporated;
32. Omega Psi Phi License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person who is a member of Omega Psi Phi
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Omega Psi Phi Fraternity Incorporated;
33. Alpha Phi Alpha License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Alpha Phi Alpha
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Alpha Phi Alpha Fraternity
Incorporated;
34. 50th Anniversary of the Interstate System of Highways
License Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to persons
wishing to commemorate the 50th Anniversary of the Interstate System
of Highways. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the American Association of State Highway and Transportation
Officials;
35. Kappa Alpha Psi License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Kappa Alpha Psi
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity
Incorporated;
36. Sigma Gamma Rho License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Sigma Gamma Rho
Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Chapter of Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority Incorporated.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the Sigma
Gamma Rho License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1,
2013;
37. Multiple Sclerosis License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
and increase awareness of multiple sclerosis. The license plates
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 126

shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the
National Multiple Sclerosis Society;
38. Frederick A. Douglass High School License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for Frederick A. Douglass High School located in
Oklahoma City. The plates shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of Frederick A. Douglass High School National Alumni
Association;
39. United States Air Force Academy License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the United States Air Force Academy;
40. In God We Trust License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to include the motto, “In God We Trust”, and shall be
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the motto;
41. National Weather Center License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the National Weather Center in Norman. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the National
Weather Center Directors;
42. Make-A-Wish Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Make-A-Wish Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the National Make-A-Wish
Foundation;
43. South Central Section of the PGA Foundation License Plate -
such plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to
demonstrate support for the South Central Section of the PGA
Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the South Central Section of the PGA Foundation;
44. Putnam City High School License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Putnam City High School. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of Putnam City High School Alumni
Association, Inc.;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 127

45. Autism Awareness License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to increase awareness of
autism. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Autism Network;
46. Oklahoma Blood Institute License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Oklahoma Blood Institute. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Blood Institute;
47. Zeta Phi Beta and Phi Beta Sigma License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person who is a member of
Zeta Phi Beta Sorority or Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma chapters
of Zeta Phi Beta Sorority Incorporated and Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity
Incorporated;
48. Star Spencer High School License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Star Spencer High School located in Oklahoma City. The plates
shall be designed in consultation with representatives of the Star
Spencer High School Alumni Association. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Star Spencer High School
License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2015;
49. Northeast High School License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Northeast High School located in Oklahoma City. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Northeast High
School Alumni Association;
50. Oklahoma City Central High School License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma City Central High School Alumni
Association. The plates shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of the Oklahoma City Central High School Alumni
Association;
51. Oklahoma Rifle Association License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma Rifle Association. The plates shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 128

designed in consultation with representatives of the Oklahoma Rifle
Association;
52. Oklahoma City Thunder License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma City Thunder. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma City Thunder organization;
53. Ovarian Cancer Awareness License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to increase awareness
of ovarian cancer. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the HOPE in Oklahoma organization;
54. BMW Car Club of America License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the BMW Car Club of America. The plates shall be issued to any
person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a
maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the Sunbelt Chapter of
the BMW Car Club of America. Subject to the provisions of
subsection A of this section, the BMW Car Club of America License
Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2013;
55. Don’t Tread On Me License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to include the yellow background and rattlesnake emblem
above the motto “DON’T TREAD ON ME” as found on the historic Gadsden
flag, and shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the freedom and liberty of the Republic;
56. Oklahomans for the Arts License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for arts, culture and creative industries as well as arts education.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Oklahomans for the
Arts;
57. Tulsa Oilers License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa Oilers. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Tulsa Oilers organization;
58. Tulsa Drillers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 129

the Tulsa Drillers. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Tulsa Drillers organization;
59. Millwood School District License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Millwood School District. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Millwood School
District;
60. Booker T. Washington High School License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Booker T. Washington High School and shall be designed in
consultation with the Booker T. Washington High School National
Alumni Association;
61. Oklahoma Current State Flag License Plate – such plates
shall be designed to include the current Oklahoma state flag and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the current
Oklahoma state flag. The plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Friends of the Oklahoma History Center;
62. Oklahoma Original State Flag License Plate – such plates
shall be designed to include the original Oklahoma state flag and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the original
Oklahoma state flag. The plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Friends of the Oklahoma History Center. The plates shall
be issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters
from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the
Oklahoma Original State Flag License Plate is hereby reauthorized
effective November 1, 2015;
63. Tulsa 66ers License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa 66ers. The plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Tulsa 66ers Organization;
64. Frederick Bombers License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Frederick
School District and shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of the Frederick School District;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 130

65. 911 Dispatcher License Plate – such plates shall be issued
to persons wishing to demonstrate support for 911 dispatchers.
Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of current
employment as a 911 dispatcher or sign an attestation that they are
a currently employed or retired 911 dispatcher;
66. Oklahoma Fosters License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
Fosters Initiative and shall be designed in consultation with the
Oklahoma Fosters Initiative;
67. Red Dirt Jeep License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Red Dirt
Jeep and such plates shall be designed in consultation with Red Dirt
Jeep, L.L.C.;
68. Sons of the American Revolution License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the
Sons of the American Revolution for a vehicle or motorcycle in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. Such plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of the Sons of the
American Revolution. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of
similar design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the
space requirements of a motorcycle license plate;
69. Daughters of the American Revolution License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Daughters of the American Revolution for a vehicle or motorcycle
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of the Daughters
of the American Revolution. The license plate for a motorcycle may
be of similar design as space permits or a new design in order to
meet the space requirements of a motorcycle license plate;
70. Air Medal License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to Air Medal recipients. An individual requesting the
license plate is required, at the time of application, to show proof
he or she is a recipient of the Air Medal or sign an attestation
stating that he or she is a medal recipient. The plates shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 131

designed to include the Air Medal emblem and shall include the words
“Air Medal” on the plate;
71. Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the
Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy License Plate is hereby
reauthorized effective November 1, 2021;
72. The Pride of Oklahoma Marching Band License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Pride of Oklahoma marching band. The
plates shall be designed in consultation with the University of
Oklahoma;
73. The Spirit of Oklahoma State Marching Band License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Spirit of Oklahoma State marching band.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Oklahoma State
University;
74. Southeast Spartans License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Southeast High School Spartans and such plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Southeast High School Alumni Association;
75. Catoosa High School License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Catoosa High School located in Catoosa. The plates shall bear the
image of the Catoosa High School mascot and be designed in
consultation with representatives of Catoosa High School;
76. Toastmasters International License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Toastmasters International and shall be designed in consultation
with District 16 of Toastmasters International;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 132

77. Millwood High School Alumni License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Millwood High School Alumni. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Millwood High
School Alumni Association;
78. Patriot Guard Riders License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for Patriot Guard
Riders and shall be designed in consultation with the Patriot Guard
Riders of Oklahoma;
79. Bixby School District License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Bixby School District. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of the Bixby School District;
80. Oklahoma Renewable Energy License Plate – such plates shall
be designed in consultation with the Advanced Power Alliance and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for renewable
energy;
81. Scottish Rite Masons License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
the Scottish Rite Masons. Such persons may apply for a Scottish
Rite Masons license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Scottish Rite
membership. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Scottish Rite Masons in Oklahoma and shall contain the
Scottish Rite emblem;
82. New State Brand License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the new
Oklahoma brand. The license plates shall contain the new state
brand;
83. Tulsa Flag License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the City
of Tulsa. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Tulsa Community Foundation;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 133

84. ROAD License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Recovering
Oklahomans After Disaster. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Recovering Oklahomans After Disaster
organization;
85. Tulsa Icon License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa community for a vehicle or motorcycle in a pre-numbered format
or any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
six for vehicles or one to a maximum of five for motorcycles, as for
personalized plates. The plate design for vehicles will include
Tulsa’s iconic Golden Driller and Route 66 Rising sculpture. The
license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar design as space
permits or a new design in order to meet the space requirements of a
motorcycle license plate;
86. ORA License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
Rifle Association. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Rifle Association;
87. Hallett Motor Racing Circuit License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Hallett Motor Racing Circuit. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Hallett Motor Racing
Circuit;
88. University of Kansas License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Kansas. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Kansas and/or the University of
Kansas Alumni Association; and
89. Clinton Red Tornadoes License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Clinton Red Tornadoes. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Clinton Public School System.
C. The fee for such plates shall be Fifteen Dollars ($15.00)
per year of renewal and shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 134

Registration Act. Unless otherwise provided in this section, until
December 31, 2022, the fee shall be apportioned as follows: Eight
Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the special license plate fee
shall be deposited in the Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be
used for the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act and the remaining Seven Dollars ($7.00) per year of
renewal of the special license plate fee shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title. Beginning January 1, 2023,
Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the special license
plate fee shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Service
Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration of the
Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act and the remaining
Seven Dollars ($7.00) per year of renewal of the special license
plate fee shall be apportioned by Service Oklahoma as provided in
Section 1104 of this title.
SECTION 51. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.4, as
last amended by Section 89, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.4. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue personalized license plates. The personalized
license plates shall be issued on a staggered system except for
vintage decals.
Personalized special license plates shall not be transferred to
any other person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer
of ownership and retained. The personalized special license plate
may then be used on another vehicle but only after such other
vehicle has been registered for the current year.
Personalized special license plates shall be renewed each year
by Service Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by
Service Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1)
year. Service Oklahoma shall notify by mail all persons issued
special license plates. Service Oklahoma shall send the
notifications to the electronic mail address provided by the person.
If a person does not provide an electronic mail address, Service
Oklahoma shall notify the person by mail. The notice shall contain
all necessary information and shall contain instructions for the
renewal procedure upon presentation to a licensed operator or
Service Oklahoma. The Until December 31, 2022, licensed operator
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 135

fees for renewals shall be paid out of the Oklahoma Tax Commission
Reimbursement Fund. Beginning January 1, 2023, the licensed
operator fees for acceptance of applications and renewals shall be
paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a personalized license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
B. Such plates shall be designed and issued for the following:
1. Any person in any combination of numbers or letters from one
to a maximum of seven;
2. Persons eligible for two or more of the military decoration
special license plates provided for in this title. Such plates may
be issued in any combination of emblems. However, such plates shall
only display up to three emblems and shall also display any
combination of letters or numbers from one to a maximum of three;
3. Motorcycles in any combination of numbers or letters from
one to a maximum of six;
4. Persons eligible for Korean War Veteran license plates
provided for in this title. Such plates may display any combination
of letters or numbers up to three on each side of the insignia or
emblem;
5. Persons eligible for World War II Veteran license plates
provided for in this title. Such plates may display any combination
of letters or numbers up to three on each side of the insignia or
emblem; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 136

6. Persons owning vehicles which are twenty-one (21) years and
older are qualified to submit for approval by Service Oklahoma or a
licensed operator a vintage but expired official Oklahoma license
plate which is twenty-one (21) years and older. Upon approval of
such personalized plate, the owner shall be issued the annual
registration decal which Service Oklahoma or the licensed operator
shall direct to be affixed.
C. The fee for such plates shall be Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per
year of renewal and shall be in addition to all other registration
fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the personalized tag
fee shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement
Fund to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle
License and Registration Act. Twelve Dollars ($12.00) per year of
renewal of the personalized tag fee shall be apportioned as provided
in Section 1104 of this title. Beginning January 1, 2023, Eight
Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the personalized tag fee
shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Service Oklahoma
Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act. Twelve Dollars ($12.00) per
year of renewal of the personalized tag fee shall be apportioned by
Service Oklahoma as provided in Section 1104 of this title.
SECTION 52. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.5, as
last amended by Section 92, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.5. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons wishing to demonstrate support and provide financial
assistance as provided by this section.
Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year with a licensed operator.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by Service
Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1) year.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 137

Service Oklahoma shall notify by mail all persons issued special
license plates. The notice shall contain all necessary information
and shall contain instructions for the renewal procedure upon
presentation to a licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The
license plates shall be issued on a staggered system.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant’s
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
registration of a motor vehicle through June 30, 2025. Through June
30, 2025, the licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications
and renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund. Beginning July 1, 2023, fees shall not be retained by the
licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this
title.
If fewer than fifty (50) of any type of special license plates
authorized prior to January 1, 2004, are issued prior to January 1,
2006, Service Oklahoma shall discontinue issuance and renewal of
that type of special license plate. Any such authorized special
license plate registrant shall be allowed to display the license
plate upon the designated vehicle until the registration expiration
date. After such time the expired special license plate shall be
removed from the vehicle.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 138

For special license plates authorized on or after July 1, 2004,
no special license plates shall be developed or issued by Service
Oklahoma until Service Oklahoma receives one hundred prepaid
applications therefor. The prepaid applications must be received by
Service Oklahoma within one hundred eighty (180) days of the
effective date of the authorization or the authority to issue shall
be null and void. In the event one hundred prepaid applications are
not received by Service Oklahoma within such prescribed time period
any payment so received shall be refunded accordingly.
B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. University or College Supporter License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support to any state-supported or private university or college. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
apportioned as provided in Section 1104.1 of this title;
2. Environmental Awareness License Plate - such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Department of Environmental Quality in consultation
with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support to implement the statewide general public
Environmental Education Program created pursuant to the provisions
of the Oklahoma Environmental Quality Code. Such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person in any combination of numbers and
letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license
plates. A dealer’s license plate issued pursuant to Section 1116.1
or 1128 of this title may be designated an Environmental Awareness
License Plate upon payment of the fee imposed by this section and
any other registration fees required by the Oklahoma Vehicle License
and Registration Act. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be apportioned pursuant to Section 1104.2 of
this title;
3. Firefighter License Plate - such plates shall be designed
for any career or retired firefighter, volunteer or paid.
Firefighters may apply for firefighter plates for up to four
vehicles with a rated capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a
motorcycle upon proof of a fire department membership by either an
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 139

identification card or letter from the chief of the fire department.
Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of
eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be required to
provide proof of eligibility annually. The surviving spouse of any
deceased firefighter, if the spouse has not since remarried, may
apply for a firefighter license plate for one vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a motorcycle upon
proof that the deceased firefighter was a member of a fire
department by either an identification card or letter from the chief
of the fire department. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma State Firefighters Association.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be deposited to the Oklahoma State Firemen’s Museum Building &
Memorial Fund for support of the Oklahoma State Firefighters Museum
and the Oklahoma Fallen and Living Firefighters Memorial;
4. Wildlife Conservation License Plate - such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Department of Wildlife Conservation in consultation
with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for wildlife conservation in this state through
the Wildlife Diversity Fund, provided for in Section 3-310 of Title
29 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Such plates may be designed and issued
to any person as for personalized license plates.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be apportioned pursuant to subsection D of Section 3-310 of
Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Child Abuse Prevention License Plate - such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State
Department of Health and the Child Abuse Prevention Action
Committee, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the prevention of child abuse.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be deposited in the Child Abuse Prevention Fund;
6. United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee Supporter
License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 140

person wishing to demonstrate support for the United States Olympic
and Paralympic Committee. The plates shall be issued to any person
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate shall contain
the official United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee logo.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a
licensing agreement with the United States Olympic and Paralympic
Committee for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment not
more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each license plate
issued;
7. Oklahoma History License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate interest in
Oklahoma history. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited to the Oklahoma Historical Society
Revolving Fund to be used for educational purposes;
8. Historic Route 66 License Plate - such:
a. vehicle plates shall be designed to honor historic
Route 66, also known as the “Mother Road”. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected for each vehicle license plate shall be
apportioned to the Oklahoma Historical Society
Revolving Fund to be distributed to the Route 66
Museum located in Clinton, Oklahoma, and
b. motorcycle plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Route 66 Association, Inc. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Oklahoma Route 66 Association,
Inc., for any licensing fees which may be required in
order to use the Oklahoma Route 66 Association, Inc.,
logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Oklahoma Route 66 Association,
Inc., of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each motorcycle license plate issued;
9. Heart of the Heartland License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to honor the victims of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 141

the terrorist bombing attack on the Alfred P. Murrah Federal
Building in downtown Oklahoma City on April 19, 1995. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Heart of the Heartland Scholarship Fund, as established in
Section 2282 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Emergency Medical Technician License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person who is an emergency
medical technician. Such persons may apply for an emergency medical
technician license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of an emergency medical
technician’s license. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Emergency Medical Technicians
Association. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be apportioned to the Emergency Medical Personnel
Death Benefit Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2505.2 of Title 63
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Fight Breast Cancer License Plate - such plates shall be
designed to demonstrate support for the prevention and treatment of
breast cancer in this state;
12. Crime Victims Awareness License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
awareness of and support for victims of crimes. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Crime Victims
Compensation Program. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be apportioned to the Attorney General’s
Revolving Fund for the Office of the Attorney General, which is
hereby directed to use such funds to contract with a statewide
nonprofit organization to provide services to crime victims;
13. Safe Kids Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support and
awareness of Safe Kids Oklahoma. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Safe Kids Oklahoma. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Children’s Hospital - Safe Kids Oklahoma Revolving Fund to be
distributed to Safe Kids Oklahoma program;
14. Oklahoma Four-H Club License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 142

the Four-H Foundation, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support of the Oklahoma Four-H Club. Such plates may be
designed and issued to any person as for personalized license
plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected
shall be apportioned to the OSU Extension Service License Plate
Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.4 of this title;
15. Agricultural Awareness License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma,
by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in
consultation with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any
person wishing to demonstrate support of the Department’s Ag in the
Classroom Education Program. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section
1104.3 of this title;
16. Oklahoma Statehood Centennial License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to commemorate
the centennial of Oklahoma’s admission to statehood in 1907. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Capitol Complex and Centennial Commemoration Commission. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Oklahoma Department of Commerce Revolving Fund
created in Section 5012 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Support Education License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
the State Department of Education in consultation with the Oklahoma
Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for education in this state. All licensed operators shall
display a sample of the Support Education License plate in the area
of the business accessed by the public. Twenty-three Dollars
($23.00) of the fee collected shall be apportioned as follows:
a. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the Education
Reform Revolving Fund,
b. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education Revolving Fund,
c. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the State
Career-Technology Fund, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 143

d. eighty-five percent (85%) shall be deposited to the
Teachers’ Retirement Benefit Fund as set forth in
Section 17-108 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
However, when the Teachers’ Retirement Benefit Fund attains a
seventy percent (70%) funded ratio based on an annual actuarial
valuation as required by law, the amount of the fee shall be
apportioned equally pursuant to subparagraphs a, b and c of this
paragraph;
18. Retired Oklahoma Highway Patrol Officers License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any retired officer of
the Oklahoma Highway Patrol. The license plate shall have the
legend “Oklahoma” and shall contain, in the center of the plate, the
Highway Patrol Officers patch using the same colors and pattern as
used in the patch. Centered on the bottom of the license plate
shall be the word “Retired”. The letters “TRP” shall be used in
combination with three numbers on either side of the insignia or
emblem. The color of the letters and numbers shall be brown.
Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of
eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be required to
provide proof of eligibility annually. The surviving spouse of any
deceased retired officer of the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, if the
spouse has not since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is
terminated by death, divorce, or annulment, may apply for a Retired
Oklahoma Highway Patrol Officers license plate. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited into the
Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement Fund;
19. Boy Scouts of America Supporter License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Boy Scouts of America. The plates shall be issued
to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to
a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate
shall contain the official Boy Scouts of America logo. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Boy Scouts of America for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the Boy Scouts of America
logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment
to the Boy Scouts of America of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 144

20. Urban Forestry and Beautification License Plate – such
plates shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to
Service Oklahoma, by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,
and Forestry in consultation with nonprofit organizations in this
state that develop and operate programs to encourage urban forestry
and beautification, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support of such programs. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section 1104.5
of this title;
21. Oklahoma State Parks Supporter License Plate – such plates
shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
state parks system. Twenty-three Dollars ($23.00) of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department Revolving Fund. Such money shall be designated for and
may only be expended for the support of Oklahoma state parks;
22. Adoption Creates Families License Plate – such plates shall
be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support of pregnant
women who are committed to placing their children for adoption and
wishing to provide assistance to guardians, adoptive parents and
other created families to assist in the adoption and placement of
children in permanent, safe homes. The license plates shall be
designed and final terminology delivered in consultation with the
Oklahoma Adoption Coalition and the Department of Human Services.
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the fee collected shall be deposited
in a revolving fund established in the State Treasury for and to be
used by the Department of Human Services for the implementation of
the Investing in Stronger Oklahoma Families Act specifically for
created families;
23. Choose Life License Plate – such plates shall be designed,
subject to criteria presented to Service Oklahoma, by Choose Life
America, Inc., and issued to any person who wishes to demonstrate
support of organizations that encourage adoption as a positive
choice for women with unplanned pregnancies. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Choose Life Assistance Program Revolving Fund established in Section
1104.6 of this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 145

24. Future Farmers of America License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma FFA Association (formerly known as Future Farmers of
America). The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma FFA Association Board of Directors. As provided in
this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104.7 of this title;
25. Lions Club License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Lions
Clubs of Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Lions Service Foundation
and shall contain the official logo of the International Association
of Lions Clubs. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Lions Service Foundation.
The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma
Lions Service Foundation of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) for
each license plate issued;
26. Color Oklahoma License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
the Oklahoma Native Plant Society, and issued to any person wishing
to demonstrate support for preserving and planting wildflowers and
native plants in this state and to promote Oklahoma’s wildflower
heritage through education. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section
1104.8 of this title;
27. Girl Scouts of the United States of America Supporter
License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any
person wishing to demonstrate support for the Girl Scouts of the
United States of America. The plates shall be issued to any person
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate shall contain
the official Girl Scouts of the United States of America logo.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Girl Scouts of the United States of
America for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use
the Girl Scouts of the United States of America logo or design. The
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 146

licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Magic Empire
Council of Girl Scouts, acting on behalf of all Oklahoma Girl Scout
councils, of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
28. Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon. The plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the Oklahoma City
Memorial Marathon logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon of not
more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
29. Oklahoma Scenic Rivers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to demonstrate support for the Grand River Dam Authority.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Scenic Rivers operations of the Grand River Dam Authority. Twenty-
five Dollars ($25.00) of the fee shall be apportioned to the Grand
River Dam Authority for the purposes of the Oklahoma Scenic Rivers
operations;
30. Fight Cancer License Plate – such plates shall be designed
to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Central Cancer Registry.
The plate shall contain the American Cancer Society logo. The
American Cancer Society logo shall be used in accordance with the
American Cancer Society’s branding guidelines and shall only be
utilized to support the Oklahoma Central Cancer Registry. Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) of the fee shall be apportioned to the Oklahoma
Central Cancer Registry Revolving Fund;
31. Animal Friendly License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
controlling the overpopulation of dogs and cats through educational
and sterilization efforts. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Veterinary Medical Association. Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) of the fee collected shall be designated by the
purchaser of the plate to be deposited in the Oklahoma Pet
Overpopulation Fund created in Section 2368.13 of Title 68 of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 147

Oklahoma Statutes or the Animal Friendly Revolving Fund created in
Section 1104.10 of this title;
32. Patriot License Plate - such plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Oklahoma
residents who are members of the Oklahoma National Guard and
deployed on active duty. The plates shall be issued to any person
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. As provided in this
section, a portion of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Patriot License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.11 of
this title;
33. Global War on Terrorism License Plate - such plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Military Department of the State
of Oklahoma and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Oklahoma residents who are members of the Armed Forces of the
United States or Oklahoma National Guard that have served in the
Global War on Terrorism. The plate shall be issued to any person in
any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.
As provided in this section, a portion of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Oklahoma National Guard Museum Fund created in
Section 235.1 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Boys and Girls Clubs of America Supporter License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Boys and Girls Clubs of America. The
plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers
and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized
license plates. The plate shall contain the official Boys and Girls
Clubs of America logo. Service Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter
into a licensing agreement with the Boys and Girls Clubs of America
for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Boys and Girls Clubs of America logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Boys and Girls Clubs of
America of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
35. Oklahoma Quarter Horse License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the American Quarter Horse in this state. The plate shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 148

designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Quarter Horse
Association. As provided in this section, a portion of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Quarter Horse Revolving
Fund created in Section 1104.12 of this title;
36. Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License Plate – such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Association for the Deaf and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for Oklahoma residents who are deaf. The plates
shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers and
letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license
plates. As provided in this section, a portion of the fee collected
shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License
Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.15 of this title;
37. Oklahoma City Zoo License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
City Zoo. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Zoological Society, Inc. As provided in this section,
an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma
Zoological Society Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.13 of this
title;
38. March of Dimes License Plate – such plates shall be issued
to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the March of Dimes
mission to improve the health of babies by preventing birth defects,
premature birth and infant mortality. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter March of Dimes.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Oklahoma Prevent Birth Defects, Premature Birth and
Infant Mortality Fund established in Section 1104.14 of this title;
39. Support Our Troops Supporter License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Support Our Troops Incorporated. The plates shall be
issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from
one to a maximum of six. The plate shall contain the official
Support Our Troops Incorporated logo which includes the mark
“Support Our Troops” across the bottom of the plate. Service
Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter into a licensing agreement with
Support Our Troops Incorporated for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the Support Our Troops Incorporated logo or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 149

design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Support Our Troops Incorporated of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for
each license plate issued;
40. Folds of Honor Supporter License Plate – such plates shall
be authorized to be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma City Chapter of Folds of Honor
Incorporated, a nonprofit charitable organization exempt from
taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), providing educational scholarships to
spouses and children of America’s fallen and disabled military
service members. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.
Such person may apply for a Folds of Honor Supporter license plate
for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be
of similar design to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be
a new design in order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle
license plate. The plate shall be designed in consultation with the
Oklahoma City Chapter of Folds of Honor Incorporated and shall
contain the official Folds of Honor Incorporated logo which includes
the mark “Folds of Honor” across the bottom of the plate. Service
Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter into a licensing agreement with
Folds of Honor Incorporated for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the Folds of Honor Incorporated logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Folds of Honor Incorporated of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each
license plate issued. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of
this section, the Folds of Honor Supporter License Plate is hereby
reauthorized effective November 1, 2019;
41. Armed Forces Veterans Motorcycle License Plate – such
plates shall be designed for use on a motorcycle in consultation
with A Brotherhood Aiming Toward Education of Oklahoma, Inc.
(ABATE), and issued to any honorably discharged former member of the
United States Armed Forces wishing to demonstrate support for the
Oklahoma National Guard Museum. Persons applying for such license
plate must show proof of past military service. As provided in this
section, a portion of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Oklahoma National Guard Museum Fund created in Section 235.1 of
Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 150

42. Buffalo Soldier License Plate - such plates shall be issued
to any person wishing to honor and celebrate the history and
contribution of the Buffalo Soldiers. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Lawton-Fort Sill Chapter of the
Buffalo Soldiers 9th and 10th (Horse) Cavalry Association. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Buffalo Soldier License Plate Revolving Fund
created in Section 1104.16 of this title;
43. Prevent Blindness Oklahoma License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for vision screening of school age children in this state. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with Prevent
Blindness Oklahoma. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be deposited in the Prevent Blindness Oklahoma
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.17 of this
title;
44. Oklahoma State Capitol Restoration License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for restoration of the Oklahoma State Capitol
building. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Friends of the Capitol corporation, created pursuant to Section
15.4 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes and the State Capitol
Preservation Commission created pursuant to Section 4102 of Title 74
of the Oklahoma Statutes. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Friends of the
Capitol License Plate Revolving Fund established in Section 1104.18
of this title;
45. Eastern Red Cedar Tree License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
removal of Eastern Redcedar trees from lands in the state and to
develop marketable uses for the harvested trees. The license plate
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry. Twenty-three Dollars ($23.00) of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Eastern Redcedar
Revolving Fund created in Section 18-407 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. The money shall be designated for and may only be
expended for the purposes as set forth in the Eastern Redcedar
Management Act;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 151

46. Pancreatic Cancer Research License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the University of Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer
Research Fund. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.
The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the
University of Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer Research Fund.
As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Pancreatic Cancer Research License Plate Revolving
Fund created in Section 1104.19 of this title;
47. Alzheimer’s Research License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the
Oklahoma Chapter of the Alzheimer’s Association. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the
Alzheimer’s Association. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Alzheimer’s Research
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.20 of this
title;
48. Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the Oklahoma Hospice and Palliative Care Association. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Hospice and Palliative Care Association. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate Revolving Fund created in
Section 1104.21 of this title;
49. Juvenile Diabetes Research License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the Oklahoma Chapters of the Juvenile Diabetes Research
Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapters of the Juvenile Diabetes Research
Foundation. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Juvenile Diabetes Research
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.22 of this
title;
50. Deer Creek Schools Foundation License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 152

for the Deer Creek Schools Foundation. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Deer Creek Schools Foundation.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Deer Creek Schools
Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.23
of this title;
51. Lupus Awareness and Education License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support
for the Oklahoma Chapter of the Lupus Foundation of America. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Chapter of the Lupus Foundation of America. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Oklahoma Lupus License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section
1104.24 of this title. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of
this section, the Lupus Awareness and Education License Plate is
hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2018;
52. Chiefs of Police License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the
Oklahoma Association of Chiefs of Police for a vehicle or motorcycle
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Association of Chiefs
of Police. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar
design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the space
requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma shall
be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma
Association of Chiefs of Police for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the association’s logo or design. The
licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma
Association of Chiefs of Police of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Chiefs of Police License Plate
is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2015;
53. Crossings Christian School License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Crossings Christian School located in Oklahoma City.
The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 153

administration of Crossings Christian School. Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with
Crossings Christian School for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the school’s logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Crossings Christian
School of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
54. Hilldale Education Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Hilldale Education Foundation. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the administration of the
Hilldale Education Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized
to enter into a licensing agreement with the Hilldale Education
Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Hilldale Education Foundation of not
more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
55. Oklahoma Nurses License Plate – such plates shall be issued
to any person licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act
and providing such documentation of current licensure as may be
required by Service Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Nurses Association. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Oklahoma Nurses License Plate Revolving Fund created in
Section 1104.26 of this title;
56. Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the administration of the Oklahoma Sports Hall
of Fame. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Hall of
Fame’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a
payment to the Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame of not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
57. Childhood Cancer Awareness License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Oklahoma Children’s Cancer Association. The license plates shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 154

designed in consultation with the administration of the Oklahoma
Children’s Cancer Association. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized
to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Children’s
Cancer Association for any licensing fees which may be required in
order to use the Oklahoma Children’s Cancer Association’s logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
Oklahoma Children’s Cancer Association of not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
58. Oklahoma Educational Television Authority License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Educational Television
Authority and such plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Authority. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in The Educational Television Authority
Revolving Fund created in Section 156 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
59. Remembering Fallen Heroes License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Concerns of Police Survivors, Inc. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Concerns of
Police Survivors, Inc. As provided in this section, an amount of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Concerns of
Police Survivors License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section
1104.27 of this title;
60. Disabled American Veterans License Plate – such plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Disabled American
Veterans of Oklahoma and issued to any member of the organization
wishing to demonstrate support. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Disabled
American Veterans of Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The
licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Disabled
American Veterans of Oklahoma of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued. The plates shall
incorporate a numbering system agreed upon by the Disabled American
Veterans of Oklahoma and Service Oklahoma;
61. Owasso Rams Supporter License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 155

the Owasso Rams, and shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of Owasso Public Schools. The plates shall be
issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from
one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund created in Section
34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. Collinsville Cardinals Supporter License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Collinsville Cardinals, and shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of Collinsville Public
Schools. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an
amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education
Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
63. Sperry Pirates Supporter License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Sperry Pirates, and shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of Sperry Schools. The plates shall be issued to
any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a
maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. As provided
in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited
in the Education Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of
Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
64. Skiatook Bulldogs Supporter License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Skiatook Bulldogs, and shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of Skiatook Public Schools. The
plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers
and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized
license plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund
created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
65. Rejoice Christian Eagles Supporter License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Rejoice Christian Eagles, and shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 156

designed in consultation with representatives of Rejoice Christian
Schools. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an
amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education
Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
66. East Central Cardinals Supporter License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the East Central Cardinals, and shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of East Central High
School. The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination
of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform
Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
67. Southeast Spartans Supporter License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Southeast Spartans, and shall be designed in
consultation with the Southeast High School Alumni Association. The
plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers
and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized
license plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund
created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
68. Sooner State ABATE License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for Sooner
State ABATE (A Brotherhood Against Totalitarian Enactments). The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with Sooner State
ABATE. The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination
of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized plates. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of
similar design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the
space requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with Sooner
State ABATE for any licensing fees, which may be required in order
to use the association’s logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to Sooner State ABATE of not more than
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 157

Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued. Subject to
the provisions of subsection A of this section, the Sooner State
ABATE License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1,
2019;
69. Oklahoma License to Educate License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Oklahoma educators. Such plates shall be designed in
consultation with the State Department of Education. As provided in
this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in
the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Revolving Fund created in Section
6-132 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
70. Piedmont Education Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation. Such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Foundation. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation
License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.28 of this
title;
71. The Pride of Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Pride of Oklahoma marching band and shall be designed in
consultation with the Pride of Oklahoma marching band. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with the University of Oklahoma or the Pride of Oklahoma marching
band for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use
the applicable logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Pride of Oklahoma Fund at the
University of Oklahoma Foundation, Inc. of not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
72. Jenks Trojans License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Jenks school district. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Jenks school district.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Jenks school district for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the school district’s logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 158

Jenks school district not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
73. Bixby Spartans License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Bixby school district. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Bixby school district.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Bixby school district for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the school district’s logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
Bixby school district not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
74. Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics License
Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma aviation industry
and to promote awareness of aviation and aerospace. Such plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of
Aerospace and Aeronautics and shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) of
the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Department of
Aerospace and Aeronautics Revolving Fund, for expenditure as
provided in Section 91 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
75. Ducks Unlimited License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Ducks Unlimited. Such plates shall be designed in consultation with
Ducks Unlimited. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
a licensing agreement with Ducks Unlimited for any licensing fee
which may be required in order to use the Ducks Unlimited logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Ducks Unlimited of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
76. Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate - such
plates shall be issued to any person wishing to increase awareness
of those who are currently prisoners of war or missing in action and
provide financial support for current veterans. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with Rolling Thunder Oklahoma. As
provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 159

deposited in the Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate
Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.29 of this title;
77. Woodward Boomers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Woodward school district. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the administration of the Woodward school
district. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Woodward school district for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the school
district’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Woodward school district not more than Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
78. Clinton Public School Foundation License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Clinton Public School Foundation. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Clinton
Public School Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
enter into a licensing agreement with the Clinton Public School
Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the school foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to the Clinton Public School Foundation
of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate
issued;
79. Navajo School Foundation License Plate – such plates shall
be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Navajo School Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Navajo School
Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Navajo School Foundation for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Navajo School Foundation of not more than
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
80. Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. License Plate – such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Music
Hall of Fame Inc. and issued to any member of the organization
wishing to demonstrate support. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 160

Music Hall of Fame Inc. for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Music Hall of
Fame Inc. of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued. The plates shall incorporate a numbering system
agreed upon by the Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. and Service
Oklahoma. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this
section, the Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. License Plate is
hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2019;
81. Techlahoma Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the
Techlahoma Foundation. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Techlahoma Foundation. The plate shall be
issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from
one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the Techlahoma Foundation for any licensing fees,
which may be required in order to use the association’s logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
Techlahoma Foundation of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
82. Bethany Public Schools Foundation License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Bethany Public Schools Foundation. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the administration of the Bethany
Public Schools Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
enter into a licensing agreement with the Bethany Public Schools
Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the Foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Bethany Public Schools Foundation of
not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
83. Cystic Fibrosis Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Cystic Fibrosis Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of the Cystic Fibrosis
Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 161

for a payment to the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation of not more than
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
84. Down Syndrome Association of Central Oklahoma License Plate
- such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Down Syndrome Association of Central
Oklahoma. Such plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Association. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee
collected shall be deposited in the Down Syndrome Association of
Central Oklahoma License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section
1104.30 of this title;
85. Elk City Education Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Elk City Education Foundation. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Foundation. As provided in this
section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the
Elk City Education Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund created
in Section 1104.31 of this title;
86. A Brotherhood Aiming Toward Education of Oklahoma (ABATE)
License Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any
person wishing to provide financial support for ABATE of Oklahoma.
Such plates shall be designed in consultation with ABATE of
Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized plates. The license plate for a motorcycle may
be of similar design as space permits or a new design in order to
meet the space requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with ABATE of Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the ABATE of Oklahoma logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to ABATE of Oklahoma of not
more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
87. Downed Bikers Association License Plate - such plates shall
be designed for a vehicle or motorcycle in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates, and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Downed Bikers Association, a nonprofit
charitable organization exempt from taxation pursuant to the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 162

501(c)(3), which provides emotional and financial support for downed
bikers. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with
the Central Oklahoma Chapter of the Downed Bikers Association and
shall contain any official logo or design of the organization. The
license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar design as space
permits or a new design in order to meet the space requirements of a
motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter
into a licensing agreement with the Downed Bikers Association for
any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Downed Bikers Association of not more
than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate;
88. Eagle Scout License Plate – such plates shall be designed
to demonstrate support for Eagle Scouts of the Boy Scouts of America
and shall include the Eagle Scout logo. Plates may be issued to any
person who can show proof of having obtained the rank of Eagle
Scout. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the various Oklahoma local councils for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the applicable
logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment
of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate
issued to the specific Oklahoma local area council designated by the
applicant;
89. Extraordinary Educators License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to provide financial
support for common education in this state. Such plates shall be
designed in consultation with the State Department of Education.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount
of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Extraordinary
Educators License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.32 of
this title;
90. Former Oklahoma Legislator License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person who previously served as
a member of the House of Representatives or Senate. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Historical Society. As provided in this section, an amount of the
fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Historical Society
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 163

Capital Improvement and Operations Revolving Fund created in Section
1.10a of Title 53 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Service Oklahoma shall
create and maintain a list of former members of the Oklahoma House
of Representatives and Oklahoma State Senate eligible to be issued
such plates; provided, that no former member of the House of
Representatives and Senate shall be eligible to possess more than
two of such plates at any one time. Service Oklahoma shall confer
as needed with the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and
the Secretary of the Senate to confirm that such list is complete
and accurate;
91. Monarch Butterfly License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the operations of The Nature Conservancy of Oklahoma. Such plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of The
Nature Conservancy. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter
into a licensing agreement with The Nature Conservancy of Oklahoma
for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
foundation’s logo or design. The plates shall be issued to any
person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a
maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to The Nature Conservancy of
Oklahoma not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
92. Oklahoma Tennis Foundation License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Tennis
Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide
for a payment to the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation of not more than
Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
93. Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars License Plate - such
plates shall be designed to honor the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign
Wars Chapters and shall be issued to any resident of this state upon
proof of membership in the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars
organization. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars organization. Service
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 164

Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars organization for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars
organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued. Service Oklahoma shall reinstate any Veterans
of Foreign Wars license plates issued prior to November 1, 2021, and
shall reimburse any individual who held a Veterans of Foreign Wars
License Plate on October 31, 2021, for fees incurred for the
replacement of such plate;
94. Oklahoma Women Veterans Organization License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any female veteran of any
branch of the United States Armed Forces wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma Women Veterans Organization. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Women
Veterans Organization. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Women Veterans
Organization for any licensing fees which may be required in order
to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Women Veterans
Organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued;
95. FIRST (For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and
Technology) in Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be issued
to any person wishing to demonstrate support for FIRST in Oklahoma
Robotics programs. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the administration of FIRST in Oklahoma. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with FIRST in Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the FIRST in Oklahoma logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to FIRST in Oklahoma not more
than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
96. Pittsburg State University License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Pittsburg State University. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with Pittsburg State University.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with Pittsburg State University for any licensing fees
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 165

which may be required in order to use the school foundation’s logo
or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
the Pittsburg State University of not more than Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for each license plate issued;
97. Greenwood Historical District License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa Juneteenth Festival held in the Greenwood Historical District
in Tulsa, Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Black Wall Street Chamber of
Commerce. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the Tulsa Juneteenth Festival for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Festival’s
logo or design. For each license plate issued, the licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment of Twenty-five Dollars
($25.00) of the fee collected to the Tulsa Juneteenth Festival and
an additional Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee collected shall be
deposited in the Public School Classroom Support Revolving Fund, for
expenditure as provided in Section 1-123 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
98. Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary Chapters
License Plate - such plates shall be designed to honor the Oklahoma
Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary Chapters and issued to any
resident of this state upon proof of membership in the Oklahoma
Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization in this state. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma
Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization. Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the
Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars
Auxiliary organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
99. Transportation to Transportation License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to support
county roads and bridges. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Association of County Commissioners of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 166

Oklahoma. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee collected shall be
paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the license
plate was purchased to be credited to the county highway fund
created pursuant to Section 1503 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
100. Blue Star Mothers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person showing proof of membership in an
Oklahoma Chapter of Blue Star Mothers of America, Inc. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with Blue Star Mothers of
America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with Blue Star
Mothers of America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the Blue Star Mothers of
America logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a
payment to Blue Star Mothers of America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One
not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
101. Oklahoma Golf License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the sport of golf in this state. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the South Central Section of the
Professional Golfers’ Association of America and issued to any
person wishing to demonstrate support for the sport of golf in this
state. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with the South Central Section of the
Professional Golfers’ Association of America for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the organization’s logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the
South Central Section of the Professional Golfers’ Association of
America of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
102. Paramedic License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person who is a paramedic. Such persons may apply
for a paramedic license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less or a motorcycle upon proof of a
paramedic license. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma State University-Oklahoma City
Paramedicine program and the Oklahoma Emergency Medical Technicians
Association. The letters “PM” shall be placed on the plate followed
by four random numbers, or such numbers as requested by such persons
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 167

applying for the plate. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fees
collected shall be deposited in the Emergency Medical Personnel
Death Benefit Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2505.2 of Title 63
of the Oklahoma Statutes. Subject to the provisions of subsection A
of this section, the Paramedic License Plate is hereby reauthorized
effective November 1, 2022;
103. National Defense Service Medal License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to those persons who have received the
National Defense Service Medal and wish to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter
into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Department of Veterans
Affairs for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use
the Department’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs
of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate
issued;
104. University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any past or present member of
the University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS upon providing proof of
membership in the organization as may be required by Service
Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the University
of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS for any licensing fees which may be required in
order to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Mike James RUF/NEKS
Memorial Scholarship of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
105. Tulsa Community College License Plate – such plates shall
be issued to persons wishing to support Tulsa Community College.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Tulsa Community
College. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a
licensing agreement with Tulsa Community College for any licensing
fees which may be required in order to use the organization’s logo
or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Tulsa Community College of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 168

106. Street Kings Car Club License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Street Kings Car Club in Guthrie. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Street Kings Car Club. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement
with the Street Kings Car Club for any licensing fees which may be
required in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The
licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Street Kings
Car Club not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license
plate issued;
107. Epilepsy Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Epilepsy Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Epilepsy Foundation of Oklahoma. Service
Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into licensing agreements with
the Epilepsy Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required
in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment to the Epilepsy Foundation of
not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;
108. America First License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the proclamation of “America First”. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with Warriors for Freedom and the Honoring
America’s Warriors Foundations. Service Oklahoma shall be
authorized to enter into licensing agreements with the Warriors for
Freedom and Honoring America’s Warriors Foundations for any
licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
Foundations’ logos or designs. The licensing agreements shall
provide for a payment to the Honoring America’s Warriors Foundation
of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) and a payment to the Warriors
for Freedom Foundation of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) for
each license plate issued;
109. Diabetes Awareness License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to provide financial
support for Diabetes Solutions of Oklahoma. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with Diabetes Solutions of
Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
licensing agreements with Diabetes Solutions of Oklahoma for any
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 169

licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Diabetes
Solutions of Oklahoma logos or designs. The licensing agreements
shall provide for a deposit to the Diabetes Awareness License Plate
Revolving Fund established in Section 1104.33 of this title;
110. Alliance of Mental Health Providers of Oklahoma License
Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the Alliance of Mental Health
Providers of Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Alliance of Mental Health Providers of
Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into
licensing agreements with the Alliance of Mental Health Providers of
Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required in order to
use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement
shall provide for a payment to the Alliance of Mental Health
Providers of Oklahoma of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for
each license plate issued;
111. Stillwater Public Schools License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Stillwater school district. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the administration of the
Stillwater school district. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to
enter into a licensing agreement with the Stillwater school district
for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the
school district’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall
provide for a payment to the Stillwater school district of not more
than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued; and
112. Ally’s House License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to those persons who live in Oklahoma, have had a child
diagnosed with a form of cancer and wish to demonstrate support for
Ally’s House. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with Ally’s House. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter
into a license agreement with Ally’s House for any licensing fees
which may be required in order to use the Ally’s House logo or
design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to
Ally’s House of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
license plate issued.
C. The fee for such plates shall be Thirty-five Dollars
($35.00) per year of renewal and shall be in addition to all other
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 170

registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act. The fee shall be apportioned as follows through
June 30, 2023:
1. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per year of renewal or any other
amount as provided in this title of the fee shall be apportioned as
provided or deposited in a fund as specified within the paragraph
authorizing the special license plate;
2. Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the fee shall
be deposited in the Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be used for
the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration
Act. Beginning January 1, 2023, Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of
renewal of the fee shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma
Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act; and
3. Any remaining amounts of the fee shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title.
D. Upon the effective date of this act, all apportionments and
deposits of fee collections required pursuant to this section shall
be made by Service Oklahoma.
SECTION 53. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.6, as
amended by Section 165, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.6), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.6. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to design
and issue National Association for Stock Car Auto Racing Driver
(“NASCAR”) Theme License Plates. Such plates shall be designed and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate interest in NASCAR auto
racing. The plates shall be of such design as the supplier of the
license plates in consultation with Service Oklahoma may prescribe.
The fee for such plate shall be Forty Dollars ($40.00) and shall be
in addition to all other registration fees required by the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act. On and after January 1, 2022,
if a special license plate is issued pursuant to this section, any
registration fee required for such plate pursuant to this section
and the fee required pursuant to Section 1132 of this title shall be
remitted at the same time and subject to a single registration
period. Service Oklahoma shall determine, by rule, a method for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 171

making required fee and registration period adjustments if a special
license plate is obtained during a twelve-month period for which a
registration fee has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132
of this title. The combination of fees in a single remittance shall
not alter the apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing
agreement with the supplier of such NASCAR Driver license plates or
other entity for any required licensing fees. The licensing
agreement shall provide for a payment by Service Oklahoma of not
more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the fee authorized for each
license plate issued. Five Dollars ($5.00) of the forty-dollar fee
shall be apportioned by Service Oklahoma to the General Revenue
Fund. The Until December 31, 2022, the remaining amount of such fee
shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement
Fund. Beginning January 1, 2023, the remaining amount of such fee
shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Service Oklahoma
Reimbursement Fund.
For license plates numbered zero (0) through one hundred (100)
displaying a particular NASCAR Driver theme, Service Oklahoma may
establish an auction or similar procedure for the purpose of
determining the order in which such distinctive license plates are
sold and the amount of the additional fee for the distinctive
license plates. This amount shall be due at the time the original
application is submitted to Service Oklahoma and Forty Dollars
($40.00) thereafter annually at the time of renewal registration.
SECTION 54. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.7, as
last amended by Section 99, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.7), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.7. A. Service Oklahoma or a private vendor with
whom Service Oklahoma has contracted is authorized to design and
issue special license plates to any person that applies to Service
Oklahoma or a private vendor for the creation of a special license
plate and meets the minimum standards and qualifications specified
in this section.
B. If the following standards and guidelines are satisfied,
Service Oklahoma shall authorize the issuance of a special license
plate to the person making application for the special license
plate:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 172

1. The license plate is to:
a. show membership in or affiliation with an
organization, or
b. demonstrate support for an organization, group or
cause;
2. The license plate does not advertise or endorse a product,
brand or service that is provided for sale;
3. The license plate does not promote any philosophy based on
prejudice or that is contrary to state civil rights laws; and
4. Two hundred prepaid applications for the special license
plate are received by Service Oklahoma or a private vendor.
C. The fee for special license plates shall be determined in
accordance with Section 1135.9 of this title. If the special
license plate does not provide financial assistance the fee shall be
no less than Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per year of renewal and shall
be in addition to all other registration fees provided by the
Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act. Unless otherwise
provided in this section, until December 31, 2022, Fifteen Dollars
($15.00) of the fee shall be apportioned as follows: Eight Dollars
($8.00) of the special license plate fee shall be deposited in the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be used for the
administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act
and the remaining amounts of the special license plate fee shall be
apportioned as provided in Section 1104 of this title. Beginning
January 1, 2023, Eight Dollars ($8.00) of the special license plate
fee shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the Service Oklahoma
Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act and the remaining amounts of
the special license plate fee shall be apportioned by Service
Oklahoma as provided in Section 1104 of this title.
D. For special license plates that provide financial assistance
created pursuant to the provisions of this section, Service Oklahoma
shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with an
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 173

organization for any licensing fees that may be required to use the
organization’s logo or design.
E. The fee for special license plates that provide financial
assistance shall be determined in accordance with Section 1135.9 of
this title. Provided, the fee shall be no less than Thirty-five
Dollars ($35.00) and shall be in addition to all other registration
fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) per year of renewal of the fee shall be
apportioned by Service Oklahoma as follows:
1. a. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee shall be
apportioned to the License Plate Special Program
Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1135.8 of
this title to be used in the manner detailed in the
application for the special license plate, except as
provided in subparagraph b of this paragraph.
b. If Service Oklahoma has entered into a licensing
agreement with an organization for the use of its
design or logo pursuant to Chapter 74 of this title,
an amount to be determined in the licensing agreement,
but not to exceed Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per license
plate issued, shall be transferred monthly to that
organization as payment of licensing fees and no fee
shall be apportioned to the License Plate Special
Program Assistance Revolving Fund;
2. Until December 31, 2022, Eight Dollars ($8.00) of the fee
shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund
to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License
and Registration Act. Beginning January 1, 2023, Eight Dollars
($8.00) of the fee shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma in the
Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund to be used for the
administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act;
and
3. Any remaining amounts of the fee shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title.
F. Except as otherwise provided in subsection D and
subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subsection E of this section, if a
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 174

person applies for a special license plate that provides financial
assistance, the application shall designate a state agency to be
responsible for expending the funds generated by the special license
plate and the application shall designate a specific public purpose
for which the funds are to be used. The application shall include
an acknowledgment from the designated state agency of their
agreement with acceptance of the designated funds.
G. Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by Service
Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1) year.
Service Oklahoma shall notify all persons issued special license
plates of the renewal procedures prior to the expiration of the
special license plate. The notice shall contain all necessary
information and shall contain instructions for the renewal procedure
upon presentation to a t licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The
license plates shall be issued on a staggered system.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate and the fee required pursuant to Section 1132 of this
title shall be remitted at the same time and subject to a single
registration period. Service Oklahoma shall determine, by rule, a
method for making required fee and registration period adjustments
if a special license plate is obtained during a twelve-month period
for which registration has already been remitted pursuant to Section
1132 of this title. The combination of fees in a single remittance
shall not alter the apportionment otherwise provided for in this
section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant’s
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 175

information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
registration of a motor vehicle. The licensed operator fees for
acceptance of applications and renewals shall be paid out of the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund. Beginning January 1,
2023, the licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications and
renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund.
H. All special plates issued by Service Oklahoma prior to
November 1, 2005, shall not be subject to the requirements and
qualifications outlined in this section.
I. As used in this section, “person” includes an individual,
group, organization or not-for-profit corporation that is recognized
as such by the Internal Revenue Service.
SECTION 55. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.9, as
amended by Section 168, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.9), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.9. A. Service Oklahoma is authorized to enter
into a contract with a private vendor experienced in the marketing
and sale of:
1. Personalized license plates authorized under Section 1135.4
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
2. Special license plates authorized under Sections 1135.3,
ll35.5 and 1135.7 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. 1. Service Oklahoma shall establish by rule administrative
fees for license plates issued and renewed under the provisions of
subsection A of this section. The administrative fees authorized by
this paragraph shall be reasonable but not less than the amounts
necessary for Service Oklahoma to recover costs to Service Oklahoma
associated with the:
a. awarding of the contract authorized by this section,
b. implementation and enforcement of such contract, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 176

c. direct and indirect administrative costs associated
with administering the provisions of this section.
2. The fees authorized by this subsection shall be in addition
to all other registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle
License and Registration Act, including the fees required by
Sections 1135.3, 1135.4, ll35.5 and 1135.7 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. The contracted amount payable to a private vendor related to
the marketing and sale of special license plates shall only be
payable from amounts derived from administrative fees associated
with the issuance and renewal of such personalized and special
license plates.
D. 1. Service Oklahoma may approve additional designs and
color combinations for personalized and special license plates
authorized under the provisions of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, including for special license plates that may be
personalized, that may be marketed and sold by a private vendor
under a contract entered into under the provisions of this section.
Each approved license plate design and color combination shall
remain the property of Service Oklahoma.
2. This subsection shall not be interpreted to authorize:
a. Service Oklahoma to approve a design or color
combination for a specialty license plate, or
b. the private vendor to market or sell a special license
plate with a design or color combination,
that is inconsistent with the design or color combination specified
for the license plate in the special license plate’s authorizing
statute.
E. Service Oklahoma shall not:
1. Restrict the background color, color combinations or color
alphanumeric license plate numbers of a special license plate,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 177

except as determined by the Department of Public Safety as necessary
for law enforcement purposes;
2. Restrict the private vendor from conducting reasonable
events or auctions;
3. Restrict the right of the private vendor to offer a variety
of plate categories with both personalized and nonpersonalized
patterns; or
4. Unreasonably disapprove or limit the ability for the private
vendor to offer plate terms that exceed one (1) year.
F. Service Oklahoma may cancel a license plate or require the
discontinuation or redesign of a license plate design or color
combination that is marketed and sold by a private vendor under
contract at any time if Service Oklahoma determines that the
cancellation or discontinuation is in the best interest of the state
or the motoring public.
G. To the extent fees collected under the provisions of this
section are in excess of the total amounts provided in subparagraphs
a, b and c of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section and other
apportionment provisions for personalized or specialized license
plates, the excess amount shall be deposited by Service Oklahoma to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund.
H. 1. A contract entered into with a private vendor under the
provisions of this section shall provide for Service Oklahoma to
recover all costs incurred by Service Oklahoma in implementing the
provisions of this section. Under the provisions of the contract,
Service Oklahoma may require the private vendor to reimburse Service
Oklahoma in advance for:
a. not more than one-half (1/2) of Service Oklahoma’s
anticipated costs in initiating the contract, and
b. Service Oklahoma’s anticipated costs in coordinating
the introduction of a new special license plate.
2. The initial term of contract entered into under the
provisions of this section shall be no less than five (5) years in
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 178

duration. Such contract may provide for additional terms at least
equal in length to the initial term of the contract.
I. As applied to contracts entered under the provisions of this
section, Service Oklahoma shall not:
1. Unreasonably disapprove or limit any aspect of a private
vendor’s marketing and sales plan; or
2. Unreasonably interfere with the selection, assignment or
management by the private vendor of the private vendor’s employees,
agents or subcontractors.
J. A private vendor shall not market and sell license plates
that compete directly for sales with other special license plates
issued under the provisions of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
unless Service Oklahoma and the agency or organization associated
with the special license plate authorizes such marketing and sale.
K. Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement
a system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system, and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes for each year of registration of a motor vehicle.
The licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications and
renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund.
SECTION 56. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1142, as
amended by Section 178, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1142), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1142. A. There is hereby created as an official
depository of Service Oklahoma a special agency account. Service
Oklahoma is hereby authorized and directed to assign an appropriate
and distinctive number or designation for the account herein created
which shall be designated the Service Oklahoma Licensed Operator
Account. Service Oklahoma shall assign an appropriate and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 179

distinctive subaccount number or designation for each licensed
operator. Every licensed operator appointed under the provisions of
the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act shall safeguard
and preserve, in the manner herein required, all monies paid to such
licensed operator which the licensed operator is bound to account
for and pay over to Service Oklahoma.
B. Each licensed operator shall establish, in a bank or banks
authorized to do a banking business in the state, such special
licensed operator account and at any time that the licensed operator
accumulates a total amount of receipts of One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) or more then such licensed operator shall deposit within a
period of one (1) banking business day after the close of business,
all receipts which the licensed operator is obligated to account for
and remit to Service Oklahoma in the designated Service Oklahoma
Licensed Operator Account and no such monies shall be deposited in
any other banks or other depositories unless the said bank accounts
are maintained by Service Oklahoma. Provided that, where a licensed
operator is doing business in a municipality where there is no bank
located, such licensed operator shall have a period of three (3)
banking business days after the close of business to make such
deposits. Advice of deposit receipts or duplicate deposit receipts,
in a form and in an amount prescribed by Service Oklahoma, shall be
obtained and preserved as directed by Service Oklahoma. One shall
be retained by the licensed operator, and one shall be immediately
forwarded to Service Oklahoma. Withdrawals or transfers from such
Licensed Operator Service Oklahoma Account shall be made only by the
duly authorized agent of Service Oklahoma. That part of the
licensed operator’s fees to be retained by the licensed operator as
the licensed operator’s personal compensation shall not be deposited
in said the Service Oklahoma Licensed Operator Account.
Each licensed operator shall submit the appropriate reports
designated by Service Oklahoma to properly account for all funds,
regardless of source, received by a licensed operator in the
performance of the licensed operator’s duties. Reports shall cover
a period from the first day of the month to the fifteenth day of the
month and from the sixteenth day of the month to the last day of the
month. It shall be the responsibility of the licensed operator to
mail or deliver such reports and all documents of all transactions
to Service Oklahoma within a time period to be established by
Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall be responsible to mail or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 180

deliver such reports and documents and transferred funds from all
transactions received from the licensed operators to the Oklahoma
Tax Commission within a time period agreed to between the Oklahoma
Tax Commission and Service Oklahoma.
C. Licensed operators shall deposit in such account all monies,
taxes and fees collected and received by them as such licensed
operators, which they are obligated to account for and remit to
Service Oklahoma, and it is specifically required that checks or
similar instruments accepted or received by such licensed operators
for taxes or fees must be deposited in such account, less any amount
provided by this act section and Sections 2-117 and 1113.3 of this
title that the licensed operators are entitled to retain as fees.
No licensed operator shall withdraw any funds from the licensed
operator’s licensed operator account. All checks, drafts, orders
and vouchers so deposited shall bear an endorsement to the licensed
operator account which endorsement shall include the assigned
account number and the licensed operator’s subaccount number. Items
deposited shall be credited at par and should payment be refused on
any such check, draft, order or voucher, or should the same prove
otherwise worthless, the amount thereof shall not be charged by
Service Oklahoma against the individual subaccounts of the licensed
operator. The licensed operator shall continue to attempt to
require proper payment of all such worthless items, but shall not be
personally liable to Service Oklahoma for his or her payment.
Service Oklahoma or the licensed operator shall charge the person
issuing the check a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each
check to cover the costs of the processing of each returned check,
and all necessary travel expenses of collection, as provided by the
State Travel Reimbursement Act; provided, such charge shall not be
made unless efforts have been made to present such check, draft,
order or voucher for payment a second time. Any licensed operator
who collects a dishonored check pursuant to the provisions of
Section 1121 of this title shall also collect a fee of Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00) and shall be entitled to retain such fee.
D. It is specifically provided that nothing in this section
shall be considered or construed as in any way affecting, relieving
or relinquishing the liability of such licensed operator to Service
Oklahoma for any monies collected by the licensed operator and due
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 181

the state or the liability of such licensed operator or any surety
on or under the licensed operator’s bond made to Service Oklahoma.
Unless provided otherwise, any licensed operator who fails to
comply with any provision of this section shall pay a penalty to be
imposed by Service Oklahoma. Monies collected for payment of the
penalty shall be deposited to the credit of the General Revenue Fund
of the State Treasury. Any licensed operator who pays a penalty
pursuant to this section shall not allocate his or her payment
thereof as a part of his or her operating expenses, but shall use
his or her personal funds for payment of the penalty. Such penalty
shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the gross amount of the
receipts received by the licensed operator for that particular day
that the licensed operator fails to deposit all such funds required
by this section or one percent (1%) of the gross amount of the
receipts received by the licensed operator for the report period
that the licensed operator fails to timely mail the required report
or remit any excess licensed operator funds as provided in
subsection B of this section. Such penalty shall be increased to
three percent (3%) of the gross amount of the receipts received for
that particular day if the licensed operator fails to fulfill any of
said the requirements within a period of five (5) days. Provided
that such penalty shall be three percent (3%) of the gross amount of
the receipts received by the licensed operator for the report period
that the licensed operator fails to timely mail the required report
or remit any excess licensed operator funds as provided in
subsection B of this section if the licensed operator fails to
fulfill these requirements within five (5) days.
The Service Oklahoma Operator Board may waive the penalty for
failing to timely file the accounting report required by this
section if the Service Oklahoma Operator Board finds that:
1. The funds to which the report applies have been properly
deposited;
2. The failure to timely file the report was due to emergency
conditions beyond the control of the licensed operator; and
3. The report has been filed within a week of the date on which
it was required to be filed.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 182

SECTION 57. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1167, as
amended by Section 193, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1167), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1167. A. The Corporation Commission is hereby
authorized to promulgate rules pursuant to the Administrative
Procedures Act to establish the amounts of fees, fines and penalties
as set forth in Section 1166 et seq. of this title. The Corporation
Commission shall notify all interested parties of any proposed rules
to be promulgated as provided herein and shall provide such parties
an opportunity to be heard prior to promulgation.
B. The Corporation Commission shall adjudicate enforcement
actions initiated by Corporation Commission personnel.
C. Revenue derived from all fines and penalties collected or
received by the Corporation Commission pursuant to the provisions of
the Trucking One-Stop Shop Act shall be apportioned as follows:
1. For the period beginning August 23, 2013, the first Three
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) collected or received each
fiscal year shall be remitted to the Department of Public Safety for
the purpose of staffing the port of entry weigh stations to conduct
safety inspections. The next Five Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars
($550,000.00) shall be remitted to the Oklahoma Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma and apportioned as provided in Section 1104 of this
title; and
2. The remaining amount shall be deposited to the Trucking One-
Stop Shop Fund created in subsection D of this section.
D. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Corporation Commission to be known and designated as
the “Trucking One-Stop Shop Fund”. The Trucking One-Stop Shop Fund
shall consist of:
1. All funds apportioned thereto in subsection C of this
section;
2. Fees collected by the Commission to be retained as a
licensed operator or other Corporation Commission registration or
motor fuel fees as allowed by statute or rule; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 183

3. Any other monies to be utilized for the Trucking One-Stop
Shop Act.
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall not be subject to legislative appropriation.
Monies in the Trucking One-Stop Shop Fund shall only be expended for
direct expenses relating to the Trucking One-Stop Shop Act.
Expenditures from the revolving fund shall be made pursuant to the
laws of this state. In addition, expenditures from the revolving
fund may be made pursuant to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act for
the purpose of immediately responding to emergency situations,
within the Commission’s jurisdiction, having potentially critical
environmental or public safety impact. Warrants for expenditures
from the fund shall be drawn by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
E. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Department of Transportation to be designated the
“Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies deposited thereto. All monies accruing to the
credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Department for the purpose of constructing,
equipping and maintaining facilities to determine the weight of
vehicles traveling on the roads and highways of this state.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 58. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503A, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503A. Any law enforcement agency in this state that
seizes a vehicle in which a controlled dangerous substance has been
manufactured that is forfeited pursuant to Section 2-503 of Title 63
of the Oklahoma Statutes may request that the Oklahoma Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma brand the certificate of title with the
notation “Drug Manufacture Vehicle”.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 184

SECTION 59. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4022, as
amended by Section 216, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 4022), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4022. A. In addition to the registration fees required
by Section 4021 of this title, when any such application for
registration is made directly to Service Oklahoma or to any licensed
operator, a One Dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) fee for each
year the vessel or motor is registered shall be collected and
apportioned by Service Oklahoma as provided by the provisions of the
Oklahoma Vessel and Motor Registration Act.
B. 1. The charge for a copy of certificate of registration
information is One Dollar ($1.00) for each instrument.
2. The charge for a certified copy of certificate of
registration information is Two Dollars ($2.00) for each instrument.
SECTION 60. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4027, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4027. All title and registration fees and penalties
levied by the terms and provisions of the Oklahoma Vessel and Motor
Registration Act shall become and remain a first lien upon any
vessel or motor on which said such fees, taxes and penalty is are
due and unpaid. Said The lien shall be prior, superior and
paramount to all other liens of whatsoever kind or character.
After the thirtieth day after such title and registration fees
become delinquent, it shall be the duty of the Oklahoma Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma or the Department of Public Safety, its
designated officers or employees, and of sheriffs and all other duly
authorized peace officers of this state, to seize and take into
custody every vessel or motor required to be titled and registered
pursuant to the Oklahoma Vessel and Motor Registration Act but which
is not so registered by the owner thereof, and such vessel or motor
shall not be released to the owner thereof until it is duly
registered and the fee due thereon paid in full, together with any
penalty provided by law, plus the cost of seizure, including a
reasonable cost of taking such vessel or motor into custody and
storing it. In the event the owner or possessor of any such vessel
or motor seized, as provided by law, shall fail to pay the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 185

registration fee and penalty due thereon, together with said such
costs of seizure and storage, said the officer shall proceed to
foreclose the lien thereon by selling such vessel or motor following
the procedure for foreclosure of liens on personal property
prescribed in Section 91 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
The provisions of the Uniform Tax Procedure Code under Title 68
of the Oklahoma Statutes and the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act, Section 1101 et seq. of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, providing procedures and remedies with respect to all
state taxes shall also be available for the enforcement of the
provisions of the Oklahoma Vessel and Motor Registration Act.
SECTION 61. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4028, as
amended by Section 217, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 4028), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4028. All titling and registration fees, taxes, and
penalties collected by Service Oklahoma pursuant to the provisions
of Sections 4014 and 4021 of this title shall be apportioned by
Service Oklahoma as provided in Section 1104 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 62. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4102, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4102. A. The Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma
is hereby granted authority and jurisdiction to administer the
Oklahoma Vessel and Motor Excise Tax Act, and the Commission Service
Oklahoma is hereby authorized to promulgate, adopt, and enforce all
necessary rules and regulations and to prescribe all forms which it
deems necessary to carry the Oklahoma Vessel and Motor Excise Tax
Act into effect and to enforce the provisions thereof.
B. All forms, declarations, applications, statements, or other
information in writing and executed by owners or representatives of
owners are hereby declared to be executed and shall be considered to
be executed under penalties of perjury.
SECTION 63. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4104, is
amended to read as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 186

Section 4104. All revenue derived under the Oklahoma Vessel and
Motor Excise Tax Act, Section 4102 et seq. of this title, shall be
apportioned and distributed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service
Oklahoma as provided for in Section 1101 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
SECTION 64. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4209.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4209.2. A. As used in this section:
1. “Identification number” includes any identifying number,
serial number, motor serial number or other distinguishing number or
mark, placed on a vessel or motor by its manufacturer or by
authority of the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or in
accordance with the laws of another state or country;
2. “Remove” includes deface, cover and destroy; and
3. “Falsify” includes alter and forge.
B. Any person or persons who shall remove or falsify or cause
to be removed or falsified the hull identification number of a
vessel or motor in this state, without first giving notice of such
act to the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma, upon such form
as the Commission Service Oklahoma may prescribe, or any person who
shall give a wrong description in any application for the
registration of any vessel or motor in this state for the purpose of
concealing or hiding the identity of such vessel or motor, upon
conviction, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the State Penitentiary for a term of not less than
one (1) year and not more than five (5) years.
C. A person who buys, receives, possesses, sells or disposes of
a vessel or motor, knowing that the identification number of the
vessel or motor has been removed or falsified, upon conviction,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
D. A person who buys, receives, possesses, sells or disposes of
a vessel or motor, knowing that the identification number of the
vessel or motor has been removed or falsified and with intent to
conceal or misrepresent the identity of the vessel or motor, upon
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 187

conviction, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a
fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by
imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
E. An identification number may be placed on a vessel or motor
by its manufacturer in the regular course of business or placed or
restored on a vehicle or engine by authority of the Commission
Service Oklahoma without violating this section. An identification
number so placed or restored is not falsified.
SECTION 65. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4209.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4209.4. Any person who shall alter or forge, or cause
to be altered or forged, any certificate of title issued by the
Oklahoma Tax Commission or Service Oklahoma, pursuant to the
provisions of this title, or any assignment thereof, or who shall
hold or use any such certificate or assignment, knowing the same to
have been altered or forged, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a
felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Fifty
Dollars ($50.00), and not more than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary for a
period of not less than one (1) year, nor more than ten (10) years,
or by both such fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the
court.
SECTION 66. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4217.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4217.1. Any officer who has removed or directed the
removal of any vessel, or an authorized person in the employing
agency of the officer, shall within seventy-two (72) hours of the
removal notify the Department of Public Safety of the removal. The
notice of removal shall contain the name and address of the owner,
if known, the make, model, vessel identification number,
registration number, date stored, place stored, and the estimated
value. Upon receipt of such notice of removal, the Department of
Public Safety shall promptly request the Oklahoma Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma or other appropriate registering jurisdiction to
furnish the name and address of the owner of and any lienholder on
the vessel and must within five (5) days from receipt of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 188

requested information send a notice to the owner and any lienholder
by regular mail, postage prepaid, at the addresses furnished by the
Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or registering jurisdiction, of the
location of the vessel. This section shall not be construed to
create any civil liability upon the state, any agency of the state
or employee thereof for failure to provide notice to the owner or
lienholder.
SECTION 67. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4217.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4217.4. A. Every person lawfully in possession of an
abandoned vessel shall have a special lien thereon for the
compensation due from the owner of such abandoned vessel for all
expenses incurred.
B. The lien may be foreclosed by a sale of such abandoned
vessel upon giving notice and in the following manner. The notice
shall contain:
1. The name of the party bringing action and the name of the
owner or any person claiming any interest therein;
2. A full description of the vessel, giving all available
information as to the make, year, serial number, registration decal
number with year and the state from which the registration was
issued;
3. A full statement of all the facts;
4. The amount of the claim, giving a full description of the
work, labor, storage or any other costs involved; and
5. The date, time and place of the sale.
The notice shall be posted in three public places in the county in
which the vessel is to be sold at least ten (10) days before the
time specified therein for such sale, and a copy of said such notice
shall be mailed to the owner and any other person claiming any
interest in the abandoned motor vehicle, at their last-known mailing
address, by registered mail on the same date of posting said such
notice.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 189

C. Proceedings for such sale under this section shall not be
commenced until ten (10) days after the lien has accrued.
D. A return of such sale shall be made at the time of sale and
proof of posting and mailing of the notice of sale of abandoned
vessel.
E. The proceeds from the sale of an abandoned vessel made
pursuant to subsection B of this section shall be applied in the
following order:
1. To the reasonable cost incurred in the sale of the abandoned
vessel;
2. To the satisfaction of the special lien provided for in
subsection A of this section;
3. To the satisfaction of any indebtedness secured by a
subordinate security interest or lien in the vessel; and
4. To the owner if the owner is known, and if the owner or the
address of the owner is not known, to the Oklahoma Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma to be remitted to the State Treasurer and deposited
in the General Revenue Fund.
SECTION 68. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4255, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4255. A. The following are subject to forfeiture
unless obtained by theft, fraud, or conspiracy to defraud and the
rightful owner is known or can be identified and located:
1. Any tool;
2. Any implement; or
3. Any instrumentality, including, but not limited to, any
vessel or motor or vessel or motor part, whether owned or unowned by
the person from whose possession or control it was seized, which is
used or possessed either in violation of Section 3 4253 of this act
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 190

title or to promote or facilitate a violation of Section 3 4253 of
this act title.
B. Any vessel or motor, other conveyance, or vessel or motor
part used by any person as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section where the owner or other person in charge of the
vessel or motor, other conveyance, or vessel or motor part is a
consenting party to a violation of Section 3 of this act Section
4253 of this title.
C. No vessel or motor, vessel or motor part, other conveyance,
tool, implement, or instrumentality is subject to forfeiture under
this section by reason of any act or omission which the owner proves
to have been committed or omitted without the owner’s knowledge or
consent.
D. 1. Seizing agencies shall utilize their best efforts to
identify any seized vessel or motor or vessel or motor part to
determine ownership or the identity of any other person having a
right or interest in a seized vessel or motor or vessel or motor
part. In its reasonable identification and owner location attempts,
the seizing agency shall cause the National Crime Information Center
(NCIC) to be searched for stolen or wanted information on vessels or
motors similar to the seized vessel or motor or consistent with the
seized vessel or motor part.
2. Where a vessel or motor or vessel or motor part has an
apparent value in excess of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00):
a. the seizing agency shall consult with an expert of the
type specified in Section 2 4252 of this act title,
and
b. the seizing agency shall also request searches of the
on-line and off-line files of the National Crime
Information Center (NCIC) when the state law
enforcement files have been searched with negative
results.
E. A forfeiture of a vessel or motor, vessel or motor part, or
other conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is
subject to the interest of the secured party where the secured party
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 191

neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission
forming the ground for the forfeiture.
F. Property described in subsection A of this section seized
and held for forfeiture shall not be subject to replevin and is
subject only to the order and judgments of a court of competent
jurisdiction hearing the forfeiture proceedings.
G. 1. The district attorney in the county where the seizure
occurs shall bring an action for forfeiture in a court of competent
jurisdiction. The forfeiture action shall be brought within sixty
(60) days from the date of seizure except where the district
attorney in the sound exercise of discretion determines that no
forfeiture action should be brought because of the rights of
property owners, lienholders, or secured creditors, or because of
exculpatory, exonerating, or mitigating facts and circumstances.
2. The district attorney shall give notice of the forfeiture
proceeding by mailing a copy of the complaint in the forfeiture
proceeding to each person whose right, title, or interest is of
record in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma, the
Department of Public Safety, the Federal Aviation Agency, or any
other department of the state, or any other state or territory of
the United States, or of the federal government if such property is
required to be registered in any such department.
3. Notice of the proceeding shall be given to any such other
person as may appear, from the facts and circumstances, to have any
right, title, or interest in or to the property.
4. The owner of the property, or any person having, or
claiming, right, title, or interest in the property may within sixty
(60) days after the mailing of such notice file a verified answer to
the complaint and may appear at the hearing on the action for
forfeiture.
5. The district attorney shall show at a forfeiture hearing, by
a preponderance of the evidence, that such property was used in the
commission of a violation of Section 3 4253 of this act title, or
was used or possessed to facilitate such violation.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 192

6. The owner of property may show by a preponderance of the
evidence that the owner did not know, and did not have reason to
know, that the property was to be used or possessed in the
commission of any violation or that any of the exceptions to
forfeiture are applicable.
7. Unless the district attorney shall make the showing required
of it, the court shall order the property released to the owner.
Where the prosecutor has made such a showing, the court may order:
a. the property be destroyed by the agency which seized
it or some other agency designated by the court,
b. the property be delivered and retained for use by the
agency which seized it or some other agency designated
by the court, or
c. the property be sold at public sale.
H. A copy of a forfeiture order shall be filed with the sheriff
of the county in which the forfeiture occurs and with each federal
or state department with which such property is required to be
registered. Such order, when filed, constitutes authority for the
issuance to the agency to whom the property is delivered and
retained for use or to any purchaser of the property of a title
certificate, registration certificate, or other special certificate
as may be required by law considering the condition of the property.
I. Proceeds from sale at public auction, after payment of all
reasonable charges and expenses incurred by the agency designated by
the court to conduct the sale in storing and selling the property,
shall be paid to the general fund of the county of seizure or
treasury of the governmental unit employing the seizing agency.
J. No vessel or motor, either seized under Section 4 4254 of
this act title or forfeited under this section, shall be released by
the seizing agency or used or sold by an agency designated by the
court unless any altered, counterfeited, defaced, destroyed,
disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated, or removed hull
identification number, manufacturer’s serial number or other
identification number is corrected by the issuance and affixing of
either an assigned or replacement hull identification number plate,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 193

manufacturer’s serial number plate or other identification number
plate as may be appropriate under laws or regulations of this state.
K. No motor part having any altered, counterfeited, defaced,
destroyed, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated, or removed
hull identification number, manufacturer’s serial number or other
identification number shall be disposed of upon forfeiture except by
destruction thereof, except that this provision shall not apply to
any vessel or motor part which is assembled with and constitutes
part of a vessel or motor.
L. No vessel or motor or vessel or motor part shall be
forfeited under this section solely on the basis that it is
unidentifiable. Instead of forfeiture, any seized vessel or motor
or vessel or motor part which is unidentifiable shall be the subject
of a written report sent by the seizing agency to the Department of
Public Safety which report shall include a description of the vessel
or motor or vessel or motor part, its color, if any, the date, time
and place of its seizure, the name of the person from whose
possession or control it was seized, the grounds for its seizure,
and the location where the same is held or stored.
M. When a seized unidentifiable vessel or motor or vessel or
motor part has been held for sixty (60) days or more after the
notice to the Department of Public Safety specified in subsection L
of this section has been given, the seizing agency or its agent
shall cause the vessel or motor or vessel or motor part to be sold
at public sale to the highest bidder. Notice of the time and place
of sale shall be posted in a conspicuous place for at least thirty
(30) days prior to the sale on the premises where the vessel or
motor or vessel or motor part has been stored.
N. When a seized unidentifiable vessel or motor or vessel or
motor part has an apparent value of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)
or less, the seizing agency shall authorize the disposal of the
vessel or motor or vessel or motor part, provided that no such
disposition shall be made less than sixty (60) days after the date
of seizure.
O. The proceeds of the public sale of an unidentifiable vessel
or motor or vessel or motor part shall be deposited in the General
Revenue Fund of the state, or treasury of the governmental unit
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 194

employing the seizing agency after deduction of any reasonable and
necessary towing and storage charges.
P. Seizing agencies shall utilize their best efforts to arrange
for the towing and storing of vessels or motors and vessel or motor
parts in the most economical manner possible. In no event shall the
owner of a vessel or motor or a vessel or motor part be required to
pay more than the minimum reasonable costs of towing and storage.
Q. A seized vessel or motor or vessel or motor part that is
neither forfeited nor unidentifiable shall be held subject to the
order of the court in which the criminal action is pending or, if a
request for its release from such custody is made, until the
district attorney has notified the defendant or the defendant’s
attorney of such request and both the prosecution and defense have
been afforded a reasonable opportunity for an examination of the
property to determine its true value and to produce or reproduce, by
photographs or other identifying techniques, legally sufficient
evidence for introduction at trial or other criminal proceedings.
Upon expiration of a reasonable time for the completion of the
examination, which in no event shall exceed fourteen (14) days from
the date of service upon the defense of the notice of request for
return of property as provided herein, the property shall be
released to the person making such request after satisfactory proof
of such person’s entitlement to the possession thereof.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon application by either party with
notice to the other, the court may order retention of the property
if it determines that retention is necessary in the furtherance of
justice.
R. When a seized vessel or motor is forfeited, restored to its
owner, or disposed of as unidentifiable, the seizing agency shall
retain a report of the transaction for a period of at least one (1)
year from the date of the transaction.
S. When an applicant for a certificate of title or salvage
certificate presents to the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma
proof that the applicant purchased or acquired a vessel or motor at
a public sale conducted pursuant to this section and such fact is
attested to by the seizing agency, the Oklahoma Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma shall issue a certificate of title, salvage
certificate for the vessel or motor upon receipt of the statutory
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 195

fee, properly executed application for a certificate of title, or
other certificate of ownership, and the affidavit of the seizing
agency that a state-assigned number was applied for and affixed to
the vessel or motor prior to the time that the vessel or motor was
released by the seizing agency to the purchaser.
SECTION 69. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 113, as
amended by Section 234, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (68 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 113), is amended to read as follows:
Section 113. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Oklahoma Tax Commission to be known as the
“Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund”. Said The revolving fund shall
consist of any funds received by the Tax Commission for data
processing services or equipment rental and any funds received by
the Tax Commission from any incorporated city, town, or county
pursuant to a contractual agreement for the augmentation of the
enforcement and collection of municipal or county taxes entered into
pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1371 or 2702 of this title.
The Tax Commission is authorized to hire full-time-equivalent
employees as necessary to perform such duties as to fulfill
contractual agreements authorized pursuant to Sections 1371 and 2702
of this title, however, such employees hired to perform such
contractual duties shall be supported solely by funds in the Tax
Commission Reimbursement Fund which are collected by the Tax
Commission from incorporated cities, towns, and counties pursuant to
such contractual agreements and such employees shall be terminated
upon the discontinuation of such funds or inadequate funds to
support such positions. Such full-time-equivalent employees shall
be in the unclassified service and shall not be subject to any
provisions of the Oklahoma Personnel Act or to the Merit Rules for
Employment except leave regulations. All fees collected and
apportioned to this fund under the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act, Section 1101 et seq. of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, may be used by the Motor Vehicle Division of the Oklahoma
Tax Commission to pay all costs incurred in the issuance of
certificates of title and inspection of vehicles, including, but not
limited to, additional computer costs for the Tax Commission and
licensed operators and the check verification system authorized
pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section
1144 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes or be used for capital
expenditures as authorized by the Oklahoma State Legislature. For
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 196

the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, disbursements from the fund
shall be exempt from all agency budget limits.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision in the Oklahoma Statutes
except subsection F of Section 316 and subsection D of Section 418
of this title, beginning July 1, 2009, all revenue from fees and
penalties collected pursuant to Sections 304, 316, 415 and 418 of
this title shall be apportioned to the Tax Commission Reimbursement
Fund for administrative expenses incurred in connection with
enforcement of the provisions of Section 301 et seq., Section 346 et
seq., Section 401 et seq. and Section 424 et seq. of this title.
SECTION 70. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2102, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2102. A. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of
this article to provide funds for general governmental functions of
state government.
B. All revenue derived under this article shall be apportioned
and distributed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma as
provided for in Section 1104 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
except as provided in subsection A of Section 2103 of this title,
and all revenue derived from transfers of legal ownership of all-
terrain vehicles or motorcycles used exclusively off roads and
highways which occur on or after July 1, 2005, and transfers of
utility vehicles used exclusively off roads and highways which occur
on or after July 1, 2008, shall be apportioned as provided for in
Section 1353 of this title.
SECTION 71. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2108, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2108. (a) A. In any case where the owner of a vehicle
subject to the tax levied by this article fails or refuses to pay
the same, after proper demand therefor by an officer or agent of the
Tax Commission Service Oklahoma, such officer or agent shall
immediately report such failure to the Tax Commission Service
Oklahoma, and shall at the same time in case of failure to pay,
seize and hold the said vehicle, as now provided by law in case of
failure to pay the annual vehicle license or registration fee.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 197

(b) The Tax Commission
B. Service Oklahoma shall, upon demand of the owner of the
vehicle, accord a hearing to said the owner as provided by law and
enter its findings and order accordingly. If it is determined by
the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma that said the tax is due and
payable, then it shall issue its warrant, directly to the sheriff of
the county, ordering and directing the sale of such vehicle
according to the same procedure now provided by law for the sale of
vehicles for failure to pay the annual license fee. Such seizure
and sale may at the time include both the registration fee due and
the excise tax levied by this article, together with all costs of
advertisement and sale. The sale shall be conducted in all manner
as provided by law for the sale of personal property under
execution.
SECTION 72. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2110, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2110. A. There is hereby levied a rental tax of six
percent (6%) on the gross receipts of all motor vehicle rental
agreements as provided in this section. This tax shall be levied on
any rental agreement of ninety (90) days or less duration on any
motor vehicle that is rented to a person by a business engaged in
renting motor vehicles without a driver in Oklahoma, irrespective of
the state in which the vehicle is registered. This rental tax shall
not apply to the following:
1. Any lease agreements;
2. Any truck or truck-tractor registered pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1120 or Section 1133 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes having a laden weight or a combined laden weight
of eight thousand (8,000) pounds or more;
3. Any trailer or semitrailer registered pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1133 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
For purposes of this section, “vehicle” and “person” shall have the
same meanings as defined in Section 2101 of this title; or
4. Any shared vehicle upon the purchase of which applicable
taxes were paid.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 198

B. The rental tax specified in subsection A of this section
shall be apportioned in the manner as provided in Section 2102 of
this title.
C. A deduction from gross receipts for bad debts shall be
allowed for the rental tax specified in subsection A of this
section. For purposes of this section, “bad debts” shall have the
same meaning as defined in Section 1366 of this title.
D. The tax hereby levied shall be collected from the person
renting the vehicle or shared vehicle driver at the time of the
payment of the rental agreement and shall be due and payable to the
Oklahoma Tax Commission by the business engaged in renting these
vehicles or peer-to-peer car sharing program, but only with respect
to shared vehicles upon the purchase of which applicable taxes were
not paid, on the twentieth day of each month following the month in
which payments for rental agreements subject to tax are made. The
Tax Commission shall devise such forms as it deems necessary for the
orderly collection of this tax and the excise tax and penalty
provided for in paragraph 10 of Section 2105 of this title.
E. The provisions of this section shall not apply to state
government entities.
F. As used in this section:
1. “Rental agreement” means an agreement of ninety (90) days or
less duration on any motor vehicle that is rented to a person by a
business engaged in renting motor vehicles without drivers in this
state and includes those peer-to-peer car sharing agreements only
involving shared vehicles for which the shared vehicle owner has not
paid the applicable taxes upon purchase of the shared vehicle;
2. “Applicable taxes” means, with respect to shared vehicles
purchased in Oklahoma, motor vehicle excise taxes levied under
Section 2103 of this title and sales taxes levied under Sections
1354 and 1355 of this title. With respect to vehicles not purchased
in Oklahoma, applicable taxes refers to the sales, use, excise or
other tax generally due upon the purchase of a motor vehicle in the
jurisdiction in which the shared vehicle was purchased;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 199

3. “Peer-to-peer car sharing program” shall have the same
definition set forth in Section 2 of the Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing
Program Act;
4. “Car sharing program agreement” shall have the same
definition set forth in Section 2 of the Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing
Program Act;
5. “Shared vehicle” shall have the same definition set forth in
Section 2 of the Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing Program Act;
6. “Shared vehicle owner” shall have the same definition set
forth in Section 2 of the Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing Program Act; and
7. “Shared vehicle driver” shall have the same definition set
forth in Section 2 of the Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing Program Act.
G. All collections received by the Oklahoma Tax Commission from
the tax levied pursuant to this section shall be transferred to
Service Oklahoma to be apportioned pursuant to Section 2102 of this
title.
H. The Oklahoma Tax Commission is authorized to prescribe rules
and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 73. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 5304, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5304. The tax stamps required by this act Section 5301
et seq. of this title to be placed upon Manufacturer’s Certificates
or Statements of Origin of new automobiles, new trucks, new travel
trailers, new manufactured homes, new recreational vehicles, new
motorcycles, new vessels, new watercraft, new motorboats, and other
new boats and new motors, and on the applications for registration
of the vehicles described in Section 5303 of this title shall be
manufactured or purchased by the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service
Oklahoma in the required amounts. Said The tax stamps shall be of
such design, color combination, and material as the Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma shall deem necessary for the administration of this
tax and to afford the best security to the tax revenue involved.
The Commission Service Oklahoma may require any manufacturer of such
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 200

tax stamps to furnish a bond in such amount as it deems necessary to
protect the state and counties against loss. The Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma shall distribute such tax stamps to the county
treasurer of each county, taking such receipt therefor as may be
necessary, and said the county treasurer shall have the
responsibility of the custody and the sale of said such stamps to
the person required by this act Section 5301 et seq. of this title
to obtain same, and shall have the duty of accounting for said such
stamps to their respective counties, and to the Oklahoma Tax
Commission Service Oklahoma as it may require.
SECTION 74. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 5305, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5305. The county treasurer shall, at the end of each
calendar month, remit and apportion all collections from the sales
of the tax stamps herein provided for as follows:
1. Two percent (2%) shall be deposited remitted to Service
Oklahoma for deposit to the credit of the General Revenue Fund of
the State Treasury,; and
2. Forty-nine percent (49%) shall be allocated to the schools
of the county on an ADA basis, and forty-nine percent (49%) shall go
to the general fund of the county.
SECTION 75. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 5403, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5403. A. The tax stamp or stamps required by Section
5402 of this title to be affixed upon the dealer’s copy of the sales
invoice covering each new or used whole goods agricultural equipment
or whole goods attachment thereto sold shall be manufactured or
purchased by the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma in the
required amounts. Said The tax stamps shall be of such design,
color combination and material and value in multiples of Six Dollars
($6.00) as the Tax Commission Service Oklahoma shall deem necessary
for the administration of this tax and to afford the best security
to the tax revenue involved. Said The stamps shall be purchased by
dealers in the county where the business is located.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 201

B. The Commission Service Oklahoma may require any manufacturer
of such tax stamps to furnish a bond in such amount as it deems
necessary to protect the state and local taxing entities against
loss.
C. The Tax Commission Service Oklahoma shall distribute such
tax stamps to the county treasurer of each county, taking such
receipt therefor as may be necessary. The county treasurer shall
have the responsibility of the custody and the sale of the stamps to
the person required by Section 5402 of this title to obtain such
stamps. In addition, the county treasurer shall have the duty of
accounting for said such stamps to their respective counties, and to
the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma as it may require.
SECTION 76. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 5404, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5404. The county treasurer shall remit and apportion
each month all collections from the sale of tax stamps pursuant to
Section 5402 of this title as follows:
1. Two percent (2%) shall be deposited remitted to Service
Oklahoma for deposit to the credit of the General Revenue Fund of
the State Treasury; and
2. Ninety-eight percent (98%) shall be distributed as if said
the funds had been collected as ad valorem tax where the farm
implement dealer’s business is located.
Funds received by taxing jurisdictions from this source shall be
utilized as if the said funds had in fact been generated by ad
valorem taxes, including servicing of debt by sinking funds. On and
after January 1, 1993, and at the end of each calendar year
thereafter, the treasurer shall furnish a report to the county
assessor, which shall show the total amount of in-lieu taxes
authorized by this act Section 5401 et seq. of this title and
Section 2805 of this title and apportioned during the fiscal year to
those taxing jurisdictions authorized to receive revenue from such
in-lieu taxes. The assessor shall calculate annually the amount of
assessed valuation that otherwise would be displaced by such in-lieu
tax, by dividing the total amount of revenue derived from such tax
apportioned to each taxing jurisdiction by the actual millage rate
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 202

levied by each taxing jurisdiction during the fiscal year. The
assessor shall add the result of that calculation to the actual
assessed valuation of each taxing jurisdiction to determine the new
adjusted assessed valuation of each taxing jurisdiction, and said
such adjusted assessed valuation shall be used for all purposes,
including the determination of debt limits, in the following fiscal
year whenever the term “assessed valuation” is required to be used.
SECTION 77. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 6005, as
last amended by Section 25, Chapter 126, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6005), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6005. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022, and
all subsequent fiscal years fiscal years 2022 through 2026, one
hundred percent (100%) of the revenues derived pursuant to the
provisions of Sections 6001 through 6007 of this title shall be paid
monthly by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the State Treasurer and
shall be placed to the credit of the Oklahoma Department of
Aerospace and Aeronautics Revolving Fund. For fiscal year 2027 and
subsequent fiscal years, one hundred percent (100%) of the revenues
derived pursuant to the provisions of Sections 6001 through 6007 of
this title shall be paid monthly by Service Oklahoma to the State
Treasurer and shall be placed to the credit of the Oklahoma
Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics Revolving Fund.
SECTION 78. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 6511, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6511. A. In addition to the registration fees required
pursuant to the provisions of Section 1132 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, at the time of initial and renewal registration
for any electric vehicle, there shall be an additional fee based on
the weight of the electric vehicle as provided by subsections B and
C of this section.
B. As used in subsections C and D of this section:
1. Class 1 vehicle means one having a gross weight of less than
six thousand (6,000) pounds;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 203

2. Class 2 vehicle means one having a gross weight of at least
six thousand (6,000) pounds but not greater than ten thousand
(10,000) pounds;
3. Class 3, 4, 5 and 6 vehicle means one having a gross weight
of greater than ten thousand (10,000) pounds but not greater than
twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds; and
4. Class 7 and 8 vehicle means one having a gross weight in
excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.
C. The annual registration fee for electric vehicles other than
plug-in hybrid electric vehicles shall be as follows:
1. One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00) for Class 1 vehicles;
2. One Hundred Fifty-eight Dollars ($158.00) for Class 2
vehicles;
3. Three Hundred Sixty-three Dollars ($363.00) for Class 3, 4,
5 and 6 vehicles; and
4. Two Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($2,250.00) for Class
7 and 8 vehicles.
D. The registration fee for a plug-in hybrid vehicle shall be
as follows:
1. Eighty-two Dollars ($82.00) for Class 1 vehicles;
2. One Hundred Eighteen Dollars ($118.00) for Class 2 vehicles;
3. Two Hundred Seventy-two Dollars ($272.00) for Class 3, 4, 5
and 6 vehicles; and
4. One Thousand Six Hundred Eighty-seven Dollars ($1,687.00)
for Class 7 and 8 vehicles.
E. Until July 1, 2027, the revenues derived from the fees
imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be
apportioned by Service Oklahoma to the Driving on Road
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 204

Infrastructure with Vehicles of Electricity (DRIVE) Revolving Fund
created pursuant to Section 12 6512 of this act title.
F. Beginning July 1, 2027, the revenues derived from the fees
imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be
apportioned as follows:
1. Eighty-five percent (85%) shall be apportioned by Service
Oklahoma to the Driving on Road Infrastructure with Vehicles of
Electricity (DRIVE) Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 12
6512 of this act title; and
2. Fifteen percent (15%) shall be transferred monthly by
Service Oklahoma to the Oklahoma Tax Commission to be apportioned to
the various counties of the state. The Oklahoma Tax Commission
shall distribute such funds monthly to each county treasurer in the
same manner as monies are apportioned under the provisions of
subparagraph b of paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 500.6 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title. Each county treasurer
shall deposit such funds to the county’s county highway fund and
such funds shall be used for maintenance and operations.
SECTION 79. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1521, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1521. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a fund to be known as the “Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to
fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all appropriations and
transfers made by the Legislature. All monies accruing to the
credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Department of Transportation for the purposes
authorized by subsection F of this section in amounts as authorized
by the Oklahoma Legislature. Expenditures from the fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. Beginning July 1, 2021, except for an amount equivalent to
the amount of revenue apportioned to the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access
and Driver Safety Fund pursuant to Section 500.4B of Title 68 and
Section 1104 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes and from other
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 205

sources apportioned to the Fund fund by law, there shall be
apportioned to the funds specified in this subsection from the
monies that would otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue
Fund by Section 2352 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes from the
revenues derived pursuant to subsections A, B, and E of Section 2355
of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes amounts as follows:
1. Subject to any reductions required by subsection E of this
section, there shall be apportioned to the Rebuilding Oklahoma
Access and Driver Safety Fund:
a. for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2021, and for
each fiscal year thereafter, Eighty Million Dollars
($80,000,000.00), which shall be allocated and used by
the Department of Transportation first for the purpose
of making any required payments for principal,
interest, or other costs of borrowing with respect to
the obligations issued pursuant to Section 341 of
Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes and after any such
required payment has been made then for the purposes
otherwise authorized by this section, plus
b. the total amount apportioned to the Rebuilding
Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund for the
preceding fiscal year which, except for the amount
prescribed by subparagraph a of this paragraph, shall
be apportioned before any other amount is apportioned
pursuant to Section 2352 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, plus
c. an additional amount that is required in order for the
total apportionment to the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access
and Driver Safety Fund from all sources for such
fiscal year to equal:
(1) Five Hundred Seventy-five Million Dollars
($575,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2021, and
(2) Five Hundred Ninety Million Dollars
($590,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 206

July 1, 2022, and for each fiscal year
thereafter.
All amounts apportioned pursuant to this paragraph shall be
divided into twelve equal amounts to be apportioned each month
during the fiscal year except the amount specified in subparagraph a
of this paragraph which amount shall be allocated in its full amount
in cash not later than July 30 each year or such later date as may
be required in order for the amount to be allocated in cash; and
2. For each fiscal year after the apportionments required by
paragraph 1 of this subsection have been made:
a. the next Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be
apportioned to the Oklahoma Tourism and Passenger Rail
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 325 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes to be used for
capital and operating costs for the “Heartland Flyer”
rail project, and
b. the next Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall
be apportioned to the Public Transit Revolving Fund
created pursuant to Section 4031 of this title to be
used for purposes authorized by law other than the
purpose described by subparagraph a of this paragraph.
All amounts apportioned pursuant to this paragraph shall be
divided into twelve equal amounts to be apportioned each month
during the fiscal year.
C. The monies apportioned to the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and
Driver Safety Fund shall not be used to supplant or replace existing
state funds used for transportation purposes.
D. In order to ensure that the funds from the ROADS Rebuilding
Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund are used to enhance and not
supplant state funding for the Department of Transportation, the
State Board of Equalization shall examine and investigate
expenditures from the fund each year. For purposes of this
examination, monies used to retire outstanding debt obligations for
which the Department of Transportation is responsible shall be
excluded. At the meeting of the State Board of Equalization held
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 207

within five (5) days after the monthly apportionment in February of
each year, the State Board of Equalization shall issue a finding and
report which shall state whether expenditures from the ROADS
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund were used to
enhance or supplant state funding for the Department of
Transportation. If the State Board of Equalization finds that state
funding for the Department of Transportation was supplanted by funds
from the ROADS Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund,
the Board shall specify the amount by which such funding was
supplanted. In this event, the Legislature shall not make any
appropriations for the ensuing fiscal year until an appropriation in
that amount is made to replenish state funding for the Department of
Transportation.
E. In the event that the Director of the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services declares a General Revenue Fund revenue
failure pursuant to Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and agency allocations are reduced pursuant to the
provisions of Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
the amounts that would otherwise be apportioned to the ROADS
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund by:
1. Subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this
section, only to the extent that the amount is not required for debt
service related to the obligations authorized pursuant to Section
341 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896
of the 1st Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature Section 350.1 of
Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Subparagraphs b and c of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this
section; and
3. Subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 2 of subsection B of this
section,
shall be reduced by a percentage equal to that required of the
General Revenue Fund appropriations to state agencies and such
reductions shall occur during the entire fiscal year and for any
month during which such reductions are required by the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services and by the same percentage as
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 208

that required of the agencies for such General Revenue Fund
appropriations.
F. The Department of Transportation shall use the monies in the
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund for:
1. The construction and maintenance of state roads, bridges,
and highways;
2. The direct expenses of operating and maintaining the state
highway system, including bridges;
3. Direct expenses incurred in constructing, repairing, and
maintaining state highways, farm-to-market roads, county highways,
and bridges as authorized by law;
4. Matching federal funds;
5. The purchase of materials, tools, machinery, motor vehicles,
and equipment necessary or convenient for the construction and
maintenance of the state highway system and bridges;
6. Debt service incurred prior to January 1, 2006, for Capital
Improvement Program bonds sold pursuant to Section 2001 of this
title; and
7. Debt service incurred on or after July 1, 2009, with respect
to obligations authorized to be issued pursuant to Section 341 of
Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896 of
the 1st Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature Section 350.1 of
Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
G. From the monies allocated pursuant to the provisions of
subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section each
fiscal year, the Department of Transportation shall make payments
required for the payment of principal, interest, and other costs
related to the obligations issued by the Oklahoma Capitol
Improvement Authority as authorized by Section 341 of Title 73 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896 of the 1st
Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature Section 350.1 of Title 73
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 209

of the Oklahoma Statutes, and such payments shall be made by the
Department each fiscal year before such monies are used for any
other purpose.
H. For the monies apportioned pursuant to subsection B of this
section, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall notify Service Oklahoma
of the amounts apportioned pursuant to Section 500.4B of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes and Service Oklahoma shall notify the Oklahoma
Tax Commission of the amounts apportioned pursuant to Section 1104
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes within a period necessary to
allow for such apportionments to be made subject to the limitations
provided in paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section.
SECTION 80. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 210

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1108 Page 211